      This ebook is the product of many hours of hard work by volunteers for Standard Ebooks, and builds on the hard work of other literature lovers made possible by the public domain.

      This particular ebook is based on a transcription produced for Project Gutenberg.

      The writing and artwork within are believed to be in the U.S. public domain, and Standard Ebooks releases this ebook edition under the terms in the CC0 1.0 Universal Public Domain Dedication. For full license information, see the Uncopyright at the end of this ebook.

      Standard Ebooks is a volunteer-driven project that produces ebook editions of public domain literature using modern typography, technology, and editorial standards, and distributes them free of cost. You can download this and other ebooks carefully produced for true book lovers at standardebooks.org.





I


The Nel­lie, a cruis­ing yawl, swung to her an­chor with­out a flut­ter of the sails, and was at rest. The flood had made, the wind was nearly calm, and be­ing bound down the river, the only thing for it was to come to and wait for the turn of the tide.

The sea-reach of the Thames stretched be­fore us like the be­gin­ning of an in­ter­minable wa­ter­way. In the off­ing the sea and the sky were welded to­gether with­out a joint, and in the lu­mi­nous space the tanned sails of the barges drift­ing up with the tide seemed to stand still in red clus­ters of can­vas sharply peaked, with gleams of var­nished sprits. A haze rested on the low shores that ran out to sea in van­ish­ing flat­ness. The air was dark above Gravesend, and far­ther back still seemed con­densed into a mourn­ful gloom, brood­ing mo­tion­less over the big­gest, and the great­est, town on earth.

The Direc­tor of Com­pa­nies was our cap­tain and our host. We four af­fec­tion­ately watched his back as he stood in the bows look­ing to sea­ward. On the whole river there was noth­ing that looked half so nau­ti­cal. He re­sem­bled a pi­lot, which to a sea­man is trust­wor­thi­ness per­son­i­fied. It was dif­fi­cult to re­al­ize his work was not out there in the lu­mi­nous es­tu­ary, but be­hind him, within the brood­ing gloom.

Between us there was, as I have al­ready said some­where, the bond of the sea. Be­sides hold­ing our hearts to­gether through long pe­ri­ods of sep­a­ra­tion, it had the ef­fect of mak­ing us tol­er­ant of each other’s yarns—and even con­vic­tions. The Lawyer—the best of old fel­lows—had, be­cause of his many years and many virtues, the only cush­ion on deck, and was ly­ing on the only rug. The Ac­coun­tant had brought out al­ready a box of domi­noes, and was toy­ing ar­chi­tec­turally with the bones. Mar­low sat cross-legged right aft, lean­ing against the mizzen­mast. He had sunken cheeks, a yel­low com­plex­ion, a straight back, an as­cetic as­pect, and, with his arms dropped, the palms of hands out­wards, re­sem­bled an idol. The di­rec­tor, sat­is­fied the an­chor had good hold, made his way aft and sat down amongst us. We ex­changed a few words lazily. After­wards there was si­lence on board the yacht. For some rea­son or other we did not be­gin that game of domi­noes. We felt med­i­ta­tive, and fit for noth­ing but placid star­ing. The day was end­ing in a seren­ity of still and ex­quis­ite bril­liance. The wa­ter shone pacif­i­cally; the sky, with­out a speck, was a be­nign im­men­sity of un­stained light; the very mist on the Es­sex marsh was like a gauzy and ra­di­ant fab­ric, hung from the wooded rises in­land, and drap­ing the low shores in di­aphanous folds. Only the gloom to the west, brood­ing over the up­per reaches, be­came more som­bre ev­ery minute, as if an­gered by the ap­proach of the sun.

And at last, in its curved and im­per­cep­ti­ble fall, the sun sank low, and from glow­ing white changed to a dull red with­out rays and with­out heat, as if about to go out sud­denly, stricken to death by the touch of that gloom brood­ing over a crowd of men.

Forth­with a change came over the wa­ters, and the seren­ity be­came less bril­liant but more pro­found. The old river in its broad reach rested un­ruf­fled at the de­cline of day, af­ter ages of good ser­vice done to the race that peo­pled its banks, spread out in the tran­quil dig­nity of a wa­ter­way lead­ing to the ut­ter­most ends of the earth. We looked at the ven­er­a­ble stream not in the vivid flush of a short day that comes and de­parts for­ever, but in the au­gust light of abid­ing mem­o­ries. And in­deed noth­ing is eas­ier for a man who has, as the phrase goes, “fol­lowed the sea” with rev­er­ence and af­fec­tion, than to evoke the great spirit of the past upon the lower reaches of the Thames. The tidal cur­rent runs to and fro in its un­ceas­ing ser­vice, crowded with mem­o­ries of men and ships it had borne to the rest of home or to the bat­tles of the sea. It had known and served all the men of whom the na­tion is proud, from Sir Fran­cis Drake to Sir John Franklin, knights all, ti­tled and un­ti­tled—the great knights-er­rant of the sea. It had borne all the ships whose names are like jew­els flash­ing in the night of time, from the Golden Hind re­turn­ing with her ro­tund flanks full of trea­sure, to be vis­ited by the Queen’s High­ness and thus pass out of the gi­gan­tic tale, to the Ere­bus and Ter­ror, bound on other con­quests—and that never re­turned. It had known the ships and the men. They had sailed from Dept­ford, from Green­wich, from Erith—the ad­ven­tur­ers and the set­tlers; kings’ ships and the ships of men on ’Change; cap­tains, ad­mi­rals, the dark “in­ter­lop­ers” of the Eastern trade, and the com­mis­sioned “gen­er­als” of East In­dia fleets. Hun­ters for gold or pur­suers of fame, they all had gone out on that stream, bear­ing the sword, and of­ten the torch, mes­sen­gers of the might within the land, bear­ers of a spark from the sa­cred fire. What great­ness had not floated on the ebb of that river into the mys­tery of an un­known earth! … The dreams of men, the seed of com­mon­wealths, the germs of em­pires.

The sun set; the dusk fell on the stream, and lights be­gan to ap­pear along the shore. The Chap­man light­house, a three-legged thing erect on a mud­flat, shone strongly. Lights of ships moved in the fair­way—a great stir of lights go­ing up and go­ing down. And far­ther west on the up­per reaches the place of the mon­strous town was still marked omi­nously on the sky, a brood­ing gloom in sun­shine, a lurid glare un­der the stars.

“And this also,” said Mar­low sud­denly, “has been one of the dark places of the earth.”

He was the only man of us who still “fol­lowed the sea.” The worst that could be said of him was that he did not rep­re­sent his class. He was a sea­man, but he was a wan­derer, too, while most sea­men lead, if one may so ex­press it, a seden­tary life. Their minds are of the stay-at-home or­der, and their home is al­ways with them—the ship; and so is their coun­try—the sea. One ship is very much like an­other, and the sea is al­ways the same. In the im­mutabil­ity of their sur­round­ings the for­eign shores, the for­eign faces, the chang­ing im­men­sity of life, glide past, veiled not by a sense of mys­tery but by a slightly dis­dain­ful ig­no­rance; for there is noth­ing mys­te­ri­ous to a sea­man un­less it be the sea it­self, which is the mis­tress of his ex­is­tence and as in­scrutable as Destiny. For the rest, af­ter his hours of work, a ca­sual stroll or a ca­sual spree on shore suf­fices to un­fold for him the se­cret of a whole con­ti­nent, and gen­er­ally he finds the se­cret not worth know­ing. The yarns of sea­men have a di­rect sim­plic­ity, the whole mean­ing of which lies within the shell of a cracked nut. But Mar­low was not typ­i­cal (if his propen­sity to spin yarns be ex­cepted), and to him the mean­ing of an episode was not in­side like a ker­nel but out­side, en­velop­ing the tale which brought it out only as a glow brings out a haze, in the like­ness of one of these misty ha­los that some­times are made vis­i­ble by the spec­tral il­lu­mi­na­tion of moon­shine.

His re­mark did not seem at all sur­pris­ing. It was just like Mar­low. It was ac­cepted in si­lence. No one took the trou­ble to grunt even; and presently he said, very slow—“I was think­ing of very old times, when the Ro­mans first came here, nine­teen hun­dred years ago—the other day. … Light came out of this river since—you say Knights? Yes; but it is like a run­ning blaze on a plain, like a flash of light­ning in the clouds. We live in the flicker—may it last as long as the old earth keeps rolling! But dark­ness was here yes­ter­day. Imag­ine the feel­ings of a com­man­der of a fine—what d’ye call ’em?—trireme in the Mediter­ranean, or­dered sud­denly to the north; run over­land across the Gauls in a hurry; put in charge of one of these craft the le­gionar­ies—a won­der­ful lot of handy men they must have been, too—used to build, ap­par­ently by the hun­dred, in a month or two, if we may be­lieve what we read. Imag­ine him here—the very end of the world, a sea the colour of lead, a sky the colour of smoke, a kind of ship about as rigid as a con­certina—and go­ing up this river with stores, or or­ders, or what you like. Sand­banks, marshes, forests, sav­ages—pre­cious lit­tle to eat fit for a civ­i­lized man, noth­ing but Thames wa­ter to drink. No Faler­nian wine here, no go­ing ashore. Here and there a mil­i­tary camp lost in a wilder­ness, like a nee­dle in a bun­dle of hay—cold, fog, tem­pests, dis­ease, ex­ile, and death—death skulk­ing in the air, in the wa­ter, in the bush. They must have been dy­ing like flies here. Oh, yes—he did it. Did it very well, too, no doubt, and with­out think­ing much about it ei­ther, ex­cept af­ter­wards to brag of what he had gone through in his time, per­haps. They were men enough to face the dark­ness. And per­haps he was cheered by keep­ing his eye on a chance of pro­mo­tion to the fleet at Ravenna by and by, if he had good friends in Rome and sur­vived the aw­ful cli­mate. Or think of a de­cent young cit­i­zen in a toga—per­haps too much dice, you know—com­ing out here in the train of some pre­fect, or tax-gath­erer, or trader even, to mend his for­tunes. Land in a swamp, march through the woods, and in some in­land post feel the sav­agery, the ut­ter sav­agery, had closed round him—all that mys­te­ri­ous life of the wilder­ness that stirs in the for­est, in the jun­gles, in the hearts of wild men. There’s no ini­ti­a­tion ei­ther into such mys­ter­ies. He has to live in the midst of the in­com­pre­hen­si­ble, which is also de­testable. And it has a fas­ci­na­tion, too, that goes to work upon him. The fas­ci­na­tion of the abom­i­na­tion—you know, imag­ine the grow­ing re­grets, the long­ing to es­cape, the pow­er­less dis­gust, the sur­ren­der, the hate.”

He paused.

“Mind,” he be­gan again, lift­ing one arm from the el­bow, the palm of the hand out­wards, so that, with his legs folded be­fore him, he had the pose of a Bud­dha preach­ing in Euro­pean clothes and with­out a lo­tus-flower—“Mind, none of us would feel ex­actly like this. What saves us is ef­fi­ciency—the de­vo­tion to ef­fi­ciency. But these chaps were not much ac­count, re­ally. They were no colonists; their ad­min­is­tra­tion was merely a squeeze, and noth­ing more, I sus­pect. They were con­querors, and for that you want only brute force—noth­ing to boast of, when you have it, since your strength is just an ac­ci­dent aris­ing from the weak­ness of oth­ers. They grabbed what they could get for the sake of what was to be got. It was just rob­bery with vi­o­lence, ag­gra­vated mur­der on a great scale, and men go­ing at it blind—as is very proper for those who tackle a dark­ness. The con­quest of the earth, which mostly means the tak­ing it away from those who have a dif­fer­ent com­plex­ion or slightly flat­ter noses than our­selves, is not a pretty thing when you look into it too much. What re­deems it is the idea only. An idea at the back of it; not a sen­ti­men­tal pre­tence but an idea; and an un­selfish be­lief in the idea—some­thing you can set up, and bow down be­fore, and of­fer a sac­ri­fice to. …”

He broke off. Flames glided in the river, small green flames, red flames, white flames, pur­su­ing, over­tak­ing, join­ing, cross­ing each other—then sep­a­rat­ing slowly or hastily. The traf­fic of the great city went on in the deep­en­ing night upon the sleep­less river. We looked on, wait­ing pa­tiently—there was noth­ing else to do till the end of the flood; but it was only af­ter a long si­lence, when he said, in a hes­i­tat­ing voice, “I sup­pose you fel­lows re­mem­ber I did once turn fresh­wa­ter sailor for a bit,” that we knew we were fated, be­fore the ebb be­gan to run, to hear about one of Mar­low’s in­con­clu­sive ex­pe­ri­ences.

“I don’t want to bother you much with what hap­pened to me per­son­ally,” he be­gan, show­ing in this re­mark the weak­ness of many tell­ers of tales who seem so of­ten un­aware of what their au­di­ence would like best to hear; “yet to un­der­stand the ef­fect of it on me you ought to know how I got out there, what I saw, how I went up that river to the place where I first met the poor chap. It was the far­thest point of nav­i­ga­tion and the cul­mi­nat­ing point of my ex­pe­ri­ence. It seemed some­how to throw a kind of light on ev­ery­thing about me—and into my thoughts. It was som­bre enough, too—and piti­ful—not ex­tra­or­di­nary in any way—not very clear ei­ther. No, not very clear. And yet it seemed to throw a kind of light.

“I had then, as you re­mem­ber, just re­turned to Lon­don af­ter a lot of In­dian Ocean, Pa­cific, China Seas—a reg­u­lar dose of the East—six years or so, and I was loaf­ing about, hin­der­ing you fel­lows in your work and in­vad­ing your homes, just as though I had got a heav­enly mis­sion to civ­i­lize you. It was very fine for a time, but af­ter a bit I did get tired of rest­ing. Then I be­gan to look for a ship—I should think the hard­est work on earth. But the ships wouldn’t even look at me. And I got tired of that game, too.

“Now when I was a lit­tle chap I had a pas­sion for maps. I would look for hours at South Amer­ica, or Africa, or Aus­tralia, and lose my­self in all the glo­ries of ex­plo­ration. At that time there were many blank spa­ces on the earth, and when I saw one that looked par­tic­u­larly invit­ing on a map (but they all look that) I would put my fin­ger on it and say, ‘When I grow up I will go there.’ The North Pole was one of these places, I re­mem­ber. Well, I haven’t been there yet, and shall not try now. The glam­our’s off. Other places were scat­tered about the hemi­spheres. I have been in some of them, and … well, we won’t talk about that. But there was one yet—the big­gest, the most blank, so to speak—that I had a han­ker­ing af­ter.

“True, by this time it was not a blank space any more. It had got filled since my boy­hood with rivers and lakes and names. It had ceased to be a blank space of de­light­ful mys­tery—a white patch for a boy to dream glo­ri­ously over. It had be­come a place of dark­ness. But there was in it one river es­pe­cially, a mighty big river, that you could see on the map, re­sem­bling an im­mense snake un­coiled, with its head in the sea, its body at rest curv­ing afar over a vast coun­try, and its tail lost in the depths of the land. And as I looked at the map of it in a shop­win­dow, it fas­ci­nated me as a snake would a bird—a silly lit­tle bird. Then I re­mem­bered there was a big con­cern, a Com­pany for trade on that river. Dash it all! I thought to my­self, they can’t trade with­out us­ing some kind of craft on that lot of fresh wa­ter—steam­boats! Why shouldn’t I try to get charge of one? I went on along Fleet Street, but could not shake off the idea. The snake had charmed me.

“You un­der­stand it was a Con­ti­nen­tal con­cern, that Trad­ing so­ci­ety; but I have a lot of re­la­tions liv­ing on the Con­ti­nent, be­cause it’s cheap and not so nasty as it looks, they say.

“I am sorry to own I be­gan to worry them. This was al­ready a fresh de­par­ture for me. I was not used to get things that way, you know. I al­ways went my own road and on my own legs where I had a mind to go. I wouldn’t have be­lieved it of my­self; but, then—you see—I felt some­how I must get there by hook or by crook. So I wor­ried them. The men said ‘My dear fel­low,’ and did noth­ing. Then—would you be­lieve it?—I tried the women. I, Char­lie Mar­low, set the women to work—to get a job. Heav­ens! Well, you see, the no­tion drove me. I had an aunt, a dear en­thu­si­as­tic soul. She wrote: ‘It will be de­light­ful. I am ready to do any­thing, any­thing for you. It is a glo­ri­ous idea. I know the wife of a very high per­son­age in the Ad­min­is­tra­tion, and also a man who has lots of in­flu­ence with,’ etc. She was de­ter­mined to make no end of fuss to get me ap­pointed skip­per of a river steam­boat, if such was my fancy.

“I got my ap­point­ment—of course; and I got it very quick. It ap­pears the Com­pany had re­ceived news that one of their cap­tains had been killed in a scuf­fle with the na­tives. This was my chance, and it made me the more anx­ious to go. It was only months and months af­ter­wards, when I made the at­tempt to re­cover what was left of the body, that I heard the orig­i­nal quar­rel arose from a mis­un­der­stand­ing about some hens. Yes, two black hens. Fresleven—that was the fel­low’s name, a Dane—thought him­self wronged some­how in the bar­gain, so he went ashore and started to ham­mer the chief of the vil­lage with a stick. Oh, it didn’t sur­prise me in the least to hear this, and at the same time to be told that Fresleven was the gen­tlest, qui­etest crea­ture that ever walked on two legs. No doubt he was; but he had been a cou­ple of years al­ready out there en­gaged in the no­ble cause, you know, and he prob­a­bly felt the need at last of as­sert­ing his self-re­spect in some way. There­fore he whacked the old nig­ger mer­ci­lessly, while a big crowd of his peo­ple watched him, thun­der­struck, till some man—I was told the chief’s son—in des­per­a­tion at hear­ing the old chap yell, made a ten­ta­tive jab with a spear at the white man—and of course it went quite easy be­tween the shoul­der-blades. Then the whole pop­u­la­tion cleared into the for­est, ex­pect­ing all kinds of calami­ties to hap­pen, while, on the other hand, the steamer Fresleven com­manded left also in a bad panic, in charge of the en­gi­neer, I be­lieve. After­wards no­body seemed to trou­ble much about Fresleven’s re­mains, till I got out and stepped into his shoes. I couldn’t let it rest, though; but when an op­por­tu­nity of­fered at last to meet my pre­de­ces­sor, the grass grow­ing through his ribs was tall enough to hide his bones. They were all there. The su­per­nat­u­ral be­ing had not been touched af­ter he fell. And the vil­lage was de­serted, the huts gaped black, rot­ting, all askew within the fallen en­clo­sures. A calamity had come to it, sure enough. The peo­ple had van­ished. Mad ter­ror had scat­tered them, men, women, and chil­dren, through the bush, and they had never re­turned. What be­came of the hens I don’t know ei­ther. I should think the cause of progress got them, any­how. How­ever, through this glo­ri­ous af­fair I got my ap­point­ment, be­fore I had fairly be­gun to hope for it.

“I flew around like mad to get ready, and be­fore forty-eight hours I was cross­ing the Chan­nel to show my­self to my em­ploy­ers, and sign the con­tract. In a very few hours I ar­rived in a city that al­ways makes me think of a whited sepul­chre. Prej­u­dice no doubt. I had no dif­fi­culty in find­ing the Com­pany’s of­fices. It was the big­gest thing in the town, and ev­ery­body I met was full of it. They were go­ing to run an over­sea em­pire, and make no end of coin by trade.

“A nar­row and de­serted street in deep shadow, high houses, in­nu­mer­able win­dows with vene­tian blinds, a dead si­lence, grass sprout­ing right and left, im­mense dou­ble doors stand­ing pon­der­ously ajar. I slipped through one of these cracks, went up a swept and un­gar­nished stair­case, as arid as a desert, and opened the first door I came to. Two women, one fat and the other slim, sat on straw-bot­tomed chairs, knit­ting black wool. The slim one got up and walked straight at me—still knit­ting with down­cast eyes—and only just as I be­gan to think of get­ting out of her way, as you would for a som­nam­bu­list, stood still, and looked up. Her dress was as plain as an um­brella-cover, and she turned round with­out a word and pre­ceded me into a wait­ing-room. I gave my name, and looked about. Deal ta­ble in the mid­dle, plain chairs all round the walls, on one end a large shin­ing map, marked with all the colours of a rain­bow. There was a vast amount of red—good to see at any time, be­cause one knows that some real work is done in there, a deuce of a lot of blue, a lit­tle green, smears of or­ange, and, on the East Coast, a pur­ple patch, to show where the jolly pi­o­neers of progress drink the jolly lager-beer. How­ever, I wasn’t go­ing into any of these. I was go­ing into the yel­low. Dead in the cen­tre. And the river was there—fas­ci­nat­ing—deadly—like a snake. Ough! A door opened, a white-haired sec­re­tar­ial head, but wear­ing a com­pas­sion­ate ex­pres­sion, ap­peared, and a skinny fore­fin­ger beck­oned me into the sanc­tu­ary. Its light was dim, and a heavy writ­ing-desk squat­ted in the mid­dle. From be­hind that struc­ture came out an im­pres­sion of pale plump­ness in a frock-coat. The great man him­self. He was five feet six, I should judge, and had his grip on the han­dle-end of ever so many mil­lions. He shook hands, I fancy, mur­mured vaguely, was sat­is­fied with my French. Bon Voy­age.

“In about forty-five sec­onds I found my­self again in the wait­ing-room with the com­pas­sion­ate sec­re­tary, who, full of des­o­la­tion and sym­pa­thy, made me sign some doc­u­ment. I be­lieve I un­der­took amongst other things not to dis­close any trade se­crets. Well, I am not go­ing to.

“I be­gan to feel slightly un­easy. You know I am not used to such cer­e­monies, and there was some­thing omi­nous in the at­mos­phere. It was just as though I had been let into some con­spir­acy—I don’t know—some­thing not quite right; and I was glad to get out. In the outer room the two women knit­ted black wool fever­ishly. Peo­ple were ar­riv­ing, and the younger one was walk­ing back and forth in­tro­duc­ing them. The old one sat on her chair. Her flat cloth slip­pers were propped up on a foot-warmer, and a cat re­posed on her lap. She wore a starched white af­fair on her head, had a wart on one cheek, and sil­ver-rimmed spec­ta­cles hung on the tip of her nose. She glanced at me above the glasses. The swift and in­dif­fer­ent placid­ity of that look trou­bled me. Two youths with fool­ish and cheery coun­te­nances were be­ing pi­loted over, and she threw at them the same quick glance of un­con­cerned wis­dom. She seemed to know all about them and about me, too. An eerie feel­ing came over me. She seemed un­canny and fate­ful. Often far away there I thought of these two, guard­ing the door of Dark­ness, knit­ting black wool as for a warm pall, one in­tro­duc­ing, in­tro­duc­ing con­tin­u­ously to the un­known, the other scru­ti­niz­ing the cheery and fool­ish faces with un­con­cerned old eyes. Ave! Old knit­ter of black wool. Mori­t­uri te salu­tant. Not many of those she looked at ever saw her again—not half, by a long way.

“There was yet a visit to the doc­tor. ‘A sim­ple for­mal­ity,’ as­sured me the sec­re­tary, with an air of tak­ing an im­mense part in all my sor­rows. Ac­cord­ingly a young chap wear­ing his hat over the left eye­brow, some clerk I sup­pose—there must have been clerks in the busi­ness, though the house was as still as a house in a city of the dead—came from some­where up­stairs, and led me forth. He was shabby and care­less, with inkstains on the sleeves of his jacket, and his cra­vat was large and bil­lowy, un­der a chin shaped like the toe of an old boot. It was a lit­tle too early for the doc­tor, so I pro­posed a drink, and there­upon he de­vel­oped a vein of jovi­al­ity. As we sat over our ver­mouths he glo­ri­fied the Com­pany’s busi­ness, and by and by I ex­pressed ca­su­ally my sur­prise at him not go­ing out there. He be­came very cool and col­lected all at once. ‘I am not such a fool as I look, quoth Plato to his dis­ci­ples,’ he said sen­ten­tiously, emp­tied his glass with great res­o­lu­tion, and we rose.

“The old doc­tor felt my pulse, ev­i­dently think­ing of some­thing else the while. ‘Good, good for there,’ he mum­bled, and then with a cer­tain ea­ger­ness asked me whether I would let him mea­sure my head. Rather sur­prised, I said Yes, when he pro­duced a thing like calipers and got the di­men­sions back and front and ev­ery way, tak­ing notes care­fully. He was an un­shaven lit­tle man in a thread­bare coat like a gab­er­dine, with his feet in slip­pers, and I thought him a harm­less fool. ‘I al­ways ask leave, in the in­ter­ests of sci­ence, to mea­sure the cra­nia of those go­ing out there,’ he said. ‘And when they come back, too?’ I asked. ‘Oh, I never see them,’ he re­marked; ‘and, more­over, the changes take place in­side, you know.’ He smiled, as if at some quiet joke. ‘So you are go­ing out there. Fa­mous. In­ter­est­ing, too.’ He gave me a search­ing glance, and made an­other note. ‘Ever any mad­ness in your fam­ily?’ he asked, in a mat­ter-of-fact tone. I felt very an­noyed. ‘Is that ques­tion in the in­ter­ests of sci­ence, too?’ ‘It would be,’ he said, with­out tak­ing no­tice of my ir­ri­ta­tion, ‘in­ter­est­ing for sci­ence to watch the men­tal changes of in­di­vid­u­als, on the spot, but …’ ‘Are you an alienist?’ I in­ter­rupted. ‘Every doc­tor should be—a lit­tle,’ an­swered that orig­i­nal, im­per­turbably. ‘I have a lit­tle the­ory which you messieurs who go out there must help me to prove. This is my share in the ad­van­tages my coun­try shall reap from the pos­ses­sion of such a mag­nif­i­cent de­pen­dency. The mere wealth I leave to oth­ers. Par­don my ques­tions, but you are the first English­man com­ing un­der my ob­ser­va­tion …’ I has­tened to as­sure him I was not in the least typ­i­cal. ‘If I were,’ said I, ‘I wouldn’t be talk­ing like this with you.’ ‘What you say is rather pro­found, and prob­a­bly er­ro­neous,’ he said, with a laugh. ‘Avoid ir­ri­ta­tion more than ex­po­sure to the sun. Adieu. How do you English say, eh? Good­bye. Ah! Good­bye. Adieu. In the trop­ics one must be­fore ev­ery­thing keep calm.’ … He lifted a warn­ing fore­fin­ger. … ‘Du calme, du calme.’

“One thing more re­mained to do—say good­bye to my ex­cel­lent aunt. I found her tri­umphant. I had a cup of tea—the last de­cent cup of tea for many days—and in a room that most sooth­ingly looked just as you would ex­pect a lady’s draw­ing-room to look, we had a long quiet chat by the fire­side. In the course of these con­fi­dences it be­came quite plain to me I had been rep­re­sented to the wife of the high dig­ni­tary, and good­ness knows to how many more peo­ple be­sides, as an ex­cep­tional and gifted crea­ture—a piece of good for­tune for the Com­pany—a man you don’t get hold of ev­ery day. Good heav­ens! and I was go­ing to take charge of a twopenny-half­penny river-steam­boat with a penny whis­tle at­tached! It ap­peared, how­ever, I was also one of the Work­ers, with a cap­i­tal—you know. Some­thing like an emis­sary of light, some­thing like a lower sort of apos­tle. There had been a lot of such rot let loose in print and talk just about that time, and the ex­cel­lent woman, liv­ing right in the rush of all that hum­bug, got car­ried off her feet. She talked about ‘wean­ing those ig­no­rant mil­lions from their hor­rid ways,’ till, upon my word, she made me quite un­com­fort­able. I ven­tured to hint that the Com­pany was run for profit.

“ ‘You for­get, dear Char­lie, that the labourer is wor­thy of his hire,’ she said, brightly. It’s queer how out of touch with truth women are. They live in a world of their own, and there has never been any­thing like it, and never can be. It is too beau­ti­ful al­to­gether, and if they were to set it up it would go to pieces be­fore the first sun­set. Some con­founded fact we men have been liv­ing con­tent­edly with ever since the day of cre­ation would start up and knock the whole thing over.

“After this I got em­braced, told to wear flan­nel, be sure to write of­ten, and so on—and I left. In the street—I don’t know why—a queer feel­ing came to me that I was an im­poster. Odd thing that I, who used to clear out for any part of the world at twenty-four hours’ no­tice, with less thought than most men give to the cross­ing of a street, had a mo­ment—I won’t say of hes­i­ta­tion, but of star­tled pause, be­fore this com­mon­place af­fair. The best way I can ex­plain it to you is by say­ing that, for a sec­ond or two, I felt as though, in­stead of go­ing to the cen­tre of a con­ti­nent, I were about to set off for the cen­tre of the earth.

“I left in a French steamer, and she called in ev­ery blamed port they have out there, for, as far as I could see, the sole pur­pose of land­ing sol­diers and cus­tom­house of­fi­cers. I watched the coast. Watch­ing a coast as it slips by the ship is like think­ing about an enigma. There it is be­fore you—smil­ing, frown­ing, invit­ing, grand, mean, in­sipid, or sav­age, and al­ways mute with an air of whis­per­ing, ‘Come and find out.’ This one was al­most fea­ture­less, as if still in the mak­ing, with an as­pect of mo­not­o­nous grim­ness. The edge of a colos­sal jun­gle, so dark-green as to be al­most black, fringed with white surf, ran straight, like a ruled line, far, far away along a blue sea whose glit­ter was blurred by a creep­ing mist. The sun was fierce, the land seemed to glis­ten and drip with steam. Here and there grey­ish-whitish specks showed up clus­tered in­side the white surf, with a flag fly­ing above them per­haps. Set­tle­ments some cen­turies old, and still no big­ger than pin­heads on the un­touched ex­panse of their back­ground. We pounded along, stopped, landed sol­diers; went on, landed cus­tom­house clerks to levy toll in what looked like a God­for­saken wilder­ness, with a tin shed and a flag­pole lost in it; landed more sol­diers—to take care of the cus­tom­house clerks, pre­sum­ably. Some, I heard, got drowned in the surf; but whether they did or not, no­body seemed par­tic­u­larly to care. They were just flung out there, and on we went. Every day the coast looked the same, as though we had not moved; but we passed var­i­ous places—trad­ing places—with names like Gran’ Bas­sam, Lit­tle Popo; names that seemed to be­long to some sor­did farce acted in front of a sin­is­ter back­cloth. The idle­ness of a pas­sen­ger, my iso­la­tion amongst all these men with whom I had no point of con­tact, the oily and lan­guid sea, the uni­form som­bre­ness of the coast, seemed to keep me away from the truth of things, within the toil of a mourn­ful and sense­less delu­sion. The voice of the surf heard now and then was a pos­i­tive plea­sure, like the speech of a brother. It was some­thing nat­u­ral, that had its rea­son, that had a mean­ing. Now and then a boat from the shore gave one a mo­men­tary con­tact with re­al­ity. It was pad­dled by black fel­lows. You could see from afar the white of their eye­balls glis­ten­ing. They shouted, sang; their bod­ies streamed with per­spi­ra­tion; they had faces like grotesque masks—these chaps; but they had bone, mus­cle, a wild vi­tal­ity, an in­tense en­ergy of move­ment, that was as nat­u­ral and true as the surf along their coast. They wanted no ex­cuse for be­ing there. They were a great com­fort to look at. For a time I would feel I be­longed still to a world of straight­for­ward facts; but the feel­ing would not last long. Some­thing would turn up to scare it away. Once, I re­mem­ber, we came upon a man-of-war an­chored off the coast. There wasn’t even a shed there, and she was shelling the bush. It ap­pears the French had one of their wars go­ing on there­abouts. Her en­sign dropped limp like a rag; the muz­zles of the long six-inch guns stuck out all over the low hull; the greasy, slimy swell swung her up lazily and let her down, sway­ing her thin masts. In the empty im­men­sity of earth, sky, and wa­ter, there she was, in­com­pre­hen­si­ble, fir­ing into a con­ti­nent. Pop, would go one of the six-inch guns; a small flame would dart and van­ish, a lit­tle white smoke would dis­ap­pear, a tiny pro­jec­tile would give a fee­ble screech—and noth­ing hap­pened. Noth­ing could hap­pen. There was a touch of in­san­ity in the pro­ceed­ing, a sense of lugubri­ous drollery in the sight; and it was not dis­si­pated by some­body on board as­sur­ing me earnestly there was a camp of na­tives—he called them en­e­mies!—hid­den out of sight some­where.

“We gave her her let­ters (I heard the men in that lonely ship were dy­ing of fever at the rate of three a day) and went on. We called at some more places with far­ci­cal names, where the merry dance of death and trade goes on in a still and earthy at­mos­phere as of an over­heated cat­a­comb; all along the form­less coast bor­dered by dan­ger­ous surf, as if Na­ture her­self had tried to ward off in­trud­ers; in and out of rivers, streams of death in life, whose banks were rot­ting into mud, whose wa­ters, thick­ened into slime, in­vaded the con­torted man­groves, that seemed to writhe at us in the ex­trem­ity of an im­po­tent de­spair. Nowhere did we stop long enough to get a par­tic­u­lar­ized im­pres­sion, but the gen­eral sense of vague and op­pres­sive won­der grew upon me. It was like a weary pil­grim­age amongst hints for night­mares.

“It was up­ward of thirty days be­fore I saw the mouth of the big river. We an­chored off the seat of the gov­ern­ment. But my work would not be­gin till some two hun­dred miles far­ther on. So as soon as I could I made a start for a place thirty miles higher up.

“I had my pas­sage on a lit­tle seago­ing steamer. Her cap­tain was a Swede, and know­ing me for a sea­man, in­vited me on the bridge. He was a young man, lean, fair, and mo­rose, with lanky hair and a shuf­fling gait. As we left the mis­er­able lit­tle wharf, he tossed his head con­temp­tu­ously at the shore. ‘Been liv­ing there?’ he asked. I said, ‘Yes.’ ‘Fine lot these gov­ern­ment chaps—are they not?’ he went on, speak­ing English with great pre­ci­sion and con­sid­er­able bit­ter­ness. ‘It is funny what some peo­ple will do for a few francs a month. I won­der what be­comes of that kind when it goes up­coun­try?’ I said to him I ex­pected to see that soon. ‘So-o-o!’ he ex­claimed. He shuf­fled athwart, keep­ing one eye ahead vig­i­lantly. ‘Don’t be too sure,’ he con­tin­ued. ‘The other day I took up a man who hanged him­self on the road. He was a Swede, too.’ ‘Hanged him­self! Why, in God’s name?’ I cried. He kept on look­ing out watch­fully. ‘Who knows? The sun too much for him, or the coun­try per­haps.’

“At last we opened a reach. A rocky cliff ap­peared, mounds of turned-up earth by the shore, houses on a hill, oth­ers with iron roofs, amongst a waste of ex­ca­va­tions, or hang­ing to the de­cliv­ity. A con­tin­u­ous noise of the rapids above hov­ered over this scene of in­hab­ited dev­as­ta­tion. A lot of peo­ple, mostly black and naked, moved about like ants. A jetty pro­jected into the river. A blind­ing sun­light drowned all this at times in a sud­den re­crude­s­cence of glare. ‘There’s your Com­pany’s sta­tion,’ said the Swede, point­ing to three wooden bar­rack-like struc­tures on the rocky slope. ‘I will send your things up. Four boxes did you say? So. Farewell.’

“I came upon a boiler wal­low­ing in the grass, then found a path lead­ing up the hill. It turned aside for the boul­ders, and also for an un­der­sized rail­way-truck ly­ing there on its back with its wheels in the air. One was off. The thing looked as dead as the car­cass of some an­i­mal. I came upon more pieces of de­cay­ing ma­chin­ery, a stack of rusty rails. To the left a clump of trees made a shady spot, where dark things seemed to stir fee­bly. I blinked, the path was steep. A horn tooted to the right, and I saw the black peo­ple run. A heavy and dull det­o­na­tion shook the ground, a puff of smoke came out of the cliff, and that was all. No change ap­peared on the face of the rock. They were build­ing a rail­way. The cliff was not in the way or any­thing; but this ob­ject­less blast­ing was all the work go­ing on.

“A slight clink­ing be­hind me made me turn my head. Six black men ad­vanced in a file, toil­ing up the path. They walked erect and slow, bal­anc­ing small bas­kets full of earth on their heads, and the clink kept time with their foot­steps. Black rags were wound round their loins, and the short ends be­hind wag­gled to and fro like tails. I could see ev­ery rib, the joints of their limbs were like knots in a rope; each had an iron col­lar on his neck, and all were con­nected to­gether with a chain whose bights swung be­tween them, rhyth­mi­cally clink­ing. Another re­port from the cliff made me think sud­denly of that ship of war I had seen fir­ing into a con­ti­nent. It was the same kind of omi­nous voice; but these men could by no stretch of imag­i­na­tion be called en­e­mies. They were called crim­i­nals, and the out­raged law, like the burst­ing shells, had come to them, an in­sol­u­ble mys­tery from the sea. All their mea­gre breasts panted to­gether, the vi­o­lently di­lated nos­trils quiv­ered, the eyes stared stonily up­hill. They passed me within six inches, with­out a glance, with that com­plete, death­like in­dif­fer­ence of un­happy sav­ages. Be­hind this raw mat­ter one of the re­claimed, the prod­uct of the new forces at work, strolled de­spon­dently, car­ry­ing a ri­fle by its mid­dle. He had a uni­form jacket with one but­ton off, and see­ing a white man on the path, hoisted his weapon to his shoul­der with alacrity. This was sim­ple pru­dence, white men be­ing so much alike at a dis­tance that he could not tell who I might be. He was speed­ily re­as­sured, and with a large, white, ras­cally grin, and a glance at his charge, seemed to take me into part­ner­ship in his ex­alted trust. After all, I also was a part of the great cause of these high and just pro­ceed­ings.

“In­stead of go­ing up, I turned and de­scended to the left. My idea was to let that chain-gang get out of sight be­fore I climbed the hill. You know I am not par­tic­u­larly ten­der; I’ve had to strike and to fend off. I’ve had to re­sist and to at­tack some­times—that’s only one way of re­sist­ing—with­out count­ing the ex­act cost, ac­cord­ing to the de­mands of such sort of life as I had blun­dered into. I’ve seen the devil of vi­o­lence, and the devil of greed, and the devil of hot de­sire; but, by all the stars! these were strong, lusty, red-eyed dev­ils, that swayed and drove men—men, I tell you. But as I stood on this hill­side, I fore­saw that in the blind­ing sun­shine of that land I would be­come ac­quainted with a flabby, pre­tend­ing, weak-eyed devil of a ra­pa­cious and piti­less folly. How in­sid­i­ous he could be, too, I was only to find out sev­eral months later and a thou­sand miles far­ther. For a mo­ment I stood ap­palled, as though by a warn­ing. Fi­nally I de­scended the hill, obliquely, to­wards the trees I had seen.

“I avoided a vast ar­ti­fi­cial hole some­body had been dig­ging on the slope, the pur­pose of which I found it im­pos­si­ble to di­vine. It wasn’t a quarry or a sand­pit, any­how. It was just a hole. It might have been con­nected with the phil­an­thropic de­sire of giv­ing the crim­i­nals some­thing to do. I don’t know. Then I nearly fell into a very nar­row ravine, al­most no more than a scar in the hill­side. I dis­cov­ered that a lot of im­ported drainage-pipes for the set­tle­ment had been tum­bled in there. There wasn’t one that was not bro­ken. It was a wan­ton smashup. At last I got un­der the trees. My pur­pose was to stroll into the shade for a mo­ment; but no sooner within than it seemed to me I had stepped into the gloomy cir­cle of some In­ferno. The rapids were near, and an un­in­ter­rupted, uni­form, head­long, rush­ing noise filled the mourn­ful still­ness of the grove, where not a breath stirred, not a leaf moved, with a mys­te­ri­ous sound—as though the tear­ing pace of the launched earth had sud­denly be­come au­di­ble.

“Black shapes crouched, lay, sat be­tween the trees lean­ing against the trunks, cling­ing to the earth, half com­ing out, half ef­faced within the dim light, in all the at­ti­tudes of pain, aban­don­ment, and de­spair. Another mine on the cliff went off, fol­lowed by a slight shud­der of the soil un­der my feet. The work was go­ing on. The work! And this was the place where some of the helpers had with­drawn to die.

“They were dy­ing slowly—it was very clear. They were not en­e­mies, they were not crim­i­nals, they were noth­ing earthly now—noth­ing but black shad­ows of dis­ease and star­va­tion, ly­ing con­fus­edly in the green­ish gloom. Brought from all the re­cesses of the coast in all the le­gal­ity of time con­tracts, lost in un­con­ge­nial sur­round­ings, fed on un­fa­mil­iar food, they sick­ened, be­came in­ef­fi­cient, and were then al­lowed to crawl away and rest. Th­ese mori­bund shapes were free as air—and nearly as thin. I be­gan to dis­tin­guish the gleam of the eyes un­der the trees. Then, glanc­ing down, I saw a face near my hand. The black bones re­clined at full length with one shoul­der against the tree, and slowly the eye­lids rose and the sunken eyes looked up at me, enor­mous and va­cant, a kind of blind, white flicker in the depths of the orbs, which died out slowly. The man seemed young—al­most a boy—but you know with them it’s hard to tell. I found noth­ing else to do but to of­fer him one of my good Swede’s ship’s bis­cuits I had in my pocket. The fin­gers closed slowly on it and held—there was no other move­ment and no other glance. He had tied a bit of white worsted round his neck—Why? Where did he get it? Was it a badge—an or­na­ment—a charm—a pro­pi­tia­tory act? Was there any idea at all con­nected with it? It looked star­tling round his black neck, this bit of white thread from be­yond the seas.

“Near the same tree two more bun­dles of acute an­gles sat with their legs drawn up. One, with his chin propped on his knees, stared at noth­ing, in an in­tol­er­a­ble and ap­palling man­ner: his brother phan­tom rested its fore­head, as if over­come with a great weari­ness; and all about oth­ers were scat­tered in ev­ery pose of con­torted col­lapse, as in some pic­ture of a mas­sacre or a pesti­lence. While I stood hor­ror-struck, one of these crea­tures rose to his hands and knees, and went off on all-fours to­wards the river to drink. He lapped out of his hand, then sat up in the sun­light, cross­ing his shins in front of him, and af­ter a time let his woolly head fall on his breast­bone.

“I didn’t want any more loi­ter­ing in the shade, and I made haste to­wards the sta­tion. When near the build­ings I met a white man, in such an un­ex­pected el­e­gance of getup that in the first mo­ment I took him for a sort of vi­sion. I saw a high starched col­lar, white cuffs, a light al­paca jacket, snowy trousers, a clean neck­tie, and var­nished boots. No hat. Hair parted, brushed, oiled, un­der a green-lined para­sol held in a big white hand. He was amaz­ing, and had a pen­holder be­hind his ear.

“I shook hands with this mir­a­cle, and I learned he was the Com­pany’s chief ac­coun­tant, and that all the book­keep­ing was done at this sta­tion. He had come out for a mo­ment, he said, ‘to get a breath of fresh air.’ The ex­pres­sion sounded won­der­fully odd, with its sug­ges­tion of seden­tary desk-life. I wouldn’t have men­tioned the fel­low to you at all, only it was from his lips that I first heard the name of the man who is so in­dis­sol­ubly con­nected with the mem­o­ries of that time. More­over, I re­spected the fel­low. Yes; I re­spected his col­lars, his vast cuffs, his brushed hair. His ap­pear­ance was cer­tainly that of a hair­dresser’s dummy; but in the great de­mor­al­iza­tion of the land he kept up his ap­pear­ance. That’s back­bone. His starched col­lars and got-up shirt­fronts were achieve­ments of char­ac­ter. He had been out nearly three years; and, later, I could not help ask­ing him how he man­aged to sport such linen. He had just the faintest blush, and said mod­estly, ‘I’ve been teach­ing one of the na­tive women about the sta­tion. It was dif­fi­cult. She had a dis­taste for the work.’ Thus this man had ver­ily ac­com­plished some­thing. And he was de­voted to his books, which were in ap­ple-pie or­der.

“Every­thing else in the sta­tion was in a mud­dle—heads, things, build­ings. Strings of dusty nig­gers with splay feet ar­rived and de­parted; a stream of man­u­fac­tured goods, rub­bishy cot­tons, beads, and brass-wire sent into the depths of dark­ness, and in re­turn came a pre­cious trickle of ivory.

“I had to wait in the sta­tion for ten days—an eter­nity. I lived in a hut in the yard, but to be out of the chaos I would some­times get into the ac­coun­tant’s of­fice. It was built of hor­i­zon­tal planks, and so badly put to­gether that, as he bent over his high desk, he was barred from neck to heels with nar­row strips of sun­light. There was no need to open the big shut­ter to see. It was hot there, too; big flies buzzed fiendishly, and did not sting, but stabbed. I sat gen­er­ally on the floor, while, of fault­less ap­pear­ance (and even slightly scented), perch­ing on a high stool, he wrote, he wrote. Some­times he stood up for ex­er­cise. When a truckle-bed with a sick man (some in­valid agent from up­coun­try) was put in there, he ex­hib­ited a gen­tle an­noy­ance. ‘The groans of this sick per­son,’ he said, ‘dis­tract my at­ten­tion. And with­out that it is ex­tremely dif­fi­cult to guard against cler­i­cal er­rors in this cli­mate.’

“One day he re­marked, with­out lift­ing his head, ‘In the in­te­rior you will no doubt meet Mr. Kurtz.’ On my ask­ing who Mr. Kurtz was, he said he was a first-class agent; and see­ing my dis­ap­point­ment at this in­for­ma­tion, he added slowly, lay­ing down his pen, ‘He is a very re­mark­able per­son.’ Fur­ther ques­tions elicited from him that Mr. Kurtz was at present in charge of a trad­ing-post, a very im­por­tant one, in the true ivory-coun­try, at ‘the very bot­tom of there. Sends in as much ivory as all the oth­ers put to­gether …’ He be­gan to write again. The sick man was too ill to groan. The flies buzzed in a great peace.

“Sud­denly there was a grow­ing mur­mur of voices and a great tramp­ing of feet. A car­a­van had come in. A vi­o­lent bab­ble of un­couth sounds burst out on the other side of the planks. All the car­ri­ers were speak­ing to­gether, and in the midst of the up­roar the lam­en­ta­ble voice of the chief agent was heard ‘giv­ing it up’ tear­fully for the twen­ti­eth time that day. … He rose slowly. ‘What a fright­ful row,’ he said. He crossed the room gen­tly to look at the sick man, and re­turn­ing, said to me, ‘He does not hear.’ ‘What! Dead?’ I asked, star­tled. ‘No, not yet,’ he an­swered, with great com­po­sure. Then, al­lud­ing with a toss of the head to the tu­mult in the sta­tion-yard, ‘When one has got to make cor­rect en­tries, one comes to hate those sav­ages—hate them to the death.’ He re­mained thought­ful for a mo­ment. ‘When you see Mr. Kurtz,’ he went on, ‘tell him from me that ev­ery­thing here’—he glanced at the deck—‘is very sat­is­fac­tory. I don’t like to write to him—with those mes­sen­gers of ours you never know who may get hold of your let­ter—at that Cen­tral Sta­tion.’ He stared at me for a mo­ment with his mild, bulging eyes. ‘Oh, he will go far, very far,’ he be­gan again. ‘He will be a some­body in the Ad­min­is­tra­tion be­fore long. They, above—the Coun­cil in Europe, you know—mean him to be.’

“He turned to his work. The noise out­side had ceased, and presently in go­ing out I stopped at the door. In the steady buzz of flies the home­ward-bound agent was ly­ing fin­ished and in­sen­si­ble; the other, bent over his books, was mak­ing cor­rect en­tries of per­fectly cor­rect trans­ac­tions; and fifty feet be­low the doorstep I could see the still tree­tops of the grove of death.

“Next day I left that sta­tion at last, with a car­a­van of sixty men, for a two-hun­dred-mile tramp.

“No use telling you much about that. Paths, paths, ev­ery­where; a stamped-in net­work of paths spread­ing over the empty land, through the long grass, through burnt grass, through thick­ets, down and up chilly ravines, up and down stony hills ablaze with heat; and a soli­tude, a soli­tude, no­body, not a hut. The pop­u­la­tion had cleared out a long time ago. Well, if a lot of mys­te­ri­ous nig­gers armed with all kinds of fear­ful weapons sud­denly took to trav­el­ling on the road be­tween Deal and Gravesend, catch­ing the yokels right and left to carry heavy loads for them, I fancy ev­ery farm and cot­tage there­abouts would get empty very soon. Only here the dwellings were gone, too. Still I passed through sev­eral aban­doned vil­lages. There’s some­thing pa­thet­i­cally child­ish in the ru­ins of grass walls. Day af­ter day, with the stamp and shuf­fle of sixty pair of bare feet be­hind me, each pair un­der a 60-lb. load. Camp, cook, sleep, strike camp, march. Now and then a car­rier dead in har­ness, at rest in the long grass near the path, with an empty wa­ter-gourd and his long staff ly­ing by his side. A great si­lence around and above. Per­haps on some quiet night the tremor of far-off drums, sink­ing, swelling, a tremor vast, faint; a sound weird, ap­peal­ing, sug­ges­tive, and wild—and per­haps with as pro­found a mean­ing as the sound of bells in a Chris­tian coun­try. Once a white man in an un­but­toned uni­form, camp­ing on the path with an armed es­cort of lank Zanz­ibaris, very hos­pitable and fes­tive—not to say drunk. Was look­ing af­ter the up­keep of the road, he de­clared. Can’t say I saw any road or any up­keep, un­less the body of a mid­dle-aged ne­gro, with a bul­let-hole in the fore­head, upon which I ab­so­lutely stum­bled three miles far­ther on, may be con­sid­ered as a per­ma­nent im­prove­ment. I had a white com­pan­ion, too, not a bad chap, but rather too fleshy and with the ex­as­per­at­ing habit of faint­ing on the hot hill­sides, miles away from the least bit of shade and wa­ter. An­noy­ing, you know, to hold your own coat like a para­sol over a man’s head while he is com­ing to. I couldn’t help ask­ing him once what he meant by com­ing there at all. ‘To make money, of course. What do you think?’ he said, scorn­fully. Then he got fever, and had to be car­ried in a ham­mock slung un­der a pole. As he weighed six­teen stone I had no end of rows with the car­ri­ers. They jibbed, ran away, sneaked off with their loads in the night—quite a mutiny. So, one evening, I made a speech in English with ges­tures, not one of which was lost to the sixty pairs of eyes be­fore me, and the next morn­ing I started the ham­mock off in front all right. An hour af­ter­wards I came upon the whole con­cern wrecked in a bush—man, ham­mock, groans, blan­kets, hor­rors. The heavy pole had skinned his poor nose. He was very anx­ious for me to kill some­body, but there wasn’t the shadow of a car­rier near. I re­mem­bered the old doc­tor—‘It would be in­ter­est­ing for sci­ence to watch the men­tal changes of in­di­vid­u­als, on the spot.’ I felt I was be­com­ing sci­en­tif­i­cally in­ter­est­ing. How­ever, all that is to no pur­pose. On the fif­teenth day I came in sight of the big river again, and hob­bled into the Cen­tral Sta­tion. It was on a back wa­ter sur­rounded by scrub and for­est, with a pretty bor­der of smelly mud on one side, and on the three oth­ers en­closed by a crazy fence of rushes. A ne­glected gap was all the gate it had, and the first glance at the place was enough to let you see the flabby devil was run­ning that show. White men with long staves in their hands ap­peared lan­guidly from amongst the build­ings, strolling up to take a look at me, and then re­tired out of sight some­where. One of them, a stout, ex­citable chap with black mous­taches, in­formed me with great vol­u­bil­ity and many di­gres­sions, as soon as I told him who I was, that my steamer was at the bot­tom of the river. I was thun­der­struck. What, how, why? Oh, it was ‘all right.’ The ‘man­ager him­self’ was there. All quite cor­rect. ‘Every­body had be­haved splen­didly! splen­didly!’—‘you must,’ he said in ag­i­ta­tion, ‘go and see the gen­eral man­ager at once. He is wait­ing!’

“I did not see the real sig­nif­i­cance of that wreck at once. I fancy I see it now, but I am not sure—not at all. Cer­tainly the af­fair was too stupid—when I think of it—to be al­to­gether nat­u­ral. Still … But at the mo­ment it pre­sented it­self sim­ply as a con­founded nui­sance. The steamer was sunk. They had started two days be­fore in a sud­den hurry up the river with the man­ager on board, in charge of some vol­un­teer skip­per, and be­fore they had been out three hours they tore the bot­tom out of her on stones, and she sank near the south bank. I asked my­self what I was to do there, now my boat was lost. As a mat­ter of fact, I had plenty to do in fish­ing my com­mand out of the river. I had to set about it the very next day. That, and the re­pairs when I brought the pieces to the sta­tion, took some months.

“My first in­ter­view with the man­ager was cu­ri­ous. He did not ask me to sit down af­ter my twenty-mile walk that morn­ing. He was com­mon­place in com­plex­ion, in fea­tures, in man­ners, and in voice. He was of mid­dle size and of or­di­nary build. His eyes, of the usual blue, were per­haps re­mark­ably cold, and he cer­tainly could make his glance fall on one as tren­chant and heavy as an axe. But even at these times the rest of his per­son seemed to dis­claim the in­ten­tion. Other­wise there was only an in­de­fin­able, faint ex­pres­sion of his lips, some­thing stealthy—a smile—not a smile—I re­mem­ber it, but I can’t ex­plain. It was un­con­scious, this smile was, though just af­ter he had said some­thing it got in­ten­si­fied for an in­stant. It came at the end of his speeches like a seal ap­plied on the words to make the mean­ing of the com­mon­est phrase ap­pear ab­so­lutely in­scrutable. He was a com­mon trader, from his youth up em­ployed in these parts—noth­ing more. He was obeyed, yet he in­spired nei­ther love nor fear, nor even re­spect. He in­spired un­easi­ness. That was it! Uneasi­ness. Not a def­i­nite mis­trust—just un­easi­ness—noth­ing more. You have no idea how ef­fec­tive such a … a … fac­ulty can be. He had no ge­nius for or­ga­niz­ing, for ini­tia­tive, or for or­der even. That was ev­i­dent in such things as the de­plorable state of the sta­tion. He had no learn­ing, and no in­tel­li­gence. His po­si­tion had come to him—why? Per­haps be­cause he was never ill … He had served three terms of three years out there … Be­cause tri­umphant health in the gen­eral rout of con­sti­tu­tions is a kind of power in it­self. When he went home on leave he ri­oted on a large scale—pompously. Jack ashore—with a dif­fer­ence—in ex­ter­nals only. This one could gather from his ca­sual talk. He orig­i­nated noth­ing, he could keep the rou­tine go­ing—that’s all. But he was great. He was great by this lit­tle thing that it was im­pos­si­ble to tell what could con­trol such a man. He never gave that se­cret away. Per­haps there was noth­ing within him. Such a sus­pi­cion made one pause—for out there there were no ex­ter­nal checks. Once when var­i­ous trop­i­cal dis­eases had laid low al­most ev­ery ‘agent’ in the sta­tion, he was heard to say, ‘Men who come out here should have no en­trails.’ He sealed the ut­ter­ance with that smile of his, as though it had been a door open­ing into a dark­ness he had in his keep­ing. You fan­cied you had seen things—but the seal was on. When an­noyed at meal­times by the con­stant quar­rels of the white men about prece­dence, he or­dered an im­mense round ta­ble to be made, for which a spe­cial house had to be built. This was the sta­tion’s mess­room. Where he sat was the first place—the rest were nowhere. One felt this to be his un­al­ter­able con­vic­tion. He was nei­ther civil nor un­civil. He was quiet. He al­lowed his ‘boy’—an overfed young ne­gro from the coast—to treat the white men, un­der his very eyes, with pro­vok­ing in­so­lence.

“He be­gan to speak as soon as he saw me. I had been very long on the road. He could not wait. Had to start with­out me. The up­river sta­tions had to be re­lieved. There had been so many de­lays al­ready that he did not know who was dead and who was alive, and how they got on—and so on, and so on. He paid no at­ten­tion to my ex­pla­na­tions, and, play­ing with a stick of seal­ing-wax, re­peated sev­eral times that the sit­u­a­tion was ‘very grave, very grave.’ There were ru­mours that a very im­por­tant sta­tion was in jeop­ardy, and its chief, Mr. Kurtz, was ill. Hoped it was not true. Mr. Kurtz was … I felt weary and ir­ri­ta­ble. Hang Kurtz, I thought. I in­ter­rupted him by say­ing I had heard of Mr. Kurtz on the coast. ‘Ah! So they talk of him down there,’ he mur­mured to him­self. Then he be­gan again, as­sur­ing me Mr. Kurtz was the best agent he had, an ex­cep­tional man, of the great­est im­por­tance to the Com­pany; there­fore I could un­der­stand his anx­i­ety. He was, he said, ‘very, very un­easy.’ Cer­tainly he fid­geted on his chair a good deal, ex­claimed, ‘Ah, Mr. Kurtz!’ broke the stick of seal­ing-wax and seemed dum­founded by the ac­ci­dent. Next thing he wanted to know ‘how long it would take to’ … I in­ter­rupted him again. Be­ing hun­gry, you know, and kept on my feet too. I was get­ting sav­age. ‘How can I tell?’ I said. ‘I haven’t even seen the wreck yet—some months, no doubt.’ All this talk seemed to me so fu­tile. ‘Some months,’ he said. ‘Well, let us say three months be­fore we can make a start. Yes. That ought to do the af­fair.’ I flung out of his hut (he lived all alone in a clay hut with a sort of ve­ran­dah) mut­ter­ing to my­self my opin­ion of him. He was a chat­ter­ing id­iot. After­wards I took it back when it was borne in upon me star­tlingly with what ex­treme nicety he had es­ti­mated the time req­ui­site for the ‘af­fair.’

“I went to work the next day, turn­ing, so to speak, my back on that sta­tion. In that way only it seemed to me I could keep my hold on the re­deem­ing facts of life. Still, one must look about some­times; and then I saw this sta­tion, these men strolling aim­lessly about in the sun­shine of the yard. I asked my­self some­times what it all meant. They wan­dered here and there with their ab­surd long staves in their hands, like a lot of faith­less pil­grims be­witched in­side a rot­ten fence. The word ‘ivory’ rang in the air, was whis­pered, was sighed. You would think they were pray­ing to it. A taint of im­be­cile ra­pac­ity blew through it all, like a whiff from some corpse. By Jove! I’ve never seen any­thing so un­real in my life. And out­side, the silent wilder­ness sur­round­ing this cleared speck on the earth struck me as some­thing great and in­vin­ci­ble, like evil or truth, wait­ing pa­tiently for the pass­ing away of this fan­tas­tic in­va­sion.

“Oh, these months! Well, never mind. Var­i­ous things hap­pened. One evening a grass shed full of cal­ico, cot­ton prints, beads, and I don’t know what else, burst into a blaze so sud­denly that you would have thought the earth had opened to let an aveng­ing fire con­sume all that trash. I was smok­ing my pipe qui­etly by my dis­man­tled steamer, and saw them all cut­ting ca­pers in the light, with their arms lifted high, when the stout man with mous­taches came tear­ing down to the river, a tin pail in his hand, as­sured me that ev­ery­body was ‘be­hav­ing splen­didly, splen­didly,’ dipped about a quart of wa­ter and tore back again. I no­ticed there was a hole in the bot­tom of his pail.

“I strolled up. There was no hurry. You see the thing had gone off like a box of matches. It had been hope­less from the very first. The flame had leaped high, driven ev­ery­body back, lighted up ev­ery­thing—and col­lapsed. The shed was al­ready a heap of em­bers glow­ing fiercely. A nig­ger was be­ing beaten near by. They said he had caused the fire in some way; be that as it may, he was screech­ing most hor­ri­bly. I saw him, later, for sev­eral days, sit­ting in a bit of shade look­ing very sick and try­ing to re­cover him­self; af­ter­wards he arose and went out—and the wilder­ness with­out a sound took him into its bo­som again. As I ap­proached the glow from the dark I found my­self at the back of two men, talk­ing. I heard the name of Kurtz pro­nounced, then the words, ‘take ad­van­tage of this un­for­tu­nate ac­ci­dent.’ One of the men was the man­ager. I wished him a good evening. ‘Did you ever see any­thing like it—eh? it is in­cred­i­ble,’ he said, and walked off. The other man re­mained. He was a first-class agent, young, gen­tle­manly, a bit re­served, with a forked lit­tle beard and a hooked nose. He was stand­off­ish with the other agents, and they on their side said he was the man­ager’s spy upon them. As to me, I had hardly ever spo­ken to him be­fore. We got into talk, and by and by we strolled away from the hiss­ing ru­ins. Then he asked me to his room, which was in the main build­ing of the sta­tion. He struck a match, and I per­ceived that this young aris­to­crat had not only a sil­ver-mounted dress­ing-case but also a whole can­dle all to him­self. Just at that time the man­ager was the only man sup­posed to have any right to can­dles. Na­tive mats cov­ered the clay walls; a col­lec­tion of spears, as­segais, shields, knives was hung up in tro­phies. The busi­ness en­trusted to this fel­low was the mak­ing of bricks—so I had been in­formed; but there wasn’t a frag­ment of a brick any­where in the sta­tion, and he had been there more than a year—wait­ing. It seems he could not make bricks with­out some­thing, I don’t know what—straw maybe. Any­way, it could not be found there and as it was not likely to be sent from Europe, it did not ap­pear clear to me what he was wait­ing for. An act of spe­cial cre­ation per­haps. How­ever, they were all wait­ing—all the six­teen or twenty pil­grims of them—for some­thing; and upon my word it did not seem an un­con­ge­nial oc­cu­pa­tion, from the way they took it, though the only thing that ever came to them was dis­ease—as far as I could see. They be­guiled the time by back­bit­ing and in­trigu­ing against each other in a fool­ish kind of way. There was an air of plot­ting about that sta­tion, but noth­ing came of it, of course. It was as un­real as ev­ery­thing else—as the phil­an­thropic pre­tence of the whole con­cern, as their talk, as their gov­ern­ment, as their show of work. The only real feel­ing was a de­sire to get ap­pointed to a trad­ing-post where ivory was to be had, so that they could earn per­cent­ages. They in­trigued and slan­dered and hated each other only on that ac­count—but as to ef­fec­tu­ally lift­ing a lit­tle fin­ger—oh, no. By heav­ens! there is some­thing af­ter all in the world al­low­ing one man to steal a horse while an­other must not look at a hal­ter. Steal a horse straight out. Very well. He has done it. Per­haps he can ride. But there is a way of look­ing at a hal­ter that would pro­voke the most char­i­ta­ble of saints into a kick.

“I had no idea why he wanted to be so­cia­ble, but as we chat­ted in there it sud­denly oc­curred to me the fel­low was try­ing to get at some­thing—in fact, pump­ing me. He al­luded con­stantly to Europe, to the peo­ple I was sup­posed to know there—putting lead­ing ques­tions as to my ac­quain­tances in the sepul­chral city, and so on. His lit­tle eyes glit­tered like mica discs—with cu­rios­ity—though he tried to keep up a bit of su­per­cil­ious­ness. At first I was as­ton­ished, but very soon I be­came aw­fully cu­ri­ous to see what he would find out from me. I couldn’t pos­si­bly imag­ine what I had in me to make it worth his while. It was very pretty to see how he baf­fled him­self, for in truth my body was full only of chills, and my head had noth­ing in it but that wretched steam­boat busi­ness. It was ev­i­dent he took me for a per­fectly shame­less pre­var­i­ca­tor. At last he got an­gry, and, to con­ceal a move­ment of fu­ri­ous an­noy­ance, he yawned. I rose. Then I no­ticed a small sketch in oils, on a panel, rep­re­sent­ing a woman, draped and blind­folded, car­ry­ing a lighted torch. The back­ground was som­bre—al­most black. The move­ment of the woman was stately, and the ef­fect of the torch­light on the face was sin­is­ter.

“It ar­rested me, and he stood by civilly, hold­ing an empty half-pint cham­pagne bot­tle (med­i­cal com­forts) with the can­dle stuck in it. To my ques­tion he said Mr. Kurtz had painted this—in this very sta­tion more than a year ago—while wait­ing for means to go to his trad­ing post. ‘Tell me, pray,’ said I, ‘who is this Mr. Kurtz?’

“ ‘The chief of the In­ner Sta­tion,’ he an­swered in a short tone, look­ing away. ‘Much obliged,’ I said, laugh­ing. ‘And you are the brick­maker of the Cen­tral Sta­tion. Every­one knows that.’ He was silent for a while. ‘He is a prodigy,’ he said at last. ‘He is an emis­sary of pity and sci­ence and progress, and devil knows what else. We want,’ he be­gan to de­claim sud­denly, ‘for the guid­ance of the cause en­trusted to us by Europe, so to speak, higher in­tel­li­gence, wide sym­pa­thies, a sin­gle­ness of pur­pose.’ ‘Who says that?’ I asked. ‘Lots of them,’ he replied. ‘Some even write that; and so he comes here, a spe­cial be­ing, as you ought to know.’ ‘Why ought I to know?’ I in­ter­rupted, re­ally sur­prised. He paid no at­ten­tion. ‘Yes. To­day he is chief of the best sta­tion, next year he will be as­sis­tant-man­ager, two years more and … but I dare­say you know what he will be in two years’ time. You are of the new gang—the gang of virtue. The same peo­ple who sent him spe­cially also rec­om­mended you. Oh, don’t say no. I’ve my own eyes to trust.’ Light dawned upon me. My dear aunt’s in­flu­en­tial ac­quain­tances were pro­duc­ing an un­ex­pected ef­fect upon that young man. I nearly burst into a laugh. ‘Do you read the Com­pany’s con­fi­den­tial cor­re­spon­dence?’ I asked. He hadn’t a word to say. It was great fun. ‘When Mr. Kurtz,’ I con­tin­ued, se­verely, ‘is Gen­eral Man­ager, you won’t have the op­por­tu­nity.’

“He blew the can­dle out sud­denly, and we went out­side. The moon had risen. Black fig­ures strolled about list­lessly, pour­ing wa­ter on the glow, whence pro­ceeded a sound of hiss­ing; steam as­cended in the moon­light, the beaten nig­ger groaned some­where. ‘What a row the brute makes!’ said the in­de­fati­ga­ble man with the mous­taches, ap­pear­ing near us. ‘Serve him right. Trans­gres­sion—pun­ish­ment—bang! Pi­ti­less, piti­less. That’s the only way. This will pre­vent all con­fla­gra­tions for the fu­ture. I was just telling the man­ager …’ He no­ticed my com­pan­ion, and be­came crest­fallen all at once. ‘Not in bed yet,’ he said, with a kind of servile hearti­ness; ‘it’s so nat­u­ral. Ha! Danger—ag­i­ta­tion.’ He van­ished. I went on to the river­side, and the other fol­lowed me. I heard a scathing mur­mur at my ear, ‘Heap of muffs—go to.’ The pil­grims could be seen in knots ges­tic­u­lat­ing, dis­cussing. Sev­eral had still their staves in their hands. I ver­ily be­lieve they took these sticks to bed with them. Beyond the fence the for­est stood up spec­trally in the moon­light, and through that dim stir, through the faint sounds of that lam­en­ta­ble court­yard, the si­lence of the land went home to one’s very heart—its mys­tery, its great­ness, the amaz­ing re­al­ity of its con­cealed life. The hurt nig­ger moaned fee­bly some­where near by, and then fetched a deep sigh that made me mend my pace away from there. I felt a hand in­tro­duc­ing it­self un­der my arm. ‘My dear sir,’ said the fel­low, ‘I don’t want to be mis­un­der­stood, and es­pe­cially by you, who will see Mr. Kurtz long be­fore I can have that plea­sure. I wouldn’t like him to get a false idea of my dis­po­si­tion. …’

“I let him run on, this pa­pier-mâché Mephistophe­les, and it seemed to me that if I tried I could poke my fore­fin­ger through him, and would find noth­ing in­side but a lit­tle loose dirt, maybe. He, don’t you see, had been plan­ning to be as­sis­tant-man­ager by and by un­der the present man, and I could see that the com­ing of that Kurtz had up­set them both not a lit­tle. He talked pre­cip­i­tately, and I did not try to stop him. I had my shoul­ders against the wreck of my steamer, hauled up on the slope like a car­cass of some big river an­i­mal. The smell of mud, of primeval mud, by Jove! was in my nos­trils, the high still­ness of primeval for­est was be­fore my eyes; there were shiny patches on the black creek. The moon had spread over ev­ery­thing a thin layer of sil­ver—over the rank grass, over the mud, upon the wall of mat­ted veg­e­ta­tion stand­ing higher than the wall of a tem­ple, over the great river I could see through a som­bre gap glit­ter­ing, glit­ter­ing, as it flowed broadly by with­out a mur­mur. All this was great, ex­pec­tant, mute, while the man jab­bered about him­self. I won­dered whether the still­ness on the face of the im­men­sity look­ing at us two were meant as an ap­peal or as a men­ace. What were we who had strayed in here? Could we han­dle that dumb thing, or would it han­dle us? I felt how big, how con­found­edly big, was that thing that couldn’t talk, and per­haps was deaf as well. What was in there? I could see a lit­tle ivory com­ing out from there, and I had heard Mr. Kurtz was in there. I had heard enough about it, too—God knows! Yet some­how it didn’t bring any im­age with it—no more than if I had been told an an­gel or a fiend was in there. I be­lieved it in the same way one of you might be­lieve there are in­hab­i­tants in the planet Mars. I knew once a Scotch sail­maker who was cer­tain, dead sure, there were peo­ple in Mars. If you asked him for some idea how they looked and be­haved, he would get shy and mut­ter some­thing about ‘walk­ing on all-fours.’ If you as much as smiled, he would—though a man of sixty—of­fer to fight you. I would not have gone so far as to fight for Kurtz, but I went for him near enough to a lie. You know I hate, de­test, and can’t bear a lie, not be­cause I am straighter than the rest of us, but sim­ply be­cause it ap­palls me. There is a taint of death, a flavour of mor­tal­ity in lies—which is ex­actly what I hate and de­test in the world—what I want to for­get. It makes me mis­er­able and sick, like bit­ing some­thing rot­ten would do. Tem­per­a­ment, I sup­pose. Well, I went near enough to it by let­ting the young fool there be­lieve any­thing he liked to imag­ine as to my in­flu­ence in Europe. I be­came in an in­stant as much of a pre­tence as the rest of the be­witched pil­grims. This sim­ply be­cause I had a no­tion it some­how would be of help to that Kurtz whom at the time I did not see—you un­der­stand. He was just a word for me. I did not see the man in the name any more than you do. Do you see him? Do you see the story? Do you see any­thing? It seems to me I am try­ing to tell you a dream—mak­ing a vain at­tempt, be­cause no re­la­tion of a dream can con­vey the dream-sen­sa­tion, that com­min­gling of ab­sur­dity, sur­prise, and be­wil­der­ment in a tremor of strug­gling re­volt, that no­tion of be­ing cap­tured by the in­cred­i­ble which is of the very essence of dreams. …”

He was silent for a while.

“… No, it is im­pos­si­ble; it is im­pos­si­ble to con­vey the life-sen­sa­tion of any given epoch of one’s ex­is­tence—that which makes its truth, its mean­ing—its sub­tle and pen­e­trat­ing essence. It is im­pos­si­ble. We live, as we dream—alone. …”

He paused again as if re­flect­ing, then added:

“Of course in this you fel­lows see more than I could then. You see me, whom you know. …”

It had be­come so pitch dark that we lis­ten­ers could hardly see one an­other. For a long time al­ready he, sit­ting apart, had been no more to us than a voice. There was not a word from any­body. The oth­ers might have been asleep, but I was awake. I lis­tened, I lis­tened on the watch for the sen­tence, for the word, that would give me the clue to the faint un­easi­ness in­spired by this nar­ra­tive that seemed to shape it­self with­out hu­man lips in the heavy night-air of the river.

“… Yes—I let him run on,” Mar­low be­gan again, “and think what he pleased about the pow­ers that were be­hind me. I did! And there was noth­ing be­hind me! There was noth­ing but that wretched, old, man­gled steam­boat I was lean­ing against, while he talked flu­ently about ‘the ne­ces­sity for ev­ery man to get on.’ ‘And when one comes out here, you con­ceive, it is not to gaze at the moon.’ Mr. Kurtz was a ‘uni­ver­sal ge­nius,’ but even a ge­nius would find it eas­ier to work with ‘ad­e­quate tools—in­tel­li­gent men.’ He did not make bricks—why, there was a phys­i­cal im­pos­si­bil­ity in the way—as I was well aware; and if he did sec­re­tar­ial work for the man­ager, it was be­cause ‘no sen­si­ble man re­jects wan­tonly the con­fi­dence of his su­pe­ri­ors.’ Did I see it? I saw it. What more did I want? What I re­ally wanted was riv­ets, by heaven! Rivets. To get on with the work—to stop the hole. Rivets I wanted. There were cases of them down at the coast—cases—piled up—burst—split! You kicked a loose rivet at ev­ery sec­ond step in that sta­tion-yard on the hill­side. Rivets had rolled into the grove of death. You could fill your pock­ets with riv­ets for the trou­ble of stoop­ing down—and there wasn’t one rivet to be found where it was wanted. We had plates that would do, but noth­ing to fas­ten them with. And ev­ery week the mes­sen­ger, a long ne­gro, let­ter-bag on shoul­der and staff in hand, left our sta­tion for the coast. And sev­eral times a week a coast car­a­van came in with trade goods—ghastly glazed cal­ico that made you shud­der only to look at it, glass beads value about a penny a quart, con­founded spot­ted cot­ton hand­ker­chiefs. And no riv­ets. Three car­ri­ers could have brought all that was wanted to set that steam­boat afloat.

“He was be­com­ing con­fi­den­tial now, but I fancy my un­re­spon­sive at­ti­tude must have ex­as­per­ated him at last, for he judged it nec­es­sary to in­form me he feared nei­ther God nor devil, let alone any mere man. I said I could see that very well, but what I wanted was a cer­tain quan­tity of riv­ets—and riv­ets were what re­ally Mr. Kurtz wanted, if he had only known it. Now let­ters went to the coast ev­ery week. … ‘My dear sir,’ he cried, ‘I write from dic­ta­tion.’ I de­manded riv­ets. There was a way—for an in­tel­li­gent man. He changed his man­ner; be­came very cold, and sud­denly be­gan to talk about a hip­popota­mus; won­dered whether sleep­ing on board the steamer (I stuck to my sal­vage night and day) I wasn’t dis­turbed. There was an old hippo that had the bad habit of get­ting out on the bank and roam­ing at night over the sta­tion grounds. The pil­grims used to turn out in a body and empty ev­ery ri­fle they could lay hands on at him. Some even had sat up o’ nights for him. All this en­ergy was wasted, though. ‘That an­i­mal has a charmed life,’ he said; ‘but you can say this only of brutes in this coun­try. No man—you ap­pre­hend me?—no man here bears a charmed life.’ He stood there for a mo­ment in the moon­light with his del­i­cate hooked nose set a lit­tle askew, and his mica eyes glit­ter­ing with­out a wink, then, with a curt Good­night, he strode off. I could see he was dis­turbed and con­sid­er­ably puz­zled, which made me feel more hope­ful than I had been for days. It was a great com­fort to turn from that chap to my in­flu­en­tial friend, the bat­tered, twisted, ru­ined, tin­pot steam­boat. I clam­bered on board. She rang un­der my feet like an empty Hunt­ley & Palmer bis­cuit-tin kicked along a gut­ter; she was noth­ing so solid in make, and rather less pretty in shape, but I had ex­pended enough hard work on her to make me love her. No in­flu­en­tial friend would have served me bet­ter. She had given me a chance to come out a bit—to find out what I could do. No, I don’t like work. I had rather laze about and think of all the fine things that can be done. I don’t like work—no man does—but I like what is in the work—the chance to find your­self. Your own re­al­ity—for your­self, not for oth­ers—what no other man can ever know. They can only see the mere show, and never can tell what it re­ally means.

“I was not sur­prised to see some­body sit­ting aft, on the deck, with his legs dan­gling over the mud. You see I rather chummed with the few me­chan­ics there were in that sta­tion, whom the other pil­grims nat­u­rally de­spised—on ac­count of their im­per­fect man­ners, I sup­pose. This was the fore­man—a boil­er­maker by trade—a good worker. He was a lank, bony, yel­low-faced man, with big in­tense eyes. His as­pect was wor­ried, and his head was as bald as the palm of my hand; but his hair in fall­ing seemed to have stuck to his chin, and had pros­pered in the new lo­cal­ity, for his beard hung down to his waist. He was a wid­ower with six young chil­dren (he had left them in charge of a sis­ter of his to come out there), and the pas­sion of his life was pi­geon-fly­ing. He was an en­thu­si­ast and a con­nois­seur. He would rave about pi­geons. After work hours he used some­times to come over from his hut for a talk about his chil­dren and his pi­geons; at work, when he had to crawl in the mud un­der the bot­tom of the steam­boat, he would tie up that beard of his in a kind of white servi­ette he brought for the pur­pose. It had loops to go over his ears. In the evening he could be seen squat­ted on the bank rins­ing that wrap­per in the creek with great care, then spread­ing it solemnly on a bush to dry.

“I slapped him on the back and shouted, ‘We shall have riv­ets!’ He scram­bled to his feet ex­claim­ing, ‘No! Rivets!’ as though he couldn’t be­lieve his ears. Then in a low voice, ‘You … eh?’ I don’t know why we be­haved like lu­natics. I put my fin­ger to the side of my nose and nod­ded mys­te­ri­ously. ‘Good for you!’ he cried, snapped his fin­gers above his head, lift­ing one foot. I tried a jig. We ca­pered on the iron deck. A fright­ful clat­ter came out of that hulk, and the vir­gin for­est on the other bank of the creek sent it back in a thun­der­ing roll upon the sleep­ing sta­tion. It must have made some of the pil­grims sit up in their hov­els. A dark fig­ure ob­scured the lighted door­way of the man­ager’s hut, van­ished, then, a sec­ond or so af­ter, the door­way it­self van­ished, too. We stopped, and the si­lence driven away by the stamp­ing of our feet flowed back again from the re­cesses of the land. The great wall of veg­e­ta­tion, an ex­u­ber­ant and en­tan­gled mass of trunks, branches, leaves, boughs, fes­toons, mo­tion­less in the moon­light, was like a ri­ot­ing in­va­sion of sound­less life, a rolling wave of plants, piled up, crested, ready to top­ple over the creek, to sweep ev­ery lit­tle man of us out of his lit­tle ex­is­tence. And it moved not. A dead­ened burst of mighty splashes and snorts reached us from afar, as though an ic­thyosaurus had been tak­ing a bath of glit­ter in the great river. ‘After all,’ said the boil­er­maker in a rea­son­able tone, ‘why shouldn’t we get the riv­ets?’ Why not, in­deed! I did not know of any rea­son why we shouldn’t. ‘They’ll come in three weeks,’ I said con­fi­dently.

“But they didn’t. In­stead of riv­ets there came an in­va­sion, an in­flic­tion, a vis­i­ta­tion. It came in sec­tions dur­ing the next three weeks, each sec­tion headed by a don­key car­ry­ing a white man in new clothes and tan shoes, bow­ing from that el­e­va­tion right and left to the im­pressed pil­grims. A quar­rel­some band of foot­sore sulky nig­gers trod on the heels of the don­key; a lot of tents, camp­stools, tin boxes, white cases, brown bales would be shot down in the court­yard, and the air of mys­tery would deepen a lit­tle over the mud­dle of the sta­tion. Five such in­stal­ments came, with their ab­surd air of dis­or­derly flight with the loot of in­nu­mer­able out­fit shops and pro­vi­sion stores, that, one would think, they were lug­ging, af­ter a raid, into the wilder­ness for eq­ui­table di­vi­sion. It was an in­ex­tri­ca­ble mess of things de­cent in them­selves but that hu­man folly made look like the spoils of thiev­ing.

“This de­voted band called it­self the El­do­rado Ex­plor­ing Ex­pe­di­tion, and I be­lieve they were sworn to se­crecy. Their talk, how­ever, was the talk of sor­did buc­ca­neers: it was reck­less with­out hardi­hood, greedy with­out au­dac­ity, and cruel with­out courage; there was not an atom of fore­sight or of se­ri­ous in­ten­tion in the whole batch of them, and they did not seem aware these things are wanted for the work of the world. To tear trea­sure out of the bow­els of the land was their de­sire, with no more moral pur­pose at the back of it than there is in bur­glars break­ing into a safe. Who paid the ex­penses of the no­ble en­ter­prise I don’t know; but the un­cle of our man­ager was leader of that lot.

“In ex­te­rior he re­sem­bled a butcher in a poor neigh­bour­hood, and his eyes had a look of sleepy cun­ning. He car­ried his fat paunch with os­ten­ta­tion on his short legs, and dur­ing the time his gang in­fested the sta­tion spoke to no one but his nephew. You could see these two roam­ing about all day long with their heads close to­gether in an ev­er­last­ing con­fab.

“I had given up wor­ry­ing my­self about the riv­ets. One’s ca­pac­ity for that kind of folly is more lim­ited than you would sup­pose. I said Hang!—and let things slide. I had plenty of time for med­i­ta­tion, and now and then I would give some thought to Kurtz. I wasn’t very in­ter­ested in him. No. Still, I was cu­ri­ous to see whether this man, who had come out equipped with moral ideas of some sort, would climb to the top af­ter all and how he would set about his work when there.”





II


“One evening as I was ly­ing flat on the deck of my steam­boat, I heard voices ap­proach­ing—and there were the nephew and the un­cle strolling along the bank. I laid my head on my arm again, and had nearly lost my­self in a doze, when some­body said in my ear, as it were: ‘I am as harm­less as a lit­tle child, but I don’t like to be dic­tated to. Am I the man­ager—or am I not? I was or­dered to send him there. It’s in­cred­i­ble.’ … I be­came aware that the two were stand­ing on the shore along­side the forepart of the steam­boat, just be­low my head. I did not move; it did not oc­cur to me to move: I was sleepy. ‘It is un­pleas­ant,’ grunted the un­cle. ‘He has asked the Ad­min­is­tra­tion to be sent there,’ said the other, ‘with the idea of show­ing what he could do; and I was in­structed ac­cord­ingly. Look at the in­flu­ence that man must have. Is it not fright­ful?’ They both agreed it was fright­ful, then made sev­eral bizarre re­marks: ‘Make rain and fine weather—one man—the Coun­cil—by the nose’—bits of ab­surd sen­tences that got the bet­ter of my drowsi­ness, so that I had pretty near the whole of my wits about me when the un­cle said, ‘The cli­mate may do away with this dif­fi­culty for you. Is he alone there?’ ‘Yes,’ an­swered the man­ager; ‘he sent his as­sis­tant down the river with a note to me in these terms: “Clear this poor devil out of the coun­try, and don’t bother send­ing more of that sort. I had rather be alone than have the kind of men you can dis­pose of with me.” It was more than a year ago. Can you imag­ine such im­pu­dence!’ ‘Any­thing since then?’ asked the other hoarsely. ‘Ivory,’ jerked the nephew; ‘lots of it—prime sort—lots—most an­noy­ing, from him.’ ‘And with that?’ ques­tioned the heavy rum­ble. ‘In­voice,’ was the re­ply fired out, so to speak. Then si­lence. They had been talk­ing about Kurtz.

“I was broad awake by this time, but, ly­ing per­fectly at ease, re­mained still, hav­ing no in­duce­ment to change my po­si­tion. ‘How did that ivory come all this way?’ growled the el­der man, who seemed very vexed. The other ex­plained that it had come with a fleet of ca­noes in charge of an English half-caste clerk Kurtz had with him; that Kurtz had ap­par­ently in­tended to re­turn him­self, the sta­tion be­ing by that time bare of goods and stores, but af­ter com­ing three hun­dred miles, had sud­denly de­cided to go back, which he started to do alone in a small dugout with four pad­dlers, leav­ing the half-caste to con­tinue down the river with the ivory. The two fel­lows there seemed as­tounded at any­body at­tempt­ing such a thing. They were at a loss for an ad­e­quate mo­tive. As to me, I seemed to see Kurtz for the first time. It was a dis­tinct glimpse: the dugout, four pad­dling sav­ages, and the lone white man turn­ing his back sud­denly on the head­quar­ters, on re­lief, on thoughts of home—per­haps; set­ting his face to­wards the depths of the wilder­ness, to­wards his empty and des­o­late sta­tion. I did not know the mo­tive. Per­haps he was just sim­ply a fine fel­low who stuck to his work for its own sake. His name, you un­der­stand, had not been pro­nounced once. He was ‘that man.’ The half-caste, who, as far as I could see, had con­ducted a dif­fi­cult trip with great pru­dence and pluck, was in­vari­ably al­luded to as ‘that scoundrel.’ The ‘scoundrel’ had re­ported that the ‘man’ had been very ill—had re­cov­ered im­per­fectly. … The two be­low me moved away then a few paces, and strolled back and forth at some lit­tle dis­tance. I heard: ‘Mil­i­tary post—doc­tor—two hun­dred miles—quite alone now—un­avoid­able de­lays—nine months—no news—strange ru­mours.’ They ap­proached again, just as the man­ager was say­ing, ‘No one, as far as I know, un­less a species of wan­der­ing trader—a pesti­len­tial fel­low, snap­ping ivory from the na­tives.’ Who was it they were talk­ing about now? I gath­ered in snatches that this was some man sup­posed to be in Kurtz’s dis­trict, and of whom the man­ager did not ap­prove. ‘We will not be free from un­fair com­pe­ti­tion till one of these fel­lows is hanged for an ex­am­ple,’ he said. ‘Cer­tainly,’ grunted the other; ‘get him hanged! Why not? Any­thing—any­thing can be done in this coun­try. That’s what I say; no­body here, you un­der­stand, here, can en­dan­ger your po­si­tion. And why? You stand the cli­mate—you out­last them all. The dan­ger is in Europe; but there be­fore I left I took care to—’ They moved off and whis­pered, then their voices rose again. ‘The ex­tra­or­di­nary se­ries of de­lays is not my fault. I did my best.’ The fat man sighed. ‘Very sad.’ ‘And the pes­tif­er­ous ab­sur­dity of his talk,’ con­tin­ued the other; ‘he both­ered me enough when he was here. “Each sta­tion should be like a bea­con on the road to­wards bet­ter things, a cen­tre for trade of course, but also for hu­man­iz­ing, im­prov­ing, in­struct­ing.” Con­ceive you—that ass! And he wants to be man­ager! No, it’s—’ Here he got choked by ex­ces­sive in­dig­na­tion, and I lifted my head the least bit. I was sur­prised to see how near they were—right un­der me. I could have spat upon their hats. They were look­ing on the ground, ab­sorbed in thought. The man­ager was switch­ing his leg with a slen­der twig: his saga­cious rel­a­tive lifted his head. ‘You have been well since you came out this time?’ he asked. The other gave a start. ‘Who? I? Oh! Like a charm—like a charm. But the rest—oh, my good­ness! All sick. They die so quick, too, that I haven’t the time to send them out of the coun­try—it’s in­cred­i­ble!’ ‘Hm’m. Just so,’ grunted the un­cle. ‘Ah! my boy, trust to this—I say, trust to this.’ I saw him ex­tend his short flip­per of an arm for a ges­ture that took in the for­est, the creek, the mud, the river—seemed to beckon with a dis­hon­our­ing flour­ish be­fore the sun­lit face of the land a treach­er­ous ap­peal to the lurk­ing death, to the hid­den evil, to the pro­found dark­ness of its heart. It was so star­tling that I leaped to my feet and looked back at the edge of the for­est, as though I had ex­pected an an­swer of some sort to that black dis­play of con­fi­dence. You know the fool­ish no­tions that come to one some­times. The high still­ness con­fronted these two fig­ures with its omi­nous pa­tience, wait­ing for the pass­ing away of a fan­tas­tic in­va­sion.

“They swore aloud to­gether—out of sheer fright, I be­lieve—then pre­tend­ing not to know any­thing of my ex­is­tence, turned back to the sta­tion. The sun was low; and lean­ing for­ward side by side, they seemed to be tug­ging painfully up­hill their two ridicu­lous shad­ows of un­equal length, that trailed be­hind them slowly over the tall grass with­out bend­ing a sin­gle blade.

“In a few days the El­do­rado Ex­pe­di­tion went into the pa­tient wilder­ness, that closed upon it as the sea closes over a diver. Long af­ter­wards the news came that all the don­keys were dead. I know noth­ing as to the fate of the less valu­able an­i­mals. They, no doubt, like the rest of us, found what they de­served. I did not in­quire. I was then rather ex­cited at the prospect of meet­ing Kurtz very soon. When I say very soon I mean it com­par­a­tively. It was just two months from the day we left the creek when we came to the bank be­low Kurtz’s sta­tion.

“Go­ing up that river was like trav­el­ing back to the ear­li­est be­gin­nings of the world, when veg­e­ta­tion ri­oted on the earth and the big trees were kings. An empty stream, a great si­lence, an im­pen­e­tra­ble for­est. The air was warm, thick, heavy, slug­gish. There was no joy in the bril­liance of sun­shine. The long stretches of the wa­ter­way ran on, de­serted, into the gloom of over­shad­owed dis­tances. On sil­very sand­banks hip­pos and al­li­ga­tors sunned them­selves side by side. The broad­en­ing wa­ters flowed through a mob of wooded is­lands; you lost your way on that river as you would in a desert, and butted all day long against shoals, try­ing to find the chan­nel, till you thought your­self be­witched and cut off for­ever from ev­ery­thing you had known once—some­where—far away—in an­other ex­is­tence per­haps. There were mo­ments when one’s past came back to one, as it will some­times when you have not a mo­ment to spare for your­self; but it came in the shape of an un­rest­ful and noisy dream, re­mem­bered with won­der amongst the over­whelm­ing re­al­i­ties of this strange world of plants, and wa­ter, and si­lence. And this still­ness of life did not in the least re­sem­ble a peace. It was the still­ness of an im­pla­ca­ble force brood­ing over an in­scrutable in­ten­tion. It looked at you with a venge­ful as­pect. I got used to it af­ter­wards; I did not see it any more; I had no time. I had to keep guess­ing at the chan­nel; I had to dis­cern, mostly by in­spi­ra­tion, the signs of hid­den banks; I watched for sunken stones; I was learn­ing to clap my teeth smartly be­fore my heart flew out, when I shaved by a fluke some in­fer­nal sly old snag that would have ripped the life out of the tin­pot steam­boat and drowned all the pil­grims; I had to keep a look­out for the signs of dead wood we could cut up in the night for next day’s steam­ing. When you have to at­tend to things of that sort, to the mere in­ci­dents of the sur­face, the re­al­ity—the re­al­ity, I tell you—fades. The in­ner truth is hid­den—luck­ily, luck­ily. But I felt it all the same; I felt of­ten its mys­te­ri­ous still­ness watch­ing me at my mon­key tricks, just as it watches you fel­lows per­form­ing on your re­spec­tive tightropes for—what is it? half-a-crown a tum­ble—”

“Try to be civil, Mar­low,” growled a voice, and I knew there was at least one lis­tener awake be­sides my­self.

“I beg your par­don. I for­got the heartache which makes up the rest of the price. And in­deed what does the price mat­ter, if the trick be well done? You do your tricks very well. And I didn’t do badly ei­ther, since I man­aged not to sink that steam­boat on my first trip. It’s a won­der to me yet. Imag­ine a blind­folded man set to drive a van over a bad road. I sweated and shiv­ered over that busi­ness con­sid­er­ably, I can tell you. After all, for a sea­man, to scrape the bot­tom of the thing that’s sup­posed to float all the time un­der his care is the un­par­don­able sin. No one may know of it, but you never for­get the thump—eh? A blow on the very heart. You re­mem­ber it, you dream of it, you wake up at night and think of it—years af­ter—and go hot and cold all over. I don’t pre­tend to say that steam­boat floated all the time. More than once she had to wade for a bit, with twenty can­ni­bals splash­ing around and push­ing. We had en­listed some of these chaps on the way for a crew. Fine fel­lows—can­ni­bals—in their place. They were men one could work with, and I am grate­ful to them. And, af­ter all, they did not eat each other be­fore my face: they had brought along a pro­vi­sion of hippo-meat which went rot­ten, and made the mys­tery of the wilder­ness stink in my nos­trils. Phoo! I can sniff it now. I had the man­ager on board and three or four pil­grims with their staves—all com­plete. Some­times we came upon a sta­tion close by the bank, cling­ing to the skirts of the un­known, and the white men rush­ing out of a tum­ble­down hovel, with great ges­tures of joy and sur­prise and wel­come, seemed very strange—had the ap­pear­ance of be­ing held there cap­tive by a spell. The word ivory would ring in the air for a while—and on we went again into the si­lence, along empty reaches, round the still bends, be­tween the high walls of our wind­ing way, re­ver­ber­at­ing in hol­low claps the pon­der­ous beat of the stern-wheel. Trees, trees, mil­lions of trees, mas­sive, im­mense, run­ning up high; and at their foot, hug­ging the bank against the stream, crept the lit­tle be­grimed steam­boat, like a slug­gish bee­tle crawl­ing on the floor of a lofty por­tico. It made you feel very small, very lost, and yet it was not al­to­gether de­press­ing, that feel­ing. After all, if you were small, the grimy bee­tle crawled on—which was just what you wanted it to do. Where the pil­grims imag­ined it crawled to I don’t know. To some place where they ex­pected to get some­thing. I bet! For me it crawled to­wards Kurtz—ex­clu­sively; but when the steam-pipes started leak­ing we crawled very slow. The reaches opened be­fore us and closed be­hind, as if the for­est had stepped leisurely across the wa­ter to bar the way for our re­turn. We pen­e­trated deeper and deeper into the heart of dark­ness. It was very quiet there. At night some­times the roll of drums be­hind the cur­tain of trees would run up the river and re­main sus­tained faintly, as if hov­er­ing in the air high over our heads, till the first break of day. Whether it meant war, peace, or prayer we could not tell. The dawns were her­alded by the de­scent of a chill still­ness; the wood­cut­ters slept, their fires burned low; the snap­ping of a twig would make you start. We were wan­der­ers on a pre­his­toric earth, on an earth that wore the as­pect of an un­known planet. We could have fan­cied our­selves the first of men tak­ing pos­ses­sion of an ac­cursed in­her­i­tance, to be sub­dued at the cost of pro­found an­guish and of ex­ces­sive toil. But sud­denly, as we strug­gled round a bend, there would be a glimpse of rush walls, of peaked grass-roofs, a burst of yells, a whirl of black limbs, a mass of hands clap­ping of feet stamp­ing, of bod­ies sway­ing, of eyes rolling, un­der the droop of heavy and mo­tion­less fo­liage. The steamer toiled along slowly on the edge of a black and in­com­pre­hen­si­ble frenzy. The pre­his­toric man was curs­ing us, pray­ing to us, wel­com­ing us—who could tell? We were cut off from the com­pre­hen­sion of our sur­round­ings; we glided past like phan­toms, won­der­ing and se­cretly ap­palled, as sane men would be be­fore an en­thu­si­as­tic out­break in a mad­house. We could not un­der­stand be­cause we were too far and could not re­mem­ber be­cause we were trav­el­ling in the night of first ages, of those ages that are gone, leav­ing hardly a sign—and no mem­o­ries.

“The earth seemed un­earthly. We are ac­cus­tomed to look upon the shack­led form of a con­quered mon­ster, but there—there you could look at a thing mon­strous and free. It was un­earthly, and the men were—No, they were not in­hu­man. Well, you know, that was the worst of it—this sus­pi­cion of their not be­ing in­hu­man. It would come slowly to one. They howled and leaped, and spun, and made hor­rid faces; but what thrilled you was just the thought of their hu­man­ity—like yours—the thought of your re­mote kin­ship with this wild and pas­sion­ate up­roar. Ugly. Yes, it was ugly enough; but if you were man enough you would ad­mit to your­self that there was in you just the faintest trace of a re­sponse to the ter­ri­ble frank­ness of that noise, a dim sus­pi­cion of there be­ing a mean­ing in it which you—you so re­mote from the night of first ages—could com­pre­hend. And why not? The mind of man is ca­pa­ble of any­thing—be­cause ev­ery­thing is in it, all the past as well as all the fu­ture. What was there af­ter all? Joy, fear, sor­row, de­vo­tion, val­our, rage—who can tell?—but truth—truth stripped of its cloak of time. Let the fool gape and shud­der—the man knows, and can look on with­out a wink. But he must at least be as much of a man as these on the shore. He must meet that truth with his own true stuff—with his own in­born strength. Prin­ci­ples won’t do. Ac­qui­si­tions, clothes, pretty rags—rags that would fly off at the first good shake. No; you want a de­lib­er­ate be­lief. An ap­peal to me in this fiendish row—is there? Very well; I hear; I ad­mit, but I have a voice, too, and for good or evil mine is the speech that can­not be si­lenced. Of course, a fool, what with sheer fright and fine sen­ti­ments, is al­ways safe. Who’s that grunt­ing? You won­der I didn’t go ashore for a howl and a dance? Well, no—I didn’t. Fine sen­ti­ments, you say? Fine sen­ti­ments, be hanged! I had no time. I had to mess about with white-lead and strips of woolen blan­ket help­ing to put ban­dages on those leaky steam-pipes—I tell you. I had to watch the steer­ing, and cir­cum­vent those snags, and get the tin­pot along by hook or by crook. There was sur­face-truth enough in these things to save a wiser man. And be­tween whiles I had to look af­ter the sav­age who was fire­man. He was an im­proved spec­i­men; he could fire up a ver­ti­cal boiler. He was there be­low me, and, upon my word, to look at him was as ed­i­fy­ing as see­ing a dog in a par­ody of breeches and a feather hat, walk­ing on his hind-legs. A few months of train­ing had done for that re­ally fine chap. He squinted at the steam-gauge and at the wa­ter-gauge with an ev­i­dent ef­fort of in­tre­pid­ity—and he had filed teeth, too, the poor devil, and the wool of his pate shaved into queer pat­terns, and three or­na­men­tal scars on each of his cheeks. He ought to have been clap­ping his hands and stamp­ing his feet on the bank, in­stead of which he was hard at work, a thrall to strange witch­craft, full of im­prov­ing knowl­edge. He was use­ful be­cause he had been in­structed; and what he knew was this—that should the wa­ter in that trans­par­ent thing dis­ap­pear, the evil spirit in­side the boiler would get an­gry through the great­ness of his thirst, and take a ter­ri­ble vengeance. So he sweated and fired up and watched the glass fear­fully (with an im­promptu charm, made of rags, tied to his arm, and a piece of pol­ished bone, as big as a watch, stuck flat­ways through his lower lip), while the wooded banks slipped past us slowly, the short noise was left be­hind, the in­ter­minable miles of si­lence—and we crept on, to­wards Kurtz. But the snags were thick, the wa­ter was treach­er­ous and shal­low, the boiler seemed in­deed to have a sulky devil in it, and thus nei­ther that fire­man nor I had any time to peer into our creepy thoughts.

“Some fifty miles be­low the In­ner Sta­tion we came upon a hut of reeds, an in­clined and melan­choly pole, with the un­rec­og­niz­able tat­ters of what had been a flag of some sort fly­ing from it, and a neatly stacked wood­pile. This was un­ex­pected. We came to the bank, and on the stack of fire­wood found a flat piece of board with some faded pen­cil-writ­ing on it. When de­ci­phered it said: ‘Wood for you. Hurry up. Ap­proach cau­tiously.’ There was a sig­na­ture, but it was il­leg­i­ble—not Kurtz—a much longer word. ‘Hurry up.’ Where? Up the river? ‘Ap­proach cau­tiously.’ We had not done so. But the warn­ing could not have been meant for the place where it could be only found af­ter ap­proach. Some­thing was wrong above. But what—and how much? That was the ques­tion. We com­mented ad­versely upon the im­be­cil­ity of that tele­graphic style. The bush around said noth­ing, and would not let us look very far, ei­ther. A torn cur­tain of red twill hung in the door­way of the hut, and flapped sadly in our faces. The dwelling was dis­man­tled; but we could see a white man had lived there not very long ago. There re­mained a rude ta­ble—a plank on two posts; a heap of rub­bish re­posed in a dark cor­ner, and by the door I picked up a book. It had lost its cov­ers, and the pages had been thumbed into a state of ex­tremely dirty soft­ness; but the back had been lov­ingly stitched afresh with white cot­ton thread, which looked clean yet. It was an ex­tra­or­di­nary find. Its ti­tle was, An In­quiry into some Points of Sea­man­ship, by a man Towser, Tow­son—some such name—Master in his Majesty’s Navy. The mat­ter looked dreary read­ing enough, with il­lus­tra­tive di­a­grams and re­pul­sive ta­bles of fig­ures, and the copy was sixty years old. I han­dled this amaz­ing an­tiq­uity with the great­est pos­si­ble ten­der­ness, lest it should dis­solve in my hands. Within, Tow­son or Towser was in­quir­ing earnestly into the break­ing strain of ships’ chains and tackle, and other such mat­ters. Not a very en­thralling book; but at the first glance you could see there a sin­gle­ness of in­ten­tion, an hon­est con­cern for the right way of go­ing to work, which made these hum­ble pages, thought out so many years ago, lu­mi­nous with an­other than a pro­fes­sional light. The sim­ple old sailor, with his talk of chains and pur­chases, made me for­get the jun­gle and the pil­grims in a de­li­cious sen­sa­tion of hav­ing come upon some­thing un­mis­tak­ably real. Such a book be­ing there was won­der­ful enough; but still more as­tound­ing were the notes pen­cilled in the mar­gin, and plainly re­fer­ring to the text. I couldn’t be­lieve my eyes! They were in ci­pher! Yes, it looked like ci­pher. Fancy a man lug­ging with him a book of that de­scrip­tion into this nowhere and study­ing it—and mak­ing notes—in ci­pher at that! It was an ex­trav­a­gant mys­tery.

“I had been dimly aware for some time of a wor­ry­ing noise, and when I lifted my eyes I saw the wood­pile was gone, and the man­ager, aided by all the pil­grims, was shout­ing at me from the river­side. I slipped the book into my pocket. I as­sure you to leave off read­ing was like tear­ing my­self away from the shel­ter of an old and solid friend­ship.

“I started the lame en­gine ahead. ‘It must be this mis­er­able trader—this in­truder,’ ex­claimed the man­ager, look­ing back malev­o­lently at the place we had left. ‘He must be English,’ I said. ‘It will not save him from get­ting into trou­ble if he is not care­ful,’ mut­tered the man­ager darkly. I ob­served with as­sumed in­no­cence that no man was safe from trou­ble in this world.

“The cur­rent was more rapid now, the steamer seemed at her last gasp, the stern-wheel flopped lan­guidly, and I caught my­self lis­ten­ing on tip­toe for the next beat of the boat, for in sober truth I ex­pected the wretched thing to give up ev­ery mo­ment. It was like watch­ing the last flick­ers of a life. But still we crawled. Some­times I would pick out a tree a lit­tle way ahead to mea­sure our progress to­wards Kurtz by, but I lost it in­vari­ably be­fore we got abreast. To keep the eyes so long on one thing was too much for hu­man pa­tience. The man­ager dis­played a beau­ti­ful res­ig­na­tion. I fret­ted and fumed and took to ar­gu­ing with my­self whether or no I would talk openly with Kurtz; but be­fore I could come to any con­clu­sion it oc­curred to me that my speech or my si­lence, in­deed any ac­tion of mine, would be a mere fu­til­ity. What did it mat­ter what any­one knew or ig­nored? What did it mat­ter who was man­ager? One gets some­times such a flash of in­sight. The es­sen­tials of this af­fair lay deep un­der the sur­face, be­yond my reach, and be­yond my power of med­dling.

“Towards the evening of the sec­ond day we judged our­selves about eight miles from Kurtz’s sta­tion. I wanted to push on; but the man­ager looked grave, and told me the nav­i­ga­tion up there was so dan­ger­ous that it would be ad­vis­able, the sun be­ing very low al­ready, to wait where we were till next morn­ing. More­over, he pointed out that if the warn­ing to ap­proach cau­tiously were to be fol­lowed, we must ap­proach in day­light—not at dusk or in the dark. This was sen­si­ble enough. Eight miles meant nearly three hours’ steam­ing for us, and I could also see sus­pi­cious rip­ples at the up­per end of the reach. Nev­er­the­less, I was an­noyed be­yond ex­pres­sion at the de­lay, and most un­rea­son­ably, too, since one night more could not mat­ter much af­ter so many months. As we had plenty of wood, and cau­tion was the word, I brought up in the mid­dle of the stream. The reach was nar­row, straight, with high sides like a rail­way cut­ting. The dusk came glid­ing into it long be­fore the sun had set. The cur­rent ran smooth and swift, but a dumb im­mo­bil­ity sat on the banks. The liv­ing trees, lashed to­gether by the creep­ers and ev­ery liv­ing bush of the un­der­growth, might have been changed into stone, even to the slen­der­est twig, to the light­est leaf. It was not sleep—it seemed un­nat­u­ral, like a state of trance. Not the faintest sound of any kind could be heard. You looked on amazed, and be­gan to sus­pect your­self of be­ing deaf—then the night came sud­denly, and struck you blind as well. About three in the morn­ing some large fish leaped, and the loud splash made me jump as though a gun had been fired. When the sun rose there was a white fog, very warm and clammy, and more blind­ing than the night. It did not shift or drive; it was just there, stand­ing all round you like some­thing solid. At eight or nine, per­haps, it lifted as a shut­ter lifts. We had a glimpse of the tow­er­ing mul­ti­tude of trees, of the im­mense mat­ted jun­gle, with the blaz­ing lit­tle ball of the sun hang­ing over it—all per­fectly still—and then the white shut­ter came down again, smoothly, as if slid­ing in greased grooves. I or­dered the chain, which we had be­gun to heave in, to be paid out again. Be­fore it stopped run­ning with a muf­fled rat­tle, a cry, a very loud cry, as of in­fi­nite des­o­la­tion, soared slowly in the opaque air. It ceased. A com­plain­ing clam­our, mod­u­lated in sav­age dis­cords, filled our ears. The sheer un­ex­pect­ed­ness of it made my hair stir un­der my cap. I don’t know how it struck the oth­ers: to me it seemed as though the mist it­self had screamed, so sud­denly, and ap­par­ently from all sides at once, did this tu­mul­tuous and mourn­ful up­roar arise. It cul­mi­nated in a hur­ried out­break of al­most in­tol­er­a­bly ex­ces­sive shriek­ing, which stopped short, leav­ing us stiff­ened in a va­ri­ety of silly at­ti­tudes, and ob­sti­nately lis­ten­ing to the nearly as ap­palling and ex­ces­sive si­lence. ‘Good God! What is the mean­ing—’ stam­mered at my el­bow one of the pil­grims—a lit­tle fat man, with sandy hair and red whiskers, who wore sidespring boots, and pink py­ja­mas tucked into his socks. Two oth­ers re­mained open-mouthed a whole minute, then dashed into the lit­tle cabin, to rush out in­con­ti­nently and stand dart­ing scared glances, with Winch­esters at ‘ready’ in their hands. What we could see was just the steamer we were on, her out­lines blurred as though she had been on the point of dis­solv­ing, and a misty strip of wa­ter, per­haps two feet broad, around her—and that was all. The rest of the world was nowhere, as far as our eyes and ears were con­cerned. Just nowhere. Gone, dis­ap­peared; swept off with­out leav­ing a whis­per or a shadow be­hind.

“I went for­ward, and or­dered the chain to be hauled in short, so as to be ready to trip the an­chor and move the steam­boat at once if nec­es­sary. ‘Will they at­tack?’ whis­pered an awed voice. ‘We will be all butchered in this fog,’ mur­mured an­other. The faces twitched with the strain, the hands trem­bled slightly, the eyes for­got to wink. It was very cu­ri­ous to see the con­trast of ex­pres­sions of the white men and of the black fel­lows of our crew, who were as much strangers to that part of the river as we, though their homes were only eight hun­dred miles away. The whites, of course greatly dis­com­posed, had be­sides a cu­ri­ous look of be­ing painfully shocked by such an out­ra­geous row. The oth­ers had an alert, nat­u­rally in­ter­ested ex­pres­sion; but their faces were es­sen­tially quiet, even those of the one or two who grinned as they hauled at the chain. Sev­eral ex­changed short, grunt­ing phrases, which seemed to set­tle the mat­ter to their sat­is­fac­tion. Their head­man, a young, broad-chested black, se­verely draped in dark-blue fringed cloths, with fierce nos­trils and his hair all done up art­fully in oily ringlets, stood near me. ‘Aha!’ I said, just for good fel­low­ship’s sake. ‘Catch ’im,’ he snapped, with a blood­shot widen­ing of his eyes and a flash of sharp teeth—‘catch ’im. Give ’im to us.’ ‘To you, eh?’ I asked; ‘what would you do with them?’ ‘Eat ’im!’ he said curtly, and, lean­ing his el­bow on the rail, looked out into the fog in a dig­ni­fied and pro­foundly pen­sive at­ti­tude. I would no doubt have been prop­erly hor­ri­fied, had it not oc­curred to me that he and his chaps must be very hun­gry: that they must have been grow­ing in­creas­ingly hun­gry for at least this month past. They had been en­gaged for six months (I don’t think a sin­gle one of them had any clear idea of time, as we at the end of count­less ages have. They still be­longed to the be­gin­nings of time—had no in­her­ited ex­pe­ri­ence to teach them as it were), and of course, as long as there was a piece of pa­per writ­ten over in ac­cor­dance with some far­ci­cal law or other made down the river, it didn’t en­ter any­body’s head to trou­ble how they would live. Cer­tainly they had brought with them some rot­ten hippo-meat, which couldn’t have lasted very long, any­way, even if the pil­grims hadn’t, in the midst of a shock­ing hul­la­baloo, thrown a con­sid­er­able quan­tity of it over­board. It looked like a high­handed pro­ceed­ing; but it was re­ally a case of le­git­i­mate self-de­fence. You can’t breathe dead hippo wak­ing, sleep­ing, and eat­ing, and at the same time keep your pre­car­i­ous grip on ex­is­tence. Be­sides that, they had given them ev­ery week three pieces of brass wire, each about nine inches long; and the the­ory was they were to buy their pro­vi­sions with that cur­rency in river­side vil­lages. You can see how that worked. There were ei­ther no vil­lages, or the peo­ple were hos­tile, or the di­rec­tor, who like the rest of us fed out of tins, with an oc­ca­sional old he-goat thrown in, didn’t want to stop the steamer for some more or less re­con­dite rea­son. So, un­less they swal­lowed the wire it­self, or made loops of it to snare the fishes with, I don’t see what good their ex­trav­a­gant salary could be to them. I must say it was paid with a reg­u­lar­ity wor­thy of a large and hon­ourable trad­ing com­pany. For the rest, the only thing to eat—though it didn’t look eat­able in the least—I saw in their pos­ses­sion was a few lumps of some stuff like half-cooked dough, of a dirty laven­der colour, they kept wrapped in leaves, and now and then swal­lowed a piece of, but so small that it seemed done more for the looks of the thing than for any se­ri­ous pur­pose of sus­te­nance. Why in the name of all the gnaw­ing dev­ils of hunger they didn’t go for us—they were thirty to five—and have a good tuck-in for once, amazes me now when I think of it. They were big pow­er­ful men, with not much ca­pac­ity to weigh the con­se­quences, with courage, with strength, even yet, though their skins were no longer glossy and their mus­cles no longer hard. And I saw that some­thing re­strain­ing, one of those hu­man se­crets that baf­fle prob­a­bil­ity, had come into play there. I looked at them with a swift quick­en­ing of in­ter­est—not be­cause it oc­curred to me I might be eaten by them be­fore very long, though I own to you that just then I per­ceived—in a new light, as it were—how un­whole­some the pil­grims looked, and I hoped, yes, I pos­i­tively hoped, that my as­pect was not so—what shall I say?—so—un­ap­pe­tiz­ing: a touch of fan­tas­tic van­ity which fit­ted well with the dream-sen­sa­tion that per­vaded all my days at that time. Per­haps I had a lit­tle fever, too. One can’t live with one’s fin­ger ev­er­last­ingly on one’s pulse. I had of­ten ‘a lit­tle fever,’ or a lit­tle touch of other things—the play­ful paw-strokes of the wilder­ness, the pre­lim­i­nary tri­fling be­fore the more se­ri­ous on­slaught which came in due course. Yes; I looked at them as you would on any hu­man be­ing, with a cu­rios­ity of their im­pulses, mo­tives, ca­pac­i­ties, weak­nesses, when brought to the test of an in­ex­orable phys­i­cal ne­ces­sity. Res­traint! What pos­si­ble re­straint? Was it su­per­sti­tion, dis­gust, pa­tience, fear—or some kind of prim­i­tive hon­our? No fear can stand up to hunger, no pa­tience can wear it out, dis­gust sim­ply does not ex­ist where hunger is; and as to su­per­sti­tion, be­liefs, and what you may call prin­ci­ples, they are less than chaff in a breeze. Don’t you know the dev­ilry of lin­ger­ing star­va­tion, its ex­as­per­at­ing tor­ment, its black thoughts, its som­bre and brood­ing fe­roc­ity? Well, I do. It takes a man all his in­born strength to fight hunger prop­erly. It’s re­ally eas­ier to face be­reave­ment, dis­hon­our, and the perdi­tion of one’s soul—than this kind of pro­longed hunger. Sad, but true. And these chaps, too, had no earthly rea­son for any kind of scru­ple. Res­traint! I would just as soon have ex­pected re­straint from a hyena prowl­ing amongst the corpses of a bat­tle­field. But there was the fact fac­ing me—the fact daz­zling, to be seen, like the foam on the depths of the sea, like a rip­ple on an un­fath­omable enigma, a mys­tery greater—when I thought of it—than the cu­ri­ous, in­ex­pli­ca­ble note of des­per­ate grief in this sav­age clam­our that had swept by us on the river­bank, be­hind the blind white­ness of the fog.

“Two pil­grims were quar­relling in hur­ried whis­pers as to which bank. ‘Left.’ ‘No, no; how can you? Right, right, of course.’ ‘It is very se­ri­ous,’ said the man­ager’s voice be­hind me; ‘I would be des­o­lated if any­thing should hap­pen to Mr. Kurtz be­fore we came up.’ I looked at him, and had not the slight­est doubt he was sin­cere. He was just the kind of man who would wish to pre­serve ap­pear­ances. That was his re­straint. But when he mut­tered some­thing about go­ing on at once, I did not even take the trou­ble to an­swer him. I knew, and he knew, that it was im­pos­si­ble. Were we to let go our hold of the bot­tom, we would be ab­so­lutely in the air—in space. We wouldn’t be able to tell where we were go­ing to—whether up or down stream, or across—till we fetched against one bank or the other—and then we wouldn’t know at first which it was. Of course I made no move. I had no mind for a smashup. You couldn’t imag­ine a more deadly place for a ship­wreck. Whether we drowned at once or not, we were sure to per­ish speed­ily in one way or an­other. ‘I au­tho­rize you to take all the risks,’ he said, af­ter a short si­lence. ‘I refuse to take any,’ I said shortly; which was just the an­swer he ex­pected, though its tone might have sur­prised him. ‘Well, I must de­fer to your judg­ment. You are cap­tain,’ he said with marked ci­vil­ity. I turned my shoul­der to him in sign of my ap­pre­ci­a­tion, and looked into the fog. How long would it last? It was the most hope­less look­out. The ap­proach to this Kurtz grub­bing for ivory in the wretched bush was be­set by as many dan­gers as though he had been an en­chanted princess sleep­ing in a fab­u­lous cas­tle. ‘Will they at­tack, do you think?’ asked the man­ager, in a con­fi­den­tial tone.

“I did not think they would at­tack, for sev­eral ob­vi­ous rea­sons. The thick fog was one. If they left the bank in their ca­noes they would get lost in it, as we would be if we at­tempted to move. Still, I had also judged the jun­gle of both banks quite im­pen­e­tra­ble—and yet eyes were in it, eyes that had seen us. The river­side bushes were cer­tainly very thick; but the un­der­growth be­hind was ev­i­dently pen­e­tra­ble. How­ever, dur­ing the short lift I had seen no ca­noes any­where in the reach—cer­tainly not abreast of the steamer. But what made the idea of at­tack in­con­ceiv­able to me was the na­ture of the noise—of the cries we had heard. They had not the fierce char­ac­ter bod­ing im­me­di­ate hos­tile in­ten­tion. Un­ex­pected, wild, and vi­o­lent as they had been, they had given me an ir­re­sistible im­pres­sion of sor­row. The glimpse of the steam­boat had for some rea­son filled those sav­ages with un­re­strained grief. The dan­ger, if any, I ex­pounded, was from our prox­im­ity to a great hu­man pas­sion let loose. Even ex­treme grief may ul­ti­mately vent it­self in vi­o­lence—but more gen­er­ally takes the form of ap­a­thy. …

“You should have seen the pil­grims stare! They had no heart to grin, or even to re­vile me: but I be­lieve they thought me gone mad—with fright, maybe. I de­liv­ered a reg­u­lar lec­ture. My dear boys, it was no good both­er­ing. Keep a look­out? Well, you may guess I watched the fog for the signs of lift­ing as a cat watches a mouse; but for any­thing else our eyes were of no more use to us than if we had been buried miles deep in a heap of cot­ton-wool. It felt like it, too—chok­ing, warm, sti­fling. Be­sides, all I said, though it sounded ex­trav­a­gant, was ab­so­lutely true to fact. What we af­ter­wards al­luded to as an at­tack was re­ally an at­tempt at re­pulse. The ac­tion was very far from be­ing ag­gres­sive—it was not even de­fen­sive, in the usual sense: it was un­der­taken un­der the stress of des­per­a­tion, and in its essence was purely pro­tec­tive.

“It de­vel­oped it­self, I should say, two hours af­ter the fog lifted, and its com­mence­ment was at a spot, roughly speak­ing, about a mile and a half be­low Kurtz’s sta­tion. We had just floun­dered and flopped round a bend, when I saw an islet, a mere grassy hum­mock of bright green, in the mid­dle of the stream. It was the only thing of the kind; but as we opened the reach more, I per­ceived it was the head of a long sand­bank, or rather of a chain of shal­low patches stretch­ing down the mid­dle of the river. They were dis­coloured, just awash, and the whole lot was seen just un­der the wa­ter, ex­actly as a man’s back­bone is seen run­ning down the mid­dle of his back un­der the skin. Now, as far as I did see, I could go to the right or to the left of this. I didn’t know ei­ther chan­nel, of course. The banks looked pretty well alike, the depth ap­peared the same; but as I had been in­formed the sta­tion was on the west side, I nat­u­rally headed for the west­ern pas­sage.

“No sooner had we fairly en­tered it than I be­came aware it was much nar­rower than I had sup­posed. To the left of us there was the long un­in­ter­rupted shoal, and to the right a high, steep bank heav­ily over­grown with bushes. Above the bush the trees stood in ser­ried ranks. The twigs over­hung the cur­rent thickly, and from dis­tance to dis­tance a large limb of some tree pro­jected rigidly over the stream. It was then well on in the af­ter­noon, the face of the for­est was gloomy, and a broad strip of shadow had al­ready fallen on the wa­ter. In this shadow we steamed up—very slowly, as you may imag­ine. I sheered her well in­shore—the wa­ter be­ing deep­est near the bank, as the sound­ing-pole in­formed me.

“One of my hun­gry and for­bear­ing friends was sound­ing in the bows just be­low me. This steam­boat was ex­actly like a decked scow. On the deck, there were two lit­tle teak­wood houses, with doors and win­dows. The boiler was in the fore-end, and the ma­chin­ery right astern. Over the whole there was a light roof, sup­ported on stan­chions. The fun­nel pro­jected through that roof, and in front of the fun­nel a small cabin built of light planks served for a pi­lot­house. It con­tained a couch, two camp­stools, a loaded Mar­tini-Henry lean­ing in one cor­ner, a tiny ta­ble, and the steer­ing-wheel. It had a wide door in front and a broad shut­ter at each side. All these were al­ways thrown open, of course. I spent my days perched up there on the ex­treme fore-end of that roof, be­fore the door. At night I slept, or tried to, on the couch. An ath­letic black be­long­ing to some coast tribe and ed­u­cated by my poor pre­de­ces­sor, was the helms­man. He sported a pair of brass ear­rings, wore a blue cloth wrap­per from the waist to the an­kles, and thought all the world of him­self. He was the most un­sta­ble kind of fool I had ever seen. He steered with no end of a swag­ger while you were by; but if he lost sight of you, he be­came in­stantly the prey of an ab­ject funk, and would let that crip­ple of a steam­boat get the up­per hand of him in a minute.

“I was look­ing down at the sound­ing-pole, and feel­ing much an­noyed to see at each try a lit­tle more of it stick out of that river, when I saw my pole­man give up on the busi­ness sud­denly, and stretch him­self flat on the deck, with­out even tak­ing the trou­ble to haul his pole in. He kept hold on it though, and it trailed in the wa­ter. At the same time the fire­man, whom I could also see be­low me, sat down abruptly be­fore his fur­nace and ducked his head. I was amazed. Then I had to look at the river mighty quick, be­cause there was a snag in the fair­way. Sticks, lit­tle sticks, were fly­ing about—thick: they were whizzing be­fore my nose, drop­ping be­low me, strik­ing be­hind me against my pi­lot­house. All this time the river, the shore, the woods, were very quiet—per­fectly quiet. I could only hear the heavy splash­ing thump of the stern-wheel and the pat­ter of these things. We cleared the snag clum­sily. Ar­rows, by Jove! We were be­ing shot at! I stepped in quickly to close the shut­ter on the land­side. That fool-helms­man, his hands on the spokes, was lift­ing his knees high, stamp­ing his feet, champ­ing his mouth, like a reined-in horse. Con­found him! And we were stag­ger­ing within ten feet of the bank. I had to lean right out to swing the heavy shut­ter, and I saw a face amongst the leaves on the level with my own, look­ing at me very fierce and steady; and then sud­denly, as though a veil had been re­moved from my eyes, I made out, deep in the tan­gled gloom, naked breasts, arms, legs, glar­ing eyes—the bush was swarm­ing with hu­man limbs in move­ment, glis­ten­ing of bronze colour. The twigs shook, swayed, and rus­tled, the ar­rows flew out of them, and then the shut­ter came to. ‘Steer her straight,’ I said to the helms­man. He held his head rigid, face for­ward; but his eyes rolled, he kept on lift­ing and set­ting down his feet gen­tly, his mouth foamed a lit­tle. ‘Keep quiet!’ I said in a fury. I might just as well have or­dered a tree not to sway in the wind. I darted out. Below me there was a great scuf­fle of feet on the iron deck; con­fused ex­cla­ma­tions; a voice screamed, ‘Can you turn back?’ I caught sight of a V-shaped rip­ple on the wa­ter ahead. What? Another snag! A fusil­lade burst out un­der my feet. The pil­grims had opened with their Winch­esters, and were sim­ply squirt­ing lead into that bush. A deuce of a lot of smoke came up and drove slowly for­ward. I swore at it. Now I couldn’t see the rip­ple or the snag ei­ther. I stood in the door­way, peer­ing, and the ar­rows came in swarms. They might have been poi­soned, but they looked as though they wouldn’t kill a cat. The bush be­gan to howl. Our wood­cut­ters raised a war­like whoop; the re­port of a ri­fle just at my back deaf­ened me. I glanced over my shoul­der, and the pi­lot­house was yet full of noise and smoke when I made a dash at the wheel. The fool-nig­ger had dropped ev­ery­thing, to throw the shut­ter open and let off that Mar­tini-Henry. He stood be­fore the wide open­ing, glar­ing, and I yelled at him to come back, while I straight­ened the sud­den twist out of that steam­boat. There was no room to turn even if I had wanted to, the snag was some­where very near ahead in that con­founded smoke, there was no time to lose, so I just crowded her into the bank—right into the bank, where I knew the wa­ter was deep.

“We tore slowly along the over­hang­ing bushes in a whirl of bro­ken twigs and fly­ing leaves. The fusil­lade be­low stopped short, as I had fore­seen it would when the squirts got empty. I threw my head back to a glint­ing whizz that tra­versed the pi­lot­house, in at one shut­ter-hole and out at the other. Look­ing past that mad helms­man, who was shak­ing the empty ri­fle and yelling at the shore, I saw vague forms of men run­ning bent dou­ble, leap­ing, glid­ing, dis­tinct, in­com­plete, evanes­cent. Some­thing big ap­peared in the air be­fore the shut­ter, the ri­fle went over­board, and the man stepped back swiftly, looked at me over his shoul­der in an ex­tra­or­di­nary, pro­found, fa­mil­iar man­ner, and fell upon my feet. The side of his head hit the wheel twice, and the end of what ap­peared a long cane clat­tered round and knocked over a lit­tle camp­stool. It looked as though af­ter wrench­ing that thing from some­body ashore he had lost his bal­ance in the ef­fort. The thin smoke had blown away, we were clear of the snag, and look­ing ahead I could see that in an­other hun­dred yards or so I would be free to sheer off, away from the bank; but my feet felt so very warm and wet that I had to look down. The man had rolled on his back and stared straight up at me; both his hands clutched that cane. It was the shaft of a spear that, ei­ther thrown or lunged through the open­ing, had caught him in the side, just be­low the ribs; the blade had gone in out of sight, af­ter mak­ing a fright­ful gash; my shoes were full; a pool of blood lay very still, gleam­ing dark-red un­der the wheel; his eyes shone with an amaz­ing lus­tre. The fusil­lade burst out again. He looked at me anx­iously, grip­ping the spear like some­thing pre­cious, with an air of be­ing afraid I would try to take it away from him. I had to make an ef­fort to free my eyes from his gaze and at­tend to the steer­ing. With one hand I felt above my head for the line of the steam whis­tle, and jerked out screech af­ter screech hur­riedly. The tu­mult of an­gry and war­like yells was checked in­stantly, and then from the depths of the woods went out such a tremu­lous and pro­longed wail of mourn­ful fear and ut­ter de­spair as may be imag­ined to fol­low the flight of the last hope from the earth. There was a great com­mo­tion in the bush; the shower of ar­rows stopped, a few drop­ping shots rang out sharply—then si­lence, in which the lan­guid beat of the stern-wheel came plainly to my ears. I put the helm hard a-star­board at the mo­ment when the pil­grim in pink py­ja­mas, very hot and ag­i­tated, ap­peared in the door­way. ‘The man­ager sends me—’ he be­gan in an of­fi­cial tone, and stopped short. ‘Good God!’ he said, glar­ing at the wounded man.

“We two whites stood over him, and his lus­trous and in­quir­ing glance en­veloped us both. I de­clare it looked as though he would presently put to us some ques­tions in an un­der­stand­able lan­guage; but he died with­out ut­ter­ing a sound, with­out mov­ing a limb, with­out twitch­ing a mus­cle. Only in the very last mo­ment, as though in re­sponse to some sign we could not see, to some whis­per we could not hear, he frowned heav­ily, and that frown gave to his black death-mask an in­con­ceiv­ably som­bre, brood­ing, and men­ac­ing ex­pres­sion. The lus­tre of in­quir­ing glance faded swiftly into va­cant glassi­ness. ‘Can you steer?’ I asked the agent ea­gerly. He looked very du­bi­ous; but I made a grab at his arm, and he un­der­stood at once I meant him to steer whether or no. To tell you the truth, I was mor­bidly anx­ious to change my shoes and socks. ‘He is dead,’ mur­mured the fel­low, im­mensely im­pressed. ‘No doubt about it,’ said I, tug­ging like mad at the shoelaces. ‘And by the way, I sup­pose Mr. Kurtz is dead as well by this time.’

“For the mo­ment that was the dom­i­nant thought. There was a sense of ex­treme dis­ap­point­ment, as though I had found out I had been striv­ing af­ter some­thing al­to­gether with­out a sub­stance. I couldn’t have been more dis­gusted if I had trav­elled all this way for the sole pur­pose of talk­ing with Mr. Kurtz. Talk­ing with … I flung one shoe over­board, and be­came aware that that was ex­actly what I had been look­ing for­ward to—a talk with Kurtz. I made the strange dis­cov­ery that I had never imag­ined him as do­ing, you know, but as dis­cours­ing. I didn’t say to my­self, ‘Now I will never see him,’ or ‘Now I will never shake him by the hand,’ but, ‘Now I will never hear him.’ The man pre­sented him­self as a voice. Not of course that I did not con­nect him with some sort of ac­tion. Hadn’t I been told in all the tones of jeal­ousy and ad­mi­ra­tion that he had col­lected, bartered, swin­dled, or stolen more ivory than all the other agents to­gether? That was not the point. The point was in his be­ing a gifted crea­ture, and that of all his gifts the one that stood out pre­em­i­nently, that car­ried with it a sense of real pres­ence, was his abil­ity to talk, his words—the gift of ex­pres­sion, the be­wil­der­ing, the il­lu­mi­nat­ing, the most ex­alted and the most con­temptible, the pul­sat­ing stream of light, or the de­ceit­ful flow from the heart of an im­pen­e­tra­ble dark­ness.

“The other shoe went fly­ing unto the devil-god of that river. I thought, ‘By Jove! it’s all over. We are too late; he has van­ished—the gift has van­ished, by means of some spear, ar­row, or club. I will never hear that chap speak af­ter all’—and my sor­row had a star­tling ex­trav­a­gance of emo­tion, even such as I had no­ticed in the howl­ing sor­row of these sav­ages in the bush. I couldn’t have felt more of lonely des­o­la­tion some­how, had I been robbed of a be­lief or had missed my des­tiny in life. … Why do you sigh in this beastly way, some­body? Ab­surd? Well, ab­surd. Good Lord! mustn’t a man ever—Here, give me some to­bacco.” …

There was a pause of pro­found still­ness, then a match flared, and Mar­low’s lean face ap­peared, worn, hol­low, with down­ward folds and dropped eye­lids, with an as­pect of con­cen­trated at­ten­tion; and as he took vig­or­ous draws at his pipe, it seemed to re­treat and ad­vance out of the night in the reg­u­lar flicker of tiny flame. The match went out.

“Ab­surd!” he cried. “This is the worst of try­ing to tell. … Here you all are, each moored with two good ad­dresses, like a hulk with two an­chors, a butcher round one cor­ner, a po­lice­man round an­other, ex­cel­lent ap­petites, and tem­per­a­ture nor­mal—you hear—nor­mal from year’s end to year’s end. And you say, Ab­surd! Ab­surd be—ex­ploded! Ab­surd! My dear boys, what can you ex­pect from a man who out of sheer ner­vous­ness had just flung over­board a pair of new shoes! Now I think of it, it is amaz­ing I did not shed tears. I am, upon the whole, proud of my for­ti­tude. I was cut to the quick at the idea of hav­ing lost the in­es­timable priv­i­lege of lis­ten­ing to the gifted Kurtz. Of course I was wrong. The priv­i­lege was wait­ing for me. Oh, yes, I heard more than enough. And I was right, too. A voice. He was very lit­tle more than a voice. And I heard—him—it—this voice—other voices—all of them were so lit­tle more than voices—and the mem­ory of that time it­self lingers around me, im­pal­pa­ble, like a dy­ing vi­bra­tion of one im­mense jab­ber, silly, atro­cious, sor­did, sav­age, or sim­ply mean, with­out any kind of sense. Voices, voices—even the girl her­self—now—”

He was silent for a long time.

“I laid the ghost of his gifts at last with a lie,” he be­gan, sud­denly. “Girl! What? Did I men­tion a girl? Oh, she is out of it—com­pletely. They—the women, I mean—are out of it—should be out of it. We must help them to stay in that beau­ti­ful world of their own, lest ours gets worse. Oh, she had to be out of it. You should have heard the dis­in­terred body of Mr. Kurtz say­ing, ‘My In­tended.’ You would have per­ceived di­rectly then how com­pletely she was out of it. And the lofty frontal bone of Mr. Kurtz! They say the hair goes on grow­ing some­times, but this—ah—spec­i­men, was im­pres­sively bald. The wilder­ness had pat­ted him on the head, and, be­hold, it was like a ball—an ivory ball; it had ca­ressed him, and—lo!—he had with­ered; it had taken him, loved him, em­braced him, got into his veins, con­sumed his flesh, and sealed his soul to its own by the in­con­ceiv­able cer­e­monies of some dev­il­ish ini­ti­a­tion. He was its spoiled and pam­pered favourite. Ivory? I should think so. Heaps of it, stacks of it. The old mud shanty was burst­ing with it. You would think there was not a sin­gle tusk left ei­ther above or be­low the ground in the whole coun­try. ‘Mostly fos­sil,’ the man­ager had re­marked, dis­parag­ingly. It was no more fos­sil than I am; but they call it fos­sil when it is dug up. It ap­pears these nig­gers do bury the tusks some­times—but ev­i­dently they couldn’t bury this par­cel deep enough to save the gifted Mr. Kurtz from his fate. We filled the steam­boat with it, and had to pile a lot on the deck. Thus he could see and en­joy as long as he could see, be­cause the ap­pre­ci­a­tion of this favour had re­mained with him to the last. You should have heard him say, ‘My ivory.’ Oh, yes, I heard him. ‘My In­tended, my ivory, my sta­tion, my river, my—’ ev­ery­thing be­longed to him. It made me hold my breath in ex­pec­ta­tion of hear­ing the wilder­ness burst into a prodi­gious peal of laugh­ter that would shake the fixed stars in their places. Every­thing be­longed to him—but that was a tri­fle. The thing was to know what he be­longed to, how many pow­ers of dark­ness claimed him for their own. That was the re­flec­tion that made you creepy all over. It was im­pos­si­ble—it was not good for one ei­ther—try­ing to imag­ine. He had taken a high seat amongst the dev­ils of the land—I mean lit­er­ally. You can’t un­der­stand. How could you?—with solid pave­ment un­der your feet, sur­rounded by kind neigh­bours ready to cheer you or to fall on you, step­ping del­i­cately be­tween the butcher and the po­lice­man, in the holy ter­ror of scan­dal and gal­lows and lu­natic asy­lums—how can you imag­ine what par­tic­u­lar re­gion of the first ages a man’s un­tram­melled feet may take him into by the way of soli­tude—ut­ter soli­tude with­out a po­lice­man—by the way of si­lence—ut­ter si­lence, where no warn­ing voice of a kind neigh­bour can be heard whis­per­ing of pub­lic opin­ion? Th­ese lit­tle things make all the great dif­fer­ence. When they are gone you must fall back upon your own in­nate strength, upon your own ca­pac­ity for faith­ful­ness. Of course you may be too much of a fool to go wrong—too dull even to know you are be­ing as­saulted by the pow­ers of dark­ness. I take it, no fool ever made a bar­gain for his soul with the devil; the fool is too much of a fool, or the devil too much of a devil—I don’t know which. Or you may be such a thun­der­ingly ex­alted crea­ture as to be al­to­gether deaf and blind to any­thing but heav­enly sights and sounds. Then the earth for you is only a stand­ing place—and whether to be like this is your loss or your gain I won’t pre­tend to say. But most of us are nei­ther one nor the other. The earth for us is a place to live in, where we must put up with sights, with sounds, with smells, too, by Jove!—breathe dead hippo, so to speak, and not be con­tam­i­nated. And there, don’t you see? Your strength comes in, the faith in your abil­ity for the dig­ging of un­os­ten­ta­tious holes to bury the stuff in—your power of de­vo­tion, not to your­self, but to an ob­scure, back­break­ing busi­ness. And that’s dif­fi­cult enough. Mind, I am not try­ing to ex­cuse or even ex­plain—I am try­ing to ac­count to my­self for—for—Mr. Kurtz—for the shade of Mr. Kurtz. This ini­ti­ated wraith from the back of Nowhere hon­oured me with its amaz­ing con­fi­dence be­fore it van­ished al­to­gether. This was be­cause it could speak English to me. The orig­i­nal Kurtz had been ed­u­cated partly in Eng­land, and—as he was good enough to say him­self—his sym­pa­thies were in the right place. His mother was half-English, his fa­ther was half-French. All Europe con­trib­uted to the mak­ing of Kurtz; and by and by I learned that, most ap­pro­pri­ately, the In­ter­na­tional So­ci­ety for the Sup­pres­sion of Sav­age Cus­toms had en­trusted him with the mak­ing of a re­port, for its fu­ture guid­ance. And he had writ­ten it, too. I’ve seen it. I’ve read it. It was elo­quent, vi­brat­ing with elo­quence, but too high-strung, I think. Seven­teen pages of close writ­ing he had found time for! But this must have been be­fore his—let us say—nerves, went wrong, and caused him to pre­side at cer­tain mid­night dances end­ing with un­speak­able rites, which—as far as I re­luc­tantly gath­ered from what I heard at var­i­ous times—were of­fered up to him—do you un­der­stand?—to Mr. Kurtz him­self. But it was a beau­ti­ful piece of writ­ing. The open­ing para­graph, how­ever, in the light of later in­for­ma­tion, strikes me now as omi­nous. He be­gan with the ar­gu­ment that we whites, from the point of de­vel­op­ment we had ar­rived at, ‘must nec­es­sar­ily ap­pear to them [sav­ages] in the na­ture of su­per­nat­u­ral be­ings—we ap­proach them with the might of a de­ity,’ and so on, and so on. ‘By the sim­ple ex­er­cise of our will we can ex­ert a power for good prac­ti­cally un­bounded,’ etc., etc. From that point he soared and took me with him. The per­ora­tion was mag­nif­i­cent, though dif­fi­cult to re­mem­ber, you know. It gave me the no­tion of an ex­otic Im­men­sity ruled by an au­gust Benev­o­lence. It made me tin­gle with en­thu­si­asm. This was the un­bounded power of elo­quence—of words—of burn­ing no­ble words. There were no prac­ti­cal hints to in­ter­rupt the magic cur­rent of phrases, un­less a kind of note at the foot of the last page, scrawled ev­i­dently much later, in an un­steady hand, may be re­garded as the ex­po­si­tion of a method. It was very sim­ple, and at the end of that mov­ing ap­peal to ev­ery al­tru­is­tic sen­ti­ment it blazed at you, lu­mi­nous and ter­ri­fy­ing, like a flash of light­ning in a serene sky: ‘Ex­ter­mi­nate all the brutes!’ The cu­ri­ous part was that he had ap­par­ently for­got­ten all about that valu­able postscrip­tum, be­cause, later on, when he in a sense came to him­self, he re­peat­edly en­treated me to take good care of ‘my pam­phlet’ (he called it), as it was sure to have in the fu­ture a good in­flu­ence upon his ca­reer. I had full in­for­ma­tion about all these things, and, be­sides, as it turned out, I was to have the care of his mem­ory. I’ve done enough for it to give me the in­dis­putable right to lay it, if I choose, for an ev­er­last­ing rest in the dust­bin of progress, amongst all the sweep­ings and, fig­u­ra­tively speak­ing, all the dead cats of civ­i­liza­tion. But then, you see, I can’t choose. He won’t be for­got­ten. What­ever he was, he was not com­mon. He had the power to charm or frighten rudi­men­tary souls into an ag­gra­vated witch-dance in his hon­our; he could also fill the small souls of the pil­grims with bit­ter mis­giv­ings: he had one de­voted friend at least, and he had con­quered one soul in the world that was nei­ther rudi­men­tary nor tainted with self-seek­ing. No; I can’t for­get him, though I am not pre­pared to af­firm the fel­low was ex­actly worth the life we lost in get­ting to him. I missed my late helms­man aw­fully—I missed him even while his body was still ly­ing in the pi­lot­house. Per­haps you will think it pass­ing strange this re­gret for a sav­age who was no more ac­count than a grain of sand in a black Sa­hara. Well, don’t you see, he had done some­thing, he had steered; for months I had him at my back—a help—an in­stru­ment. It was a kind of part­ner­ship. He steered for me—I had to look af­ter him, I wor­ried about his de­fi­cien­cies, and thus a sub­tle bond had been cre­ated, of which I only be­came aware when it was sud­denly bro­ken. And the in­ti­mate pro­fun­dity of that look he gave me when he re­ceived his hurt re­mains to this day in my mem­ory—like a claim of dis­tant kin­ship af­firmed in a supreme mo­ment.

“Poor fool! If he had only left that shut­ter alone. He had no re­straint, no re­straint—just like Kurtz—a tree swayed by the wind. As soon as I had put on a dry pair of slip­pers, I dragged him out, af­ter first jerk­ing the spear out of his side, which op­er­a­tion I con­fess I per­formed with my eyes shut tight. His heels leaped to­gether over the lit­tle doorstep; his shoul­ders were pressed to my breast; I hugged him from be­hind des­per­ately. Oh! he was heavy, heavy; heav­ier than any man on earth, I should imag­ine. Then with­out more ado I tipped him over­board. The cur­rent snatched him as though he had been a wisp of grass, and I saw the body roll over twice be­fore I lost sight of it for­ever. All the pil­grims and the man­ager were then con­gre­gated on the awning-deck about the pi­lot­house, chat­ter­ing at each other like a flock of ex­cited mag­pies, and there was a scan­dal­ized mur­mur at my heart­less promp­ti­tude. What they wanted to keep that body hang­ing about for I can’t guess. Em­balm it, maybe. But I had also heard an­other, and a very omi­nous, mur­mur on the deck be­low. My friends the wood­cut­ters were like­wise scan­dal­ized, and with a bet­ter show of rea­son—though I ad­mit that the rea­son it­self was quite in­ad­mis­si­ble. Oh, quite! I had made up my mind that if my late helms­man was to be eaten, the fishes alone should have him. He had been a very sec­ond-rate helms­man while alive, but now he was dead he might have be­come a first-class temp­ta­tion, and pos­si­bly cause some star­tling trou­ble. Be­sides, I was anx­ious to take the wheel, the man in pink py­ja­mas show­ing him­self a hope­less duf­fer at the busi­ness.

“This I did di­rectly the sim­ple fu­neral was over. We were go­ing half-speed, keep­ing right in the mid­dle of the stream, and I lis­tened to the talk about me. They had given up Kurtz, they had given up the sta­tion; Kurtz was dead, and the sta­tion had been burnt—and so on—and so on. The red-haired pil­grim was be­side him­self with the thought that at least this poor Kurtz had been prop­erly avenged. ‘Say! We must have made a glo­ri­ous slaugh­ter of them in the bush. Eh? What do you think? Say?’ He pos­i­tively danced, the blood­thirsty lit­tle gin­gery beg­gar. And he had nearly fainted when he saw the wounded man! I could not help say­ing, ‘You made a glo­ri­ous lot of smoke, any­how.’ I had seen, from the way the tops of the bushes rus­tled and flew, that al­most all the shots had gone too high. You can’t hit any­thing un­less you take aim and fire from the shoul­der; but these chaps fired from the hip with their eyes shut. The re­treat, I main­tained—and I was right—was caused by the screech­ing of the steam whis­tle. Upon this they for­got Kurtz, and be­gan to howl at me with in­dig­nant protests.

“The man­ager stood by the wheel mur­mur­ing con­fi­den­tially about the ne­ces­sity of get­ting well away down the river be­fore dark at all events, when I saw in the dis­tance a clear­ing on the river­side and the out­lines of some sort of build­ing. ‘What’s this?’ I asked. He clapped his hands in won­der. ‘The sta­tion!’ he cried. I edged in at once, still go­ing half-speed.

“Through my glasses I saw the slope of a hill in­ter­spersed with rare trees and per­fectly free from un­der­growth. A long de­cay­ing build­ing on the sum­mit was half buried in the high grass; the large holes in the peaked roof gaped black from afar; the jun­gle and the woods made a back­ground. There was no en­clo­sure or fence of any kind; but there had been one ap­par­ently, for near the house half-a-dozen slim posts re­mained in a row, roughly trimmed, and with their up­per ends or­na­mented with round carved balls. The rails, or what­ever there had been be­tween, had dis­ap­peared. Of course the for­est sur­rounded all that. The river­bank was clear, and on the wa­ter­side I saw a white man un­der a hat like a cart­wheel beck­on­ing per­sis­tently with his whole arm. Ex­am­in­ing the edge of the for­est above and be­low, I was al­most cer­tain I could see move­ments—hu­man forms glid­ing here and there. I steamed past pru­dently, then stopped the en­gines and let her drift down. The man on the shore be­gan to shout, urg­ing us to land. ‘We have been at­tacked,’ screamed the man­ager. ‘I know—I know. It’s all right,’ yelled back the other, as cheer­ful as you please. ‘Come along. It’s all right. I am glad.’

“His as­pect re­minded me of some­thing I had seen—some­thing funny I had seen some­where. As I ma­noeu­vred to get along­side, I was ask­ing my­self, ‘What does this fel­low look like?’ Sud­denly I got it. He looked like a har­le­quin. His clothes had been made of some stuff that was brown hol­land prob­a­bly, but it was cov­ered with patches all over, with bright patches, blue, red, and yel­low—patches on the back, patches on the front, patches on el­bows, on knees; coloured bind­ing around his jacket, scar­let edg­ing at the bot­tom of his trousers; and the sun­shine made him look ex­tremely gay and won­der­fully neat withal, be­cause you could see how beau­ti­fully all this patch­ing had been done. A beard­less, boy­ish face, very fair, no fea­tures to speak of, nose peel­ing, lit­tle blue eyes, smiles and frowns chas­ing each other over that open coun­te­nance like sun­shine and shadow on a windswept plain. ‘Look out, cap­tain!’ he cried; ‘there’s a snag lodged in here last night.’ What! Another snag? I con­fess I swore shame­fully. I had nearly holed my crip­ple, to fin­ish off that charm­ing trip. The har­le­quin on the bank turned his lit­tle pug-nose up to me. ‘You English?’ he asked, all smiles. ‘Are you?’ I shouted from the wheel. The smiles van­ished, and he shook his head as if sorry for my dis­ap­point­ment. Then he bright­ened up. ‘Never mind!’ he cried en­cour­ag­ingly. ‘Are we in time?’ I asked. ‘He is up there,’ he replied, with a toss of the head up the hill, and be­com­ing gloomy all of a sud­den. His face was like the au­tumn sky, over­cast one mo­ment and bright the next.

“When the man­ager, es­corted by the pil­grims, all of them armed to the teeth, had gone to the house this chap came on board. ‘I say, I don’t like this. Th­ese na­tives are in the bush,’ I said. He as­sured me earnestly it was all right. ‘They are sim­ple peo­ple,’ he added; ‘well, I am glad you came. It took me all my time to keep them off.’ ‘But you said it was all right,’ I cried. ‘Oh, they meant no harm,’ he said; and as I stared he cor­rected him­self, ‘Not ex­actly.’ Then vi­va­ciously, ‘My faith, your pi­lot­house wants a cleanup!’ In the next breath he ad­vised me to keep enough steam on the boiler to blow the whis­tle in case of any trou­ble. ‘One good screech will do more for you than all your ri­fles. They are sim­ple peo­ple,’ he re­peated. He rat­tled away at such a rate he quite over­whelmed me. He seemed to be try­ing to make up for lots of si­lence, and ac­tu­ally hinted, laugh­ing, that such was the case. ‘Don’t you talk with Mr. Kurtz?’ I said. ‘You don’t talk with that man—you lis­ten to him,’ he ex­claimed with se­vere ex­al­ta­tion. ‘But now—’ He waved his arm, and in the twin­kling of an eye was in the ut­ter­most depths of de­spon­dency. In a mo­ment he came up again with a jump, pos­sessed him­self of both my hands, shook them con­tin­u­ously, while he gab­bled: ‘Brother sailor … hon­our … plea­sure … de­light … in­tro­duce my­self … Rus­sian … son of an arch­priest … Govern­ment of Tam­bov … What? Tobacco! English to­bacco; the ex­cel­lent English to­bacco! Now, that’s broth­erly. Smoke? Where’s a sailor that does not smoke?”

“The pipe soothed him, and grad­u­ally I made out he had run away from school, had gone to sea in a Rus­sian ship; ran away again; served some time in English ships; was now rec­on­ciled with the arch­priest. He made a point of that. ‘But when one is young one must see things, gather ex­pe­ri­ence, ideas; en­large the mind.’ ‘Here!’ I in­ter­rupted. ‘You can never tell! Here I met Mr. Kurtz,’ he said, youth­fully solemn and re­proach­ful. I held my tongue af­ter that. It ap­pears he had per­suaded a Dutch trad­ing-house on the coast to fit him out with stores and goods, and had started for the in­te­rior with a light heart and no more idea of what would hap­pen to him than a baby. He had been wan­der­ing about that river for nearly two years alone, cut off from ev­ery­body and ev­ery­thing. ‘I am not so young as I look. I am twenty-five,’ he said. ‘At first old Van Shuyten would tell me to go to the devil,’ he nar­rated with keen en­joy­ment; ‘but I stuck to him, and talked and talked, till at last he got afraid I would talk the hind-leg off his favourite dog, so he gave me some cheap things and a few guns, and told me he hoped he would never see my face again. Good old Dutch­man, Van Shuyten. I’ve sent him one small lot of ivory a year ago, so that he can’t call me a lit­tle thief when I get back. I hope he got it. And for the rest I don’t care. I had some wood stacked for you. That was my old house. Did you see?’

“I gave him Tow­son’s book. He made as though he would kiss me, but re­strained him­self. ‘The only book I had left, and I thought I had lost it,’ he said, look­ing at it ec­stat­i­cally. ‘So many ac­ci­dents hap­pen to a man go­ing about alone, you know. Ca­noes get up­set some­times—and some­times you’ve got to clear out so quick when the peo­ple get an­gry.’ He thumbed the pages. ‘You made notes in Rus­sian?’ I asked. He nod­ded. ‘I thought they were writ­ten in ci­pher,’ I said. He laughed, then be­came se­ri­ous. ‘I had lots of trou­ble to keep these peo­ple off,’ he said. ‘Did they want to kill you?’ I asked. ‘Oh, no!’ he cried, and checked him­self. ‘Why did they at­tack us?’ I pur­sued. He hes­i­tated, then said shame­facedly, ‘They don’t want him to go.’ ‘Don’t they?’ I said cu­ri­ously. He nod­ded a nod full of mys­tery and wis­dom. ‘I tell you,’ he cried, ‘this man has en­larged my mind.’ He opened his arms wide, star­ing at me with his lit­tle blue eyes that were per­fectly round.”





III


“I looked at him, lost in as­ton­ish­ment. There he was be­fore me, in mot­ley, as though he had ab­sconded from a troupe of mimes, en­thu­si­as­tic, fab­u­lous. His very ex­is­tence was im­prob­a­ble, in­ex­pli­ca­ble, and al­to­gether be­wil­der­ing. He was an in­sol­u­ble prob­lem. It was in­con­ceiv­able how he had ex­isted, how he had suc­ceeded in get­ting so far, how he had man­aged to re­main—why he did not in­stantly dis­ap­pear. ‘I went a lit­tle far­ther,’ he said, ‘then still a lit­tle far­ther—till I had gone so far that I don’t know how I’ll ever get back. Never mind. Plenty time. I can man­age. You take Kurtz away quick—quick—I tell you.’ The glam­our of youth en­veloped his par­ti­coloured rags, his des­ti­tu­tion, his lone­li­ness, the es­sen­tial des­o­la­tion of his fu­tile wan­der­ings. For months—for years—his life hadn’t been worth a day’s pur­chase; and there he was gal­lantly, thought­lessly alive, to all ap­pear­ances in­de­struc­tible solely by the virtue of his few years and of his un­re­flect­ing au­dac­ity. I was se­duced into some­thing like ad­mi­ra­tion—like envy. Glam­our urged him on, glam­our kept him un­scathed. He surely wanted noth­ing from the wilder­ness but space to breathe in and to push on through. His need was to ex­ist, and to move on­wards at the great­est pos­si­ble risk, and with a max­i­mum of pri­va­tion. If the ab­so­lutely pure, un­cal­cu­lat­ing, un­prac­ti­cal spirit of ad­ven­ture had ever ruled a hu­man be­ing, it ruled this bepatched youth. I al­most en­vied him the pos­ses­sion of this mod­est and clear flame. It seemed to have con­sumed all thought of self so com­pletely, that even while he was talk­ing to you, you for­got that it was he—the man be­fore your eyes—who had gone through these things. I did not envy him his de­vo­tion to Kurtz, though. He had not med­i­tated over it. It came to him, and he ac­cepted it with a sort of ea­ger fa­tal­ism. I must say that to me it ap­peared about the most dan­ger­ous thing in ev­ery way he had come upon so far.

“They had come to­gether un­avoid­ably, like two ships be­calmed near each other, and lay rub­bing sides at last. I sup­pose Kurtz wanted an au­di­ence, be­cause on a cer­tain oc­ca­sion, when en­camped in the for­est, they had talked all night, or more prob­a­bly Kurtz had talked. ‘We talked of ev­ery­thing,’ he said, quite trans­ported at the rec­ol­lec­tion. ‘I for­got there was such a thing as sleep. The night did not seem to last an hour. Every­thing! Every­thing! … Of love, too.’ ‘Ah, he talked to you of love!’ I said, much amused. ‘It isn’t what you think,’ he cried, al­most pas­sion­ately. ‘It was in gen­eral. He made me see things—things.’

“He threw his arms up. We were on deck at the time, and the head­man of my wood­cut­ters, loung­ing near by, turned upon him his heavy and glit­ter­ing eyes. I looked around, and I don’t know why, but I as­sure you that never, never be­fore, did this land, this river, this jun­gle, the very arch of this blaz­ing sky, ap­pear to me so hope­less and so dark, so im­pen­e­tra­ble to hu­man thought, so piti­less to hu­man weak­ness. ‘And, ever since, you have been with him, of course?’ I said.

“On the con­trary. It ap­pears their in­ter­course had been very much bro­ken by var­i­ous causes. He had, as he in­formed me proudly, man­aged to nurse Kurtz through two ill­nesses (he al­luded to it as you would to some risky feat), but as a rule Kurtz wan­dered alone, far in the depths of the for­est. ‘Very of­ten com­ing to this sta­tion, I had to wait days and days be­fore he would turn up,’ he said. ‘Ah, it was worth wait­ing for!—some­times.’ ‘What was he do­ing? ex­plor­ing or what?’ I asked. ‘Oh, yes, of course’; he had dis­cov­ered lots of vil­lages, a lake, too—he did not know ex­actly in what di­rec­tion; it was dan­ger­ous to in­quire too much—but mostly his ex­pe­di­tions had been for ivory. ‘But he had no goods to trade with by that time,’ I ob­jected. ‘There’s a good lot of car­tridges left even yet,’ he an­swered, look­ing away. ‘To speak plainly, he raided the coun­try,’ I said. He nod­ded. ‘Not alone, surely!’ He mut­tered some­thing about the vil­lages round that lake. ‘Kurtz got the tribe to fol­low him, did he?’ I sug­gested. He fid­geted a lit­tle. ‘They adored him,’ he said. The tone of these words was so ex­tra­or­di­nary that I looked at him search­ingly. It was cu­ri­ous to see his min­gled ea­ger­ness and re­luc­tance to speak of Kurtz. The man filled his life, oc­cu­pied his thoughts, swayed his emo­tions. ‘What can you ex­pect?’ he burst out; ‘he came to them with thun­der and light­ning, you know—and they had never seen any­thing like it—and very ter­ri­ble. He could be very ter­ri­ble. You can’t judge Mr. Kurtz as you would an or­di­nary man. No, no, no! Now—just to give you an idea—I don’t mind telling you, he wanted to shoot me, too, one day—but I don’t judge him.’ ‘Shoot you!’ I cried. ‘What for?’ ‘Well, I had a small lot of ivory the chief of that vil­lage near my house gave me. You see I used to shoot game for them. Well, he wanted it, and wouldn’t hear rea­son. He de­clared he would shoot me un­less I gave him the ivory and then cleared out of the coun­try, be­cause he could do so, and had a fancy for it, and there was noth­ing on earth to pre­vent him killing whom he jolly well pleased. And it was true, too. I gave him the ivory. What did I care! But I didn’t clear out. No, no. I couldn’t leave him. I had to be care­ful, of course, till we got friendly again for a time. He had his sec­ond ill­ness then. After­wards I had to keep out of the way; but I didn’t mind. He was liv­ing for the most part in those vil­lages on the lake. When he came down to the river, some­times he would take to me, and some­times it was bet­ter for me to be care­ful. This man suf­fered too much. He hated all this, and some­how he couldn’t get away. When I had a chance I begged him to try and leave while there was time; I of­fered to go back with him. And he would say yes, and then he would re­main; go off on an­other ivory hunt; dis­ap­pear for weeks; for­get him­self amongst these peo­ple—for­get him­self—you know.’ ‘Why! he’s mad,’ I said. He protested in­dig­nantly. Mr. Kurtz couldn’t be mad. If I had heard him talk, only two days ago, I wouldn’t dare hint at such a thing. … I had taken up my binoc­u­lars while we talked, and was look­ing at the shore, sweep­ing the limit of the for­est at each side and at the back of the house. The con­scious­ness of there be­ing peo­ple in that bush, so silent, so quiet—as silent and quiet as the ru­ined house on the hill—made me un­easy. There was no sign on the face of na­ture of this amaz­ing tale that was not so much told as sug­gested to me in des­o­late ex­cla­ma­tions, com­pleted by shrugs, in in­ter­rupted phrases, in hints end­ing in deep sighs. The woods were un­moved, like a mask—heavy, like the closed door of a prison—they looked with their air of hid­den knowl­edge, of pa­tient ex­pec­ta­tion, of un­ap­proach­able si­lence. The Rus­sian was ex­plain­ing to me that it was only lately that Mr. Kurtz had come down to the river, bring­ing along with him all the fight­ing men of that lake tribe. He had been ab­sent for sev­eral months—get­ting him­self adored, I sup­pose—and had come down un­ex­pect­edly, with the in­ten­tion to all ap­pear­ance of mak­ing a raid ei­ther across the river or down stream. Ev­i­dently the ap­petite for more ivory had got the bet­ter of the—what shall I say?—less ma­te­rial as­pi­ra­tions. How­ever he had got much worse sud­denly. ‘I heard he was ly­ing help­less, and so I came up—took my chance,’ said the Rus­sian. ‘Oh, he is bad, very bad.’ I di­rected my glass to the house. There were no signs of life, but there was the ru­ined roof, the long mud wall peep­ing above the grass, with three lit­tle square win­dow-holes, no two of the same size; all this brought within reach of my hand, as it were. And then I made a brusque move­ment, and one of the re­main­ing posts of that van­ished fence leaped up in the field of my glass. You re­mem­ber I told you I had been struck at the dis­tance by cer­tain at­tempts at or­na­men­ta­tion, rather re­mark­able in the ru­inous as­pect of the place. Now I had sud­denly a nearer view, and its first re­sult was to make me throw my head back as if be­fore a blow. Then I went care­fully from post to post with my glass, and I saw my mis­take. Th­ese round knobs were not or­na­men­tal but sym­bolic; they were ex­pres­sive and puz­zling, strik­ing and dis­turb­ing—food for thought and also for vul­tures if there had been any look­ing down from the sky; but at all events for such ants as were in­dus­tri­ous enough to as­cend the pole. They would have been even more im­pres­sive, those heads on the stakes, if their faces had not been turned to the house. Only one, the first I had made out, was fac­ing my way. I was not so shocked as you may think. The start back I had given was re­ally noth­ing but a move­ment of sur­prise. I had ex­pected to see a knob of wood there, you know. I re­turned de­lib­er­ately to the first I had seen—and there it was, black, dried, sunken, with closed eye­lids—a head that seemed to sleep at the top of that pole, and, with the shrunken dry lips show­ing a nar­row white line of the teeth, was smil­ing, too, smil­ing con­tin­u­ously at some end­less and jo­cose dream of that eter­nal slum­ber.

“I am not dis­clos­ing any trade se­crets. In fact, the man­ager said af­ter­wards that Mr. Kurtz’s meth­ods had ru­ined the dis­trict. I have no opin­ion on that point, but I want you clearly to un­der­stand that there was noth­ing ex­actly prof­itable in these heads be­ing there. They only showed that Mr. Kurtz lacked re­straint in the grat­i­fi­ca­tion of his var­i­ous lusts, that there was some­thing want­ing in him—some small mat­ter which, when the press­ing need arose, could not be found un­der his mag­nif­i­cent elo­quence. Whether he knew of this de­fi­ciency him­self I can’t say. I think the knowl­edge came to him at last—only at the very last. But the wilder­ness had found him out early, and had taken on him a ter­ri­ble vengeance for the fan­tas­tic in­va­sion. I think it had whis­pered to him things about him­self which he did not know, things of which he had no con­cep­tion till he took coun­sel with this great soli­tude—and the whis­per had proved ir­re­sistibly fas­ci­nat­ing. It echoed loudly within him be­cause he was hol­low at the core. … I put down the glass, and the head that had ap­peared near enough to be spo­ken to seemed at once to have leaped away from me into in­ac­ces­si­ble dis­tance.

“The ad­mirer of Mr. Kurtz was a bit crest­fallen. In a hur­ried, in­dis­tinct voice he be­gan to as­sure me he had not dared to take these—say, sym­bols—down. He was not afraid of the na­tives; they would not stir till Mr. Kurtz gave the word. His as­cen­dancy was ex­tra­or­di­nary. The camps of these peo­ple sur­rounded the place, and the chiefs came ev­ery day to see him. They would crawl. … ‘I don’t want to know any­thing of the cer­e­monies used when ap­proach­ing Mr. Kurtz,’ I shouted. Cu­ri­ous, this feel­ing that came over me that such de­tails would be more in­tol­er­a­ble than those heads dry­ing on the stakes un­der Mr. Kurtz’s win­dows. After all, that was only a sav­age sight, while I seemed at one bound to have been trans­ported into some light­less re­gion of sub­tle hor­rors, where pure, un­com­pli­cated sav­agery was a pos­i­tive re­lief, be­ing some­thing that had a right to ex­ist—ob­vi­ously—in the sun­shine. The young man looked at me with sur­prise. I sup­pose it did not oc­cur to him that Mr. Kurtz was no idol of mine. He for­got I hadn’t heard any of these splen­did mono­logues on, what was it? on love, jus­tice, con­duct of life—or what­not. If it had come to crawl­ing be­fore Mr. Kurtz, he crawled as much as the ver­i­est sav­age of them all. I had no idea of the con­di­tions, he said: these heads were the heads of rebels. I shocked him ex­ces­sively by laugh­ing. Rebels! What would be the next def­i­ni­tion I was to hear? There had been en­e­mies, crim­i­nals, work­ers—and these were rebels. Those re­bel­lious heads looked very sub­dued to me on their sticks. ‘You don’t know how such a life tries a man like Kurtz,’ cried Kurtz’s last dis­ci­ple. ‘Well, and you?’ I said. ‘I! I! I am a sim­ple man. I have no great thoughts. I want noth­ing from any­body. How can you com­pare me to … ?’ His feel­ings were too much for speech, and sud­denly he broke down. ‘I don’t un­der­stand,’ he groaned. ‘I’ve been do­ing my best to keep him alive, and that’s enough. I had no hand in all this. I have no abil­i­ties. There hasn’t been a drop of medicine or a mouth­ful of in­valid food for months here. He was shame­fully aban­doned. A man like this, with such ideas. Shame­fully! Shame­fully! I—I—haven’t slept for the last ten nights …’

“His voice lost it­self in the calm of the evening. The long shad­ows of the for­est had slipped down­hill while we talked, had gone far be­yond the ru­ined hovel, be­yond the sym­bolic row of stakes. All this was in the gloom, while we down there were yet in the sun­shine, and the stretch of the river abreast of the clear­ing glit­tered in a still and daz­zling splen­dour, with a murky and over­shad­owed bend above and be­low. Not a liv­ing soul was seen on the shore. The bushes did not rus­tle.

“Sud­denly round the cor­ner of the house a group of men ap­peared, as though they had come up from the ground. They waded waist-deep in the grass, in a com­pact body, bear­ing an im­pro­vised stretcher in their midst. In­stantly, in the empti­ness of the land­scape, a cry arose whose shrill­ness pierced the still air like a sharp ar­row fly­ing straight to the very heart of the land; and, as if by en­chant­ment, streams of hu­man be­ings—of naked hu­man be­ings—with spears in their hands, with bows, with shields, with wild glances and sav­age move­ments, were poured into the clear­ing by the dark-faced and pen­sive for­est. The bushes shook, the grass swayed for a time, and then ev­ery­thing stood still in at­ten­tive im­mo­bil­ity.

“ ‘Now, if he does not say the right thing to them we are all done for,’ said the Rus­sian at my el­bow. The knot of men with the stretcher had stopped, too, half­way to the steamer, as if pet­ri­fied. I saw the man on the stretcher sit up, lank and with an up­lifted arm, above the shoul­ders of the bear­ers. ‘Let us hope that the man who can talk so well of love in gen­eral will find some par­tic­u­lar rea­son to spare us this time,’ I said. I re­sented bit­terly the ab­surd dan­ger of our sit­u­a­tion, as if to be at the mercy of that atro­cious phan­tom had been a dis­hon­our­ing ne­ces­sity. I could not hear a sound, but through my glasses I saw the thin arm ex­tended com­mand­ingly, the lower jaw mov­ing, the eyes of that ap­pari­tion shin­ing darkly far in its bony head that nod­ded with grotesque jerks. Kurtz—Kurtz—that means short in Ger­man—don’t it? Well, the name was as true as ev­ery­thing else in his life—and death. He looked at least seven feet long. His cov­er­ing had fallen off, and his body emerged from it piti­ful and ap­palling as from a wind­ing-sheet. I could see the cage of his ribs all astir, the bones of his arm wav­ing. It was as though an an­i­mated im­age of death carved out of old ivory had been shak­ing its hand with men­aces at a mo­tion­less crowd of men made of dark and glit­ter­ing bronze. I saw him open his mouth wide—it gave him a weirdly vo­ra­cious as­pect, as though he had wanted to swal­low all the air, all the earth, all the men be­fore him. A deep voice reached me faintly. He must have been shout­ing. He fell back sud­denly. The stretcher shook as the bear­ers stag­gered for­ward again, and al­most at the same time I no­ticed that the crowd of sav­ages was van­ish­ing with­out any per­cep­ti­ble move­ment of re­treat, as if the for­est that had ejected these be­ings so sud­denly had drawn them in again as the breath is drawn in a long as­pi­ra­tion.

“Some of the pil­grims be­hind the stretcher car­ried his arms—two shot­guns, a heavy ri­fle, and a light re­volver-car­bine—the thun­der­bolts of that piti­ful Jupiter. The man­ager bent over him mur­mur­ing as he walked be­side his head. They laid him down in one of the lit­tle cab­ins—just a room for a bed place and a camp­stool or two, you know. We had brought his be­lated cor­re­spon­dence, and a lot of torn en­velopes and open let­ters lit­tered his bed. His hand roamed fee­bly amongst these pa­pers. I was struck by the fire of his eyes and the com­posed lan­guor of his ex­pres­sion. It was not so much the ex­haus­tion of dis­ease. He did not seem in pain. This shadow looked sa­ti­ated and calm, as though for the mo­ment it had had its fill of all the emo­tions.

“He rus­tled one of the let­ters, and look­ing straight in my face said, ‘I am glad.’ Some­body had been writ­ing to him about me. Th­ese spe­cial rec­om­men­da­tions were turn­ing up again. The vol­ume of tone he emit­ted with­out ef­fort, al­most with­out the trou­ble of mov­ing his lips, amazed me. A voice! a voice! It was grave, pro­found, vi­brat­ing, while the man did not seem ca­pa­ble of a whis­per. How­ever, he had enough strength in him—fac­ti­tious no doubt—to very nearly make an end of us, as you shall hear di­rectly.

“The man­ager ap­peared silently in the door­way; I stepped out at once and he drew the cur­tain af­ter me. The Rus­sian, eyed cu­ri­ously by the pil­grims, was star­ing at the shore. I fol­lowed the di­rec­tion of his glance.

“Dark hu­man shapes could be made out in the dis­tance, flit­ting in­dis­tinctly against the gloomy bor­der of the for­est, and near the river two bronze fig­ures, lean­ing on tall spears, stood in the sun­light un­der fan­tas­tic head­dresses of spot­ted skins, war­like and still in stat­uesque re­pose. And from right to left along the lighted shore moved a wild and gor­geous ap­pari­tion of a woman.

“She walked with mea­sured steps, draped in striped and fringed cloths, tread­ing the earth proudly, with a slight jin­gle and flash of bar­barous or­na­ments. She car­ried her head high; her hair was done in the shape of a hel­met; she had brass leg­gings to the knee, brass wire gauntlets to the el­bow, a crim­son spot on her tawny cheek, in­nu­mer­able neck­laces of glass beads on her neck; bizarre things, charms, gifts of witch-men, that hung about her, glit­tered and trem­bled at ev­ery step. She must have had the value of sev­eral ele­phant tusks upon her. She was sav­age and su­perb, wild-eyed and mag­nif­i­cent; there was some­thing omi­nous and stately in her de­lib­er­ate progress. And in the hush that had fallen sud­denly upon the whole sor­row­ful land, the im­mense wilder­ness, the colos­sal body of the fe­cund and mys­te­ri­ous life seemed to look at her, pen­sive, as though it had been look­ing at the im­age of its own tene­brous and pas­sion­ate soul.

“She came abreast of the steamer, stood still, and faced us. Her long shadow fell to the wa­ter’s edge. Her face had a tragic and fierce as­pect of wild sor­row and of dumb pain min­gled with the fear of some strug­gling, half-shaped re­solve. She stood look­ing at us with­out a stir, and like the wilder­ness it­self, with an air of brood­ing over an in­scrutable pur­pose. A whole minute passed, and then she made a step for­ward. There was a low jin­gle, a glint of yel­low metal, a sway of fringed draperies, and she stopped as if her heart had failed her. The young fel­low by my side growled. The pil­grims mur­mured at my back. She looked at us all as if her life had de­pended upon the unswerv­ing steadi­ness of her glance. Sud­denly she opened her bared arms and threw them up rigid above her head, as though in an un­con­trol­lable de­sire to touch the sky, and at the same time the swift shad­ows darted out on the earth, swept around on the river, gath­er­ing the steamer into a shad­owy em­brace. A for­mi­da­ble si­lence hung over the scene.

“She turned away slowly, walked on, fol­low­ing the bank, and passed into the bushes to the left. Once only her eyes gleamed back at us in the dusk of the thick­ets be­fore she dis­ap­peared.

“ ‘If she had of­fered to come aboard I re­ally think I would have tried to shoot her,’ said the man of patches, ner­vously. ‘I have been risk­ing my life ev­ery day for the last fort­night to keep her out of the house. She got in one day and kicked up a row about those mis­er­able rags I picked up in the store­room to mend my clothes with. I wasn’t de­cent. At least it must have been that, for she talked like a fury to Kurtz for an hour, point­ing at me now and then. I don’t un­der­stand the di­alect of this tribe. Luck­ily for me, I fancy Kurtz felt too ill that day to care, or there would have been mis­chief. I don’t un­der­stand. … No—it’s too much for me. Ah, well, it’s all over now.’

“At this mo­ment I heard Kurtz’s deep voice be­hind the cur­tain: ‘Save me!—save the ivory, you mean. Don’t tell me. Save me! Why, I’ve had to save you. You are in­ter­rupt­ing my plans now. Sick! Sick! Not so sick as you would like to be­lieve. Never mind. I’ll carry my ideas out yet—I will re­turn. I’ll show you what can be done. You with your lit­tle ped­dling no­tions—you are in­ter­fer­ing with me. I will re­turn. I. …’

“The man­ager came out. He did me the hon­our to take me un­der the arm and lead me aside. ‘He is very low, very low,’ he said. He con­sid­ered it nec­es­sary to sigh, but ne­glected to be con­sis­tently sor­row­ful. ‘We have done all we could for him—haven’t we? But there is no dis­guis­ing the fact, Mr. Kurtz has done more harm than good to the Com­pany. He did not see the time was not ripe for vig­or­ous ac­tion. Cau­tiously, cau­tiously—that’s my prin­ci­ple. We must be cau­tious yet. The dis­trict is closed to us for a time. De­plorable! Upon the whole, the trade will suf­fer. I don’t deny there is a re­mark­able quan­tity of ivory—mostly fos­sil. We must save it, at all events—but look how pre­car­i­ous the po­si­tion is—and why? Be­cause the method is un­sound.’ ‘Do you,’ said I, look­ing at the shore, ‘call it “un­sound method?” ’ ‘Without doubt,’ he ex­claimed hotly. ‘Don’t you?’ … ‘No method at all,’ I mur­mured af­ter a while. ‘Ex­actly,’ he ex­ulted. ‘I an­tic­i­pated this. Shows a com­plete want of judg­ment. It is my duty to point it out in the proper quar­ter.’ ‘Oh,’ said I, ‘that fel­low—what’s his name?—the brick­maker, will make a read­able re­port for you.’ He ap­peared con­founded for a mo­ment. It seemed to me I had never breathed an at­mos­phere so vile, and I turned men­tally to Kurtz for re­lief—pos­i­tively for re­lief. ‘Nev­er­the­less I think Mr. Kurtz is a re­mark­able man,’ I said with em­pha­sis. He started, dropped on me a heavy glance, said very qui­etly, ‘he was,’ and turned his back on me. My hour of favour was over; I found my­self lumped along with Kurtz as a par­ti­san of meth­ods for which the time was not ripe: I was un­sound! Ah! but it was some­thing to have at least a choice of night­mares.

“I had turned to the wilder­ness re­ally, not to Mr. Kurtz, who, I was ready to ad­mit, was as good as buried. And for a mo­ment it seemed to me as if I also were buried in a vast grave full of un­speak­able se­crets. I felt an in­tol­er­a­ble weight op­press­ing my breast, the smell of the damp earth, the un­seen pres­ence of vic­to­ri­ous cor­rup­tion, the dark­ness of an im­pen­e­tra­ble night. … The Rus­sian tapped me on the shoul­der. I heard him mum­bling and stam­mer­ing some­thing about ‘brother sea­man—couldn’t con­ceal—knowl­edge of mat­ters that would af­fect Mr. Kurtz’s rep­u­ta­tion.’ I waited. For him ev­i­dently Mr. Kurtz was not in his grave; I sus­pect that for him Mr. Kurtz was one of the im­mor­tals. ‘Well!’ said I at last, ‘speak out. As it hap­pens, I am Mr. Kurtz’s friend—in a way.’

“He stated with a good deal of for­mal­ity that had we not been ‘of the same pro­fes­sion,’ he would have kept the mat­ter to him­self with­out re­gard to con­se­quences. ‘He sus­pected there was an ac­tive ill-will to­wards him on the part of these white men that—’ ‘You are right,’ I said, re­mem­ber­ing a cer­tain con­ver­sa­tion I had over­heard. ‘The man­ager thinks you ought to be hanged.’ He showed a con­cern at this in­tel­li­gence which amused me at first. ‘I had bet­ter get out of the way qui­etly,’ he said earnestly. ‘I can do no more for Kurtz now, and they would soon find some ex­cuse. What’s to stop them? There’s a mil­i­tary post three hun­dred miles from here.’ ‘Well, upon my word,’ said I, ‘per­haps you had bet­ter go if you have any friends amongst the sav­ages near by.’ ‘Plenty,’ he said. ‘They are sim­ple peo­ple—and I want noth­ing, you know.’ He stood bit­ing his lip, then: ‘I don’t want any harm to hap­pen to these whites here, but of course I was think­ing of Mr. Kurtz’s rep­u­ta­tion—but you are a brother sea­man and—’ ‘All right,’ said I, af­ter a time. ‘Mr. Kurtz’s rep­u­ta­tion is safe with me.’ I did not know how truly I spoke.

“He in­formed me, low­er­ing his voice, that it was Kurtz who had or­dered the at­tack to be made on the steamer. ‘He hated some­times the idea of be­ing taken away—and then again. … But I don’t un­der­stand these mat­ters. I am a sim­ple man. He thought it would scare you away—that you would give it up, think­ing him dead. I could not stop him. Oh, I had an aw­ful time of it this last month.’ ‘Very well,’ I said. ‘He is all right now.’ ‘Ye-e-es,’ he mut­tered, not very con­vinced ap­par­ently. ‘Thanks,’ said I; ‘I shall keep my eyes open.’ ‘But quiet—eh?’ he urged anx­iously. ‘It would be aw­ful for his rep­u­ta­tion if any­body here—’ I promised a com­plete dis­cre­tion with great grav­ity. ‘I have a ca­noe and three black fel­lows wait­ing not very far. I am off. Could you give me a few Mar­tini-Henry car­tridges?’ I could, and did, with proper se­crecy. He helped him­self, with a wink at me, to a hand­ful of my to­bacco. ‘Between sailors—you know—good English to­bacco.’ At the door of the pi­lot­house he turned round—‘I say, haven’t you a pair of shoes you could spare?’ He raised one leg. ‘Look.’ The soles were tied with knot­ted strings san­dal­wise un­der his bare feet. I rooted out an old pair, at which he looked with ad­mi­ra­tion be­fore tuck­ing it un­der his left arm. One of his pock­ets (bright red) was bulging with car­tridges, from the other (dark blue) peeped ‘Tow­son’s In­quiry,’ etc., etc. He seemed to think him­self ex­cel­lently well equipped for a re­newed en­counter with the wilder­ness. ‘Ah! I’ll never, never meet such a man again. You ought to have heard him re­cite po­etry—his own, too, it was, he told me. Poetry!’ He rolled his eyes at the rec­ol­lec­tion of these de­lights. ‘Oh, he en­larged my mind!’ ‘Good­bye,’ said I. He shook hands and van­ished in the night. Some­times I ask my­self whether I had ever re­ally seen him—whether it was pos­si­ble to meet such a phe­nom­e­non! …

“When I woke up shortly af­ter mid­night his warn­ing came to my mind with its hint of dan­ger that seemed, in the starred dark­ness, real enough to make me get up for the pur­pose of hav­ing a look round. On the hill a big fire burned, il­lu­mi­nat­ing fit­fully a crooked cor­ner of the sta­tion-house. One of the agents with a picket of a few of our blacks, armed for the pur­pose, was keep­ing guard over the ivory; but deep within the for­est, red gleams that wa­vered, that seemed to sink and rise from the ground amongst con­fused colum­nar shapes of in­tense black­ness, showed the ex­act po­si­tion of the camp where Mr. Kurtz’s ador­ers were keep­ing their un­easy vigil. The mo­not­o­nous beat­ing of a big drum filled the air with muf­fled shocks and a lin­ger­ing vi­bra­tion. A steady dron­ing sound of many men chant­ing each to him­self some weird in­can­ta­tion came out from the black, flat wall of the woods as the hum­ming of bees comes out of a hive, and had a strange nar­cotic ef­fect upon my half-awake senses. I be­lieve I dozed off lean­ing over the rail, till an abrupt burst of yells, an over­whelm­ing out­break of a pent-up and mys­te­ri­ous frenzy, woke me up in a be­wil­dered won­der. It was cut short all at once, and the low dron­ing went on with an ef­fect of au­di­ble and sooth­ing si­lence. I glanced ca­su­ally into the lit­tle cabin. A light was burn­ing within, but Mr. Kurtz was not there.

“I think I would have raised an out­cry if I had be­lieved my eyes. But I didn’t be­lieve them at first—the thing seemed so im­pos­si­ble. The fact is I was com­pletely un­nerved by a sheer blank fright, pure ab­stract ter­ror, un­con­nected with any dis­tinct shape of phys­i­cal dan­ger. What made this emo­tion so over­pow­er­ing was—how shall I de­fine it?—the moral shock I re­ceived, as if some­thing al­to­gether mon­strous, in­tol­er­a­ble to thought and odi­ous to the soul, had been thrust upon me un­ex­pect­edly. This lasted of course the mer­est frac­tion of a sec­ond, and then the usual sense of com­mon­place, deadly dan­ger, the pos­si­bil­ity of a sud­den on­slaught and mas­sacre, or some­thing of the kind, which I saw im­pend­ing, was pos­i­tively wel­come and com­pos­ing. It paci­fied me, in fact, so much that I did not raise an alarm.

“There was an agent but­toned up in­side an ul­ster and sleep­ing on a chair on deck within three feet of me. The yells had not awak­ened him; he snored very slightly; I left him to his slum­bers and leaped ashore. I did not be­tray Mr. Kurtz—it was or­dered I should never be­tray him—it was writ­ten I should be loyal to the night­mare of my choice. I was anx­ious to deal with this shadow by my­self alone—and to this day I don’t know why I was so jeal­ous of shar­ing with any­one the pe­cu­liar black­ness of that ex­pe­ri­ence.

“As soon as I got on the bank I saw a trail—a broad trail through the grass. I re­mem­ber the ex­ul­ta­tion with which I said to my­self, ‘He can’t walk—he is crawl­ing on all-fours—I’ve got him.’ The grass was wet with dew. I strode rapidly with clenched fists. I fancy I had some vague no­tion of fall­ing upon him and giv­ing him a drub­bing. I don’t know. I had some im­be­cile thoughts. The knit­ting old woman with the cat ob­truded her­self upon my mem­ory as a most im­proper per­son to be sit­ting at the other end of such an af­fair. I saw a row of pil­grims squirt­ing lead in the air out of Winch­esters held to the hip. I thought I would never get back to the steamer, and imag­ined my­self liv­ing alone and un­armed in the woods to an ad­vanced age. Such silly things—you know. And I re­mem­ber I con­founded the beat of the drum with the beat­ing of my heart, and was pleased at its calm reg­u­lar­ity.

“I kept to the track though—then stopped to lis­ten. The night was very clear; a dark blue space, sparkling with dew and starlight, in which black things stood very still. I thought I could see a kind of mo­tion ahead of me. I was strangely cock­sure of ev­ery­thing that night. I ac­tu­ally left the track and ran in a wide semi­cir­cle (I ver­ily be­lieve chuck­ling to my­self) so as to get in front of that stir, of that mo­tion I had seen—if in­deed I had seen any­thing. I was cir­cum­vent­ing Kurtz as though it had been a boy­ish game.

“I came upon him, and, if he had not heard me com­ing, I would have fallen over him, too, but he got up in time. He rose, un­steady, long, pale, in­dis­tinct, like a vapour ex­haled by the earth, and swayed slightly, misty and silent be­fore me; while at my back the fires loomed be­tween the trees, and the mur­mur of many voices is­sued from the for­est. I had cut him off clev­erly; but when ac­tu­ally con­fronting him I seemed to come to my senses, I saw the dan­ger in its right pro­por­tion. It was by no means over yet. Sup­pose he be­gan to shout? Though he could hardly stand, there was still plenty of vigour in his voice. ‘Go away—hide your­self,’ he said, in that pro­found tone. It was very aw­ful. I glanced back. We were within thirty yards from the near­est fire. A black fig­ure stood up, strode on long black legs, wav­ing long black arms, across the glow. It had horns—an­te­lope horns, I think—on its head. Some sor­cerer, some witch-man, no doubt: it looked fiend­like enough. ‘Do you know what you are do­ing?’ I whis­pered. ‘Per­fectly,’ he an­swered, rais­ing his voice for that sin­gle word: it sounded to me far off and yet loud, like a hail through a speak­ing-trum­pet. ‘If he makes a row we are lost,’ I thought to my­self. This clearly was not a case for fisticuffs, even apart from the very nat­u­ral aver­sion I had to beat that Shadow—this wan­der­ing and tor­mented thing. ‘You will be lost,’ I said—‘ut­terly lost.’ One gets some­times such a flash of in­spi­ra­tion, you know. I did say the right thing, though in­deed he could not have been more ir­re­triev­ably lost than he was at this very mo­ment, when the foun­da­tions of our in­ti­macy were be­ing laid—to en­dure—to en­dure—even to the end—even be­yond.

“ ‘I had im­mense plans,’ he mut­tered ir­res­o­lutely. ‘Yes,’ said I; ‘but if you try to shout I’ll smash your head with—’ There was not a stick or a stone near. ‘I will throt­tle you for good,’ I cor­rected my­self. ‘I was on the thresh­old of great things,’ he pleaded, in a voice of long­ing, with a wist­ful­ness of tone that made my blood run cold. ‘And now for this stupid scoundrel—’ ‘Your suc­cess in Europe is as­sured in any case,’ I af­firmed steadily. I did not want to have the throt­tling of him, you un­der­stand—and in­deed it would have been very lit­tle use for any prac­ti­cal pur­pose. I tried to break the spell—the heavy, mute spell of the wilder­ness—that seemed to draw him to its piti­less breast by the awak­en­ing of for­got­ten and bru­tal in­stincts, by the mem­ory of grat­i­fied and mon­strous pas­sions. This alone, I was con­vinced, had driven him out to the edge of the for­est, to the bush, to­wards the gleam of fires, the throb of drums, the drone of weird in­can­ta­tions; this alone had be­guiled his un­law­ful soul be­yond the bounds of per­mit­ted as­pi­ra­tions. And, don’t you see, the ter­ror of the po­si­tion was not in be­ing knocked on the head—though I had a very lively sense of that dan­ger, too—but in this, that I had to deal with a be­ing to whom I could not ap­peal in the name of any­thing high or low. I had, even like the nig­gers, to in­voke him—him­self—his own ex­alted and in­cred­i­ble degra­da­tion. There was noth­ing ei­ther above or be­low him, and I knew it. He had kicked him­self loose of the earth. Con­found the man! he had kicked the very earth to pieces. He was alone, and I be­fore him did not know whether I stood on the ground or floated in the air. I’ve been telling you what we said—re­peat­ing the phrases we pro­nounced—but what’s the good? They were com­mon ev­ery­day words—the fa­mil­iar, vague sounds ex­changed on ev­ery wak­ing day of life. But what of that? They had be­hind them, to my mind, the ter­rific sug­ges­tive­ness of words heard in dreams, of phrases spo­ken in night­mares. Soul! If any­body ever strug­gled with a soul, I am the man. And I wasn’t ar­gu­ing with a lu­natic ei­ther. Believe me or not, his in­tel­li­gence was per­fectly clear—con­cen­trated, it is true, upon him­self with hor­ri­ble in­ten­sity, yet clear; and therein was my only chance—bar­ring, of course, the killing him there and then, which wasn’t so good, on ac­count of un­avoid­able noise. But his soul was mad. Be­ing alone in the wilder­ness, it had looked within it­self, and, by heav­ens! I tell you, it had gone mad. I had—for my sins, I sup­pose—to go through the or­deal of look­ing into it my­self. No elo­quence could have been so with­er­ing to one’s be­lief in mankind as his fi­nal burst of sin­cer­ity. He strug­gled with him­self, too. I saw it—I heard it. I saw the in­con­ceiv­able mys­tery of a soul that knew no re­straint, no faith, and no fear, yet strug­gling blindly with it­self. I kept my head pretty well; but when I had him at last stretched on the couch, I wiped my fore­head, while my legs shook un­der me as though I had car­ried half a ton on my back down that hill. And yet I had only sup­ported him, his bony arm clasped round my neck—and he was not much heav­ier than a child.

“When next day we left at noon, the crowd, of whose pres­ence be­hind the cur­tain of trees I had been acutely con­scious all the time, flowed out of the woods again, filled the clear­ing, cov­ered the slope with a mass of naked, breath­ing, quiv­er­ing, bronze bod­ies. I steamed up a bit, then swung down stream, and two thou­sand eyes fol­lowed the evo­lu­tions of the splash­ing, thump­ing, fierce river-de­mon beat­ing the wa­ter with its ter­ri­ble tail and breath­ing black smoke into the air. In front of the first rank, along the river, three men, plas­tered with bright red earth from head to foot, strut­ted to and fro rest­lessly. When we came abreast again, they faced the river, stamped their feet, nod­ded their horned heads, swayed their scar­let bod­ies; they shook to­wards the fierce river-de­mon a bunch of black feath­ers, a mangy skin with a pen­dent tail—some­thing that looked a dried gourd; they shouted pe­ri­od­i­cally to­gether strings of amaz­ing words that re­sem­bled no sounds of hu­man lan­guage; and the deep mur­murs of the crowd, in­ter­rupted sud­denly, were like the re­sponses of some sa­tanic litany.

“We had car­ried Kurtz into the pi­lot­house: there was more air there. Ly­ing on the couch, he stared through the open shut­ter. There was an eddy in the mass of hu­man bod­ies, and the woman with hel­meted head and tawny cheeks rushed out to the very brink of the stream. She put out her hands, shouted some­thing, and all that wild mob took up the shout in a roar­ing cho­rus of ar­tic­u­lated, rapid, breath­less ut­ter­ance.

“ ‘Do you un­der­stand this?’ I asked.

“He kept on look­ing out past me with fiery, long­ing eyes, with a min­gled ex­pres­sion of wist­ful­ness and hate. He made no an­swer, but I saw a smile, a smile of in­de­fin­able mean­ing, ap­pear on his colour­less lips that a mo­ment af­ter twitched con­vul­sively. ‘Do I not?’ he said slowly, gasp­ing, as if the words had been torn out of him by a su­per­nat­u­ral power.

“I pulled the string of the whis­tle, and I did this be­cause I saw the pil­grims on deck get­ting out their ri­fles with an air of an­tic­i­pat­ing a jolly lark. At the sud­den screech there was a move­ment of ab­ject ter­ror through that wedged mass of bod­ies. ‘Don’t! don’t you frighten them away,’ cried some­one on deck dis­con­so­lately. I pulled the string time af­ter time. They broke and ran, they leaped, they crouched, they swerved, they dodged the fly­ing ter­ror of the sound. The three red chaps had fallen flat, face down on the shore, as though they had been shot dead. Only the bar­barous and su­perb woman did not so much as flinch, and stretched trag­i­cally her bare arms af­ter us over the som­bre and glit­ter­ing river.

“And then that im­be­cile crowd down on the deck started their lit­tle fun, and I could see noth­ing more for smoke.

“The brown cur­rent ran swiftly out of the heart of dark­ness, bear­ing us down to­wards the sea with twice the speed of our up­ward progress; and Kurtz’s life was run­ning swiftly, too, ebbing, ebbing out of his heart into the sea of in­ex­orable time. The man­ager was very placid, he had no vi­tal anx­i­eties now, he took us both in with a com­pre­hen­sive and sat­is­fied glance: the ‘af­fair’ had come off as well as could be wished. I saw the time ap­proach­ing when I would be left alone of the party of ‘un­sound method.’ The pil­grims looked upon me with dis­favour. I was, so to speak, num­bered with the dead. It is strange how I ac­cepted this un­fore­seen part­ner­ship, this choice of night­mares forced upon me in the tene­brous land in­vaded by these mean and greedy phan­toms.

“Kurtz dis­coursed. A voice! a voice! It rang deep to the very last. It sur­vived his strength to hide in the mag­nif­i­cent folds of elo­quence the bar­ren dark­ness of his heart. Oh, he strug­gled! he strug­gled! The wastes of his weary brain were haunted by shad­owy im­ages now—im­ages of wealth and fame re­volv­ing ob­se­quiously round his un­ex­tin­guish­able gift of no­ble and lofty ex­pres­sion. My In­tended, my sta­tion, my ca­reer, my ideas—these were the sub­jects for the oc­ca­sional ut­ter­ances of el­e­vated sen­ti­ments. The shade of the orig­i­nal Kurtz fre­quented the bed­side of the hol­low sham, whose fate it was to be buried presently in the mould of primeval earth. But both the di­a­bolic love and the un­earthly hate of the mys­ter­ies it had pen­e­trated fought for the pos­ses­sion of that soul sa­ti­ated with prim­i­tive emo­tions, avid of ly­ing fame, of sham dis­tinc­tion, of all the ap­pear­ances of suc­cess and power.

“Some­times he was con­temptibly child­ish. He de­sired to have kings meet him at rail­way-sta­tions on his re­turn from some ghastly Nowhere, where he in­tended to ac­com­plish great things. ‘You show them you have in you some­thing that is re­ally prof­itable, and then there will be no lim­its to the recog­ni­tion of your abil­ity,’ he would say. ‘Of course you must take care of the mo­tives—right mo­tives—al­ways.’ The long reaches that were like one and the same reach, mo­not­o­nous bends that were ex­actly alike, slipped past the steamer with their mul­ti­tude of sec­u­lar trees look­ing pa­tiently af­ter this grimy frag­ment of an­other world, the fore­run­ner of change, of con­quest, of trade, of mas­sacres, of bless­ings. I looked ahead—pi­lot­ing. ‘Close the shut­ter,’ said Kurtz sud­denly one day; ‘I can’t bear to look at this.’ I did so. There was a si­lence. ‘Oh, but I will wring your heart yet!’ he cried at the in­vis­i­ble wilder­ness.

“We broke down—as I had ex­pected—and had to lie up for re­pairs at the head of an is­land. This de­lay was the first thing that shook Kurtz’s con­fi­dence. One morn­ing he gave me a packet of pa­pers and a pho­to­graph—the lot tied to­gether with a shoe­string. ‘Keep this for me,’ he said. ‘This nox­ious fool’ (mean­ing the man­ager) ‘is ca­pa­ble of pry­ing into my boxes when I am not look­ing.’ In the af­ter­noon I saw him. He was ly­ing on his back with closed eyes, and I with­drew qui­etly, but I heard him mut­ter, ‘Live rightly, die, die …’ I lis­tened. There was noth­ing more. Was he re­hears­ing some speech in his sleep, or was it a frag­ment of a phrase from some news­pa­per ar­ti­cle? He had been writ­ing for the pa­pers and meant to do so again, ‘for the fur­ther­ing of my ideas. It’s a duty.’

“His was an im­pen­e­tra­ble dark­ness. I looked at him as you peer down at a man who is ly­ing at the bot­tom of a precipice where the sun never shines. But I had not much time to give him, be­cause I was help­ing the en­gine-driver to take to pieces the leaky cylin­ders, to straighten a bent con­nect­ing-rod, and in other such mat­ters. I lived in an in­fer­nal mess of rust, fil­ings, nuts, bolts, span­ners, ham­mers, ratchet-drills—things I abom­i­nate, be­cause I don’t get on with them. I tended the lit­tle forge we for­tu­nately had aboard; I toiled wearily in a wretched scrapheap—un­less I had the shakes too bad to stand.

“One evening com­ing in with a can­dle I was star­tled to hear him say a lit­tle tremu­lously, ‘I am ly­ing here in the dark wait­ing for death.’ The light was within a foot of his eyes. I forced my­self to mur­mur, ‘Oh, non­sense!’ and stood over him as if trans­fixed.

“Any­thing ap­proach­ing the change that came over his fea­tures I have never seen be­fore, and hope never to see again. Oh, I wasn’t touched. I was fas­ci­nated. It was as though a veil had been rent. I saw on that ivory face the ex­pres­sion of som­bre pride, of ruth­less power, of craven ter­ror—of an in­tense and hope­less de­spair. Did he live his life again in ev­ery de­tail of de­sire, temp­ta­tion, and sur­ren­der dur­ing that supreme mo­ment of com­plete knowl­edge? He cried in a whis­per at some im­age, at some vi­sion—he cried out twice, a cry that was no more than a breath:

“ ‘The hor­ror! The hor­ror!’

“I blew the can­dle out and left the cabin. The pil­grims were din­ing in the mess­room, and I took my place op­po­site the man­ager, who lifted his eyes to give me a ques­tion­ing glance, which I suc­cess­fully ig­nored. He leaned back, serene, with that pe­cu­liar smile of his seal­ing the un­ex­pressed depths of his mean­ness. A con­tin­u­ous shower of small flies streamed upon the lamp, upon the cloth, upon our hands and faces. Sud­denly the man­ager’s boy put his in­so­lent black head in the door­way, and said in a tone of scathing con­tempt:

“ ‘Mis­tah Kurtz—he dead.’

“All the pil­grims rushed out to see. I re­mained, and went on with my din­ner. I be­lieve I was con­sid­ered bru­tally cal­lous. How­ever, I did not eat much. There was a lamp in there—light, don’t you know—and out­side it was so beastly, beastly dark. I went no more near the re­mark­able man who had pro­nounced a judg­ment upon the ad­ven­tures of his soul on this earth. The voice was gone. What else had been there? But I am of course aware that next day the pil­grims buried some­thing in a muddy hole.

“And then they very nearly buried me.

“How­ever, as you see, I did not go to join Kurtz there and then. I did not. I re­mained to dream the night­mare out to the end, and to show my loy­alty to Kurtz once more. Destiny. My des­tiny! Droll thing life is—that mys­te­ri­ous ar­range­ment of mer­ci­less logic for a fu­tile pur­pose. The most you can hope from it is some knowl­edge of your­self—that comes too late—a crop of un­ex­tin­guish­able re­grets. I have wres­tled with death. It is the most un­ex­cit­ing con­test you can imag­ine. It takes place in an im­pal­pa­ble grey­ness, with noth­ing un­der­foot, with noth­ing around, with­out spec­ta­tors, with­out clam­our, with­out glory, with­out the great de­sire of vic­tory, with­out the great fear of de­feat, in a sickly at­mos­phere of tepid scep­ti­cism, with­out much be­lief in your own right, and still less in that of your ad­ver­sary. If such is the form of ul­ti­mate wis­dom, then life is a greater rid­dle than some of us think it to be. I was within a hair’s breadth of the last op­por­tu­nity for pro­nounce­ment, and I found with hu­mil­i­a­tion that prob­a­bly I would have noth­ing to say. This is the rea­son why I af­firm that Kurtz was a re­mark­able man. He had some­thing to say. He said it. Since I had peeped over the edge my­self, I un­der­stand bet­ter the mean­ing of his stare, that could not see the flame of the can­dle, but was wide enough to em­brace the whole uni­verse, pierc­ing enough to pen­e­trate all the hearts that beat in the dark­ness. He had summed up—he had judged. ‘The hor­ror!’ He was a re­mark­able man. After all, this was the ex­pres­sion of some sort of be­lief; it had can­dour, it had con­vic­tion, it had a vi­brat­ing note of re­volt in its whis­per, it had the ap­palling face of a glimpsed truth—the strange com­min­gling of de­sire and hate. And it is not my own ex­trem­ity I re­mem­ber best—a vi­sion of grey­ness with­out form filled with phys­i­cal pain, and a care­less con­tempt for the evanes­cence of all things—even of this pain it­self. No! It is his ex­trem­ity that I seem to have lived through. True, he had made that last stride, he had stepped over the edge, while I had been per­mit­ted to draw back my hes­i­tat­ing foot. And per­haps in this is the whole dif­fer­ence; per­haps all the wis­dom, and all truth, and all sin­cer­ity, are just com­pressed into that in­ap­pre­cia­ble mo­ment of time in which we step over the thresh­old of the in­vis­i­ble. Per­haps! I like to think my sum­ming-up would not have been a word of care­less con­tempt. Bet­ter his cry—much bet­ter. It was an af­fir­ma­tion, a moral vic­tory paid for by in­nu­mer­able de­feats, by abom­inable ter­rors, by abom­inable sat­is­fac­tions. But it was a vic­tory! That is why I have re­mained loyal to Kurtz to the last, and even be­yond, when a long time af­ter I heard once more, not his own voice, but the echo of his mag­nif­i­cent elo­quence thrown to me from a soul as translu­cently pure as a cliff of crys­tal.

“No, they did not bury me, though there is a pe­riod of time which I re­mem­ber mist­ily, with a shud­der­ing won­der, like a pas­sage through some in­con­ceiv­able world that had no hope in it and no de­sire. I found my­self back in the sepul­chral city re­sent­ing the sight of peo­ple hur­ry­ing through the streets to filch a lit­tle money from each other, to de­vour their in­fa­mous cook­ery, to gulp their un­whole­some beer, to dream their in­signif­i­cant and silly dreams. They tres­passed upon my thoughts. They were in­trud­ers whose knowl­edge of life was to me an ir­ri­tat­ing pre­tence, be­cause I felt so sure they could not pos­si­bly know the things I knew. Their bear­ing, which was sim­ply the bear­ing of com­mon­place in­di­vid­u­als go­ing about their busi­ness in the as­sur­ance of per­fect safety, was of­fen­sive to me like the out­ra­geous flaunt­ings of folly in the face of a dan­ger it is un­able to com­pre­hend. I had no par­tic­u­lar de­sire to en­lighten them, but I had some dif­fi­culty in re­strain­ing my­self from laugh­ing in their faces so full of stupid im­por­tance. I dare­say I was not very well at that time. I tot­tered about the streets—there were var­i­ous af­fairs to set­tle—grin­ning bit­terly at per­fectly re­spectable per­sons. I ad­mit my be­hav­iour was in­ex­cus­able, but then my tem­per­a­ture was sel­dom nor­mal in these days. My dear aunt’s en­deav­ours to ‘nurse up my strength’ seemed al­to­gether be­side the mark. It was not my strength that wanted nurs­ing, it was my imag­i­na­tion that wanted sooth­ing. I kept the bun­dle of pa­pers given me by Kurtz, not know­ing ex­actly what to do with it. His mother had died lately, watched over, as I was told, by his In­tended. A clean-shaved man, with an of­fi­cial man­ner and wear­ing gold-rimmed spec­ta­cles, called on me one day and made in­quiries, at first cir­cuitous, af­ter­wards suavely press­ing, about what he was pleased to de­nom­i­nate cer­tain ‘doc­u­ments.’ I was not sur­prised, be­cause I had had two rows with the man­ager on the sub­ject out there. I had re­fused to give up the small­est scrap out of that pack­age, and I took the same at­ti­tude with the spec­ta­cled man. He be­came darkly men­ac­ing at last, and with much heat ar­gued that the Com­pany had the right to ev­ery bit of in­for­ma­tion about its ‘ter­ri­to­ries.’ And said he, ‘Mr. Kurtz’s knowl­edge of un­ex­plored re­gions must have been nec­es­sar­ily ex­ten­sive and pe­cu­liar—ow­ing to his great abil­i­ties and to the de­plorable cir­cum­stances in which he had been placed: there­fore—’ I as­sured him Mr. Kurtz’s knowl­edge, how­ever ex­ten­sive, did not bear upon the prob­lems of com­merce or ad­min­is­tra­tion. He in­voked then the name of sci­ence. ‘It would be an in­cal­cu­la­ble loss if,’ etc., etc. I of­fered him the re­port on the ‘Sup­pres­sion of Sav­age Cus­toms,’ with the postscrip­tum torn off. He took it up ea­gerly, but ended by sniff­ing at it with an air of con­tempt. ‘This is not what we had a right to ex­pect,’ he re­marked. ‘Ex­pect noth­ing else,’ I said. ‘There are only pri­vate let­ters.’ He with­drew upon some threat of le­gal pro­ceed­ings, and I saw him no more; but an­other fel­low, call­ing him­self Kurtz’s cousin, ap­peared two days later, and was anx­ious to hear all the de­tails about his dear rel­a­tive’s last mo­ments. In­ci­den­tally he gave me to un­der­stand that Kurtz had been es­sen­tially a great mu­si­cian. ‘There was the mak­ing of an im­mense suc­cess,’ said the man, who was an or­gan­ist, I be­lieve, with lank grey hair flow­ing over a greasy coat-col­lar. I had no rea­son to doubt his state­ment; and to this day I am un­able to say what was Kurtz’s pro­fes­sion, whether he ever had any—which was the great­est of his tal­ents. I had taken him for a painter who wrote for the pa­pers, or else for a jour­nal­ist who could paint—but even the cousin (who took snuff dur­ing the in­ter­view) could not tell me what he had been—ex­actly. He was a uni­ver­sal ge­nius—on that point I agreed with the old chap, who there­upon blew his nose nois­ily into a large cot­ton hand­ker­chief and with­drew in se­nile ag­i­ta­tion, bear­ing off some fam­ily let­ters and mem­o­randa with­out im­por­tance. Ul­ti­mately a jour­nal­ist anx­ious to know some­thing of the fate of his ‘dear col­league’ turned up. This vis­i­tor in­formed me Kurtz’s proper sphere ought to have been pol­i­tics ‘on the pop­u­lar side.’ He had furry straight eye­brows, bristly hair cropped short, an eye­glass on a broad rib­bon, and, be­com­ing ex­pan­sive, con­fessed his opin­ion that Kurtz re­ally couldn’t write a bit—‘but heav­ens! how that man could talk. He elec­tri­fied large meet­ings. He had faith—don’t you see?—he had the faith. He could get him­self to be­lieve any­thing—any­thing. He would have been a splen­did leader of an ex­treme party.’ ‘What party?’ I asked. ‘Any party,’ an­swered the other. ‘He was an—an—ex­trem­ist.’ Did I not think so? I as­sented. Did I know, he asked, with a sud­den flash of cu­rios­ity, ‘what it was that had in­duced him to go out there?’ ‘Yes,’ said I, and forth­with handed him the fa­mous Re­port for pub­li­ca­tion, if he thought fit. He glanced through it hur­riedly, mum­bling all the time, judged ‘it would do,’ and took him­self off with this plun­der.

“Thus I was left at last with a slim packet of let­ters and the girl’s por­trait. She struck me as beau­ti­ful—I mean she had a beau­ti­ful ex­pres­sion. I know that the sun­light can be made to lie, too, yet one felt that no ma­nip­u­la­tion of light and pose could have con­veyed the del­i­cate shade of truth­ful­ness upon those fea­tures. She seemed ready to lis­ten with­out men­tal reser­va­tion, with­out sus­pi­cion, with­out a thought for her­self. I con­cluded I would go and give her back her por­trait and those let­ters my­self. Cu­rios­ity? Yes; and also some other feel­ing per­haps. All that had been Kurtz’s had passed out of my hands: his soul, his body, his sta­tion, his plans, his ivory, his ca­reer. There re­mained only his mem­ory and his In­tended—and I wanted to give that up, too, to the past, in a way—to sur­ren­der per­son­ally all that re­mained of him with me to that obliv­ion which is the last word of our com­mon fate. I don’t de­fend my­self. I had no clear per­cep­tion of what it was I re­ally wanted. Per­haps it was an im­pulse of un­con­scious loy­alty, or the ful­fil­ment of one of those ironic ne­ces­si­ties that lurk in the facts of hu­man ex­is­tence. I don’t know. I can’t tell. But I went.

“I thought his mem­ory was like the other mem­o­ries of the dead that ac­cu­mu­late in ev­ery man’s life—a vague im­press on the brain of shad­ows that had fallen on it in their swift and fi­nal pas­sage; but be­fore the high and pon­der­ous door, be­tween the tall houses of a street as still and deco­rous as a well-kept al­ley in a ceme­tery, I had a vi­sion of him on the stretcher, open­ing his mouth vo­ra­ciously, as if to de­vour all the earth with all its mankind. He lived then be­fore me; he lived as much as he had ever lived—a shadow in­sa­tiable of splen­did ap­pear­ances, of fright­ful re­al­i­ties; a shadow darker than the shadow of the night, and draped nobly in the folds of a gor­geous elo­quence. The vi­sion seemed to en­ter the house with me—the stretcher, the phan­tom-bear­ers, the wild crowd of obe­di­ent wor­ship­pers, the gloom of the forests, the glit­ter of the reach be­tween the murky bends, the beat of the drum, reg­u­lar and muf­fled like the beat­ing of a heart—the heart of a con­quer­ing dark­ness. It was a mo­ment of tri­umph for the wilder­ness, an in­vad­ing and venge­ful rush which, it seemed to me, I would have to keep back alone for the sal­va­tion of an­other soul. And the mem­ory of what I had heard him say afar there, with the horned shapes stir­ring at my back, in the glow of fires, within the pa­tient woods, those bro­ken phrases came back to me, were heard again in their omi­nous and ter­ri­fy­ing sim­plic­ity. I re­mem­bered his ab­ject plead­ing, his ab­ject threats, the colos­sal scale of his vile de­sires, the mean­ness, the tor­ment, the tem­pes­tu­ous an­guish of his soul. And later on I seemed to see his col­lected lan­guid man­ner, when he said one day, ‘This lot of ivory now is re­ally mine. The Com­pany did not pay for it. I col­lected it my­self at a very great per­sonal risk. I am afraid they will try to claim it as theirs though. H’m. It is a dif­fi­cult case. What do you think I ought to do—re­sist? Eh? I want no more than jus­tice.’ … He wanted no more than jus­tice—no more than jus­tice. I rang the bell be­fore a ma­hogany door on the first floor, and while I waited he seemed to stare at me out of the glassy panel—stare with that wide and im­mense stare em­brac­ing, con­demn­ing, loathing all the uni­verse. I seemed to hear the whis­pered cry, “The hor­ror! The hor­ror!”

“The dusk was fall­ing. I had to wait in a lofty draw­ing-room with three long win­dows from floor to ceil­ing that were like three lu­mi­nous and bedraped col­umns. The bent gilt legs and backs of the fur­ni­ture shone in in­dis­tinct curves. The tall mar­ble fire­place had a cold and mon­u­men­tal white­ness. A grand pi­ano stood mas­sively in a cor­ner; with dark gleams on the flat sur­faces like a som­bre and pol­ished sar­coph­a­gus. A high door opened—closed. I rose.

“She came for­ward, all in black, with a pale head, float­ing to­wards me in the dusk. She was in mourn­ing. It was more than a year since his death, more than a year since the news came; she seemed as though she would re­mem­ber and mourn for­ever. She took both my hands in hers and mur­mured, ‘I had heard you were com­ing.’ I no­ticed she was not very young—I mean not girl­ish. She had a ma­ture ca­pac­ity for fi­delity, for be­lief, for suf­fer­ing. The room seemed to have grown darker, as if all the sad light of the cloudy evening had taken refuge on her fore­head. This fair hair, this pale vis­age, this pure brow, seemed sur­rounded by an ashy halo from which the dark eyes looked out at me. Their glance was guile­less, pro­found, con­fi­dent, and trust­ful. She car­ried her sor­row­ful head as though she were proud of that sor­row, as though she would say, ‘I—I alone know how to mourn for him as he de­serves.’ But while we were still shak­ing hands, such a look of aw­ful des­o­la­tion came upon her face that I per­ceived she was one of those crea­tures that are not the play­things of Time. For her he had died only yes­ter­day. And, by Jove! the im­pres­sion was so pow­er­ful that for me, too, he seemed to have died only yes­ter­day—nay, this very minute. I saw her and him in the same in­stant of time—his death and her sor­row—I saw her sor­row in the very mo­ment of his death. Do you un­der­stand? I saw them to­gether—I heard them to­gether. She had said, with a deep catch of the breath, ‘I have sur­vived’ while my strained ears seemed to hear dis­tinctly, min­gled with her tone of de­spair­ing re­gret, the sum­ming up whis­per of his eter­nal con­dem­na­tion. I asked my­self what I was do­ing there, with a sen­sa­tion of panic in my heart as though I had blun­dered into a place of cruel and ab­surd mys­ter­ies not fit for a hu­man be­ing to be­hold. She mo­tioned me to a chair. We sat down. I laid the packet gen­tly on the lit­tle ta­ble, and she put her hand over it. … ‘You knew him well,’ she mur­mured, af­ter a mo­ment of mourn­ing si­lence.

“ ‘In­ti­macy grows quickly out there,’ I said. ‘I knew him as well as it is pos­si­ble for one man to know an­other.’

“ ‘And you ad­mired him,’ she said. ‘It was im­pos­si­ble to know him and not to ad­mire him. Was it?’

“ ‘He was a re­mark­able man,’ I said, un­steadily. Then be­fore the ap­peal­ing fix­ity of her gaze, that seemed to watch for more words on my lips, I went on, ‘It was im­pos­si­ble not to—’

“ ‘Love him,’ she fin­ished ea­gerly, si­lenc­ing me into an ap­palled dumb­ness. ‘How true! how true! But when you think that no one knew him so well as I! I had all his no­ble con­fi­dence. I knew him best.’

“ ‘You knew him best,’ I re­peated. And per­haps she did. But with ev­ery word spo­ken the room was grow­ing darker, and only her fore­head, smooth and white, re­mained il­lu­mined by the in­ex­tin­guish­able light of be­lief and love.

“ ‘You were his friend,’ she went on. ‘His friend,’ she re­peated, a lit­tle louder. ‘You must have been, if he had given you this, and sent you to me. I feel I can speak to you—and oh! I must speak. I want you—you who have heard his last words—to know I have been wor­thy of him. … It is not pride. … Yes! I am proud to know I un­der­stood him bet­ter than any­one on earth—he told me so him­self. And since his mother died I have had no one—no one—to—to—’

“I lis­tened. The dark­ness deep­ened. I was not even sure whether he had given me the right bun­dle. I rather sus­pect he wanted me to take care of an­other batch of his pa­pers which, af­ter his death, I saw the man­ager ex­am­in­ing un­der the lamp. And the girl talked, eas­ing her pain in the cer­ti­tude of my sym­pa­thy; she talked as thirsty men drink. I had heard that her en­gage­ment with Kurtz had been dis­ap­proved by her peo­ple. He wasn’t rich enough or some­thing. And in­deed I don’t know whether he had not been a pau­per all his life. He had given me some rea­son to in­fer that it was his im­pa­tience of com­par­a­tive poverty that drove him out there.

“ ‘… Who was not his friend who had heard him speak once?’ she was say­ing. ‘He drew men to­wards him by what was best in them.’ She looked at me with in­ten­sity. ‘It is the gift of the great,’ she went on, and the sound of her low voice seemed to have the ac­com­pa­ni­ment of all the other sounds, full of mys­tery, des­o­la­tion, and sor­row, I had ever heard—the rip­ple of the river, the sough­ing of the trees swayed by the wind, the mur­murs of the crowds, the faint ring of in­com­pre­hen­si­ble words cried from afar, the whis­per of a voice speak­ing from be­yond the thresh­old of an eter­nal dark­ness. ‘But you have heard him! You know!’ she cried.

“ ‘Yes, I know,’ I said with some­thing like de­spair in my heart, but bow­ing my head be­fore the faith that was in her, be­fore that great and sav­ing il­lu­sion that shone with an un­earthly glow in the dark­ness, in the tri­umphant dark­ness from which I could not have de­fended her—from which I could not even de­fend my­self.

“ ‘What a loss to me—to us!’—she cor­rected her­self with beau­ti­ful gen­eros­ity; then added in a mur­mur, ‘To the world.’ By the last gleams of twi­light I could see the glit­ter of her eyes, full of tears—of tears that would not fall.

“ ‘I have been very happy—very for­tu­nate—very proud,’ she went on. ‘Too for­tu­nate. Too happy for a lit­tle while. And now I am un­happy for—for life.’

“She stood up; her fair hair seemed to catch all the re­main­ing light in a glim­mer of gold. I rose, too.

“ ‘And of all this,’ she went on mourn­fully, ‘of all his prom­ise, and of all his great­ness, of his gen­er­ous mind, of his no­ble heart, noth­ing re­mains—noth­ing but a mem­ory. You and I—’

“ ‘We shall al­ways re­mem­ber him,’ I said hastily.

“ ‘No!’ she cried. ‘It is im­pos­si­ble that all this should be lost—that such a life should be sac­ri­ficed to leave noth­ing—but sor­row. You know what vast plans he had. I knew of them, too—I could not per­haps un­der­stand—but oth­ers knew of them. Some­thing must re­main. His words, at least, have not died.’

“ ‘His words will re­main,’ I said.

“ ‘And his ex­am­ple,’ she whis­pered to her­self. ‘Men looked up to him—his good­ness shone in ev­ery act. His ex­am­ple—’

“ ‘True,’ I said; ‘his ex­am­ple, too. Yes, his ex­am­ple. I for­got that.’

“But I do not. I can­not—I can­not be­lieve—not yet. I can­not be­lieve that I shall never see him again, that no­body will see him again, never, never, never.’

“She put out her arms as if af­ter a re­treat­ing fig­ure, stretch­ing them back and with clasped pale hands across the fad­ing and nar­row sheen of the win­dow. Never see him! I saw him clearly enough then. I shall see this elo­quent phan­tom as long as I live, and I shall see her, too, a tragic and fa­mil­iar Shade, re­sem­bling in this ges­ture an­other one, tragic also, and be­decked with pow­er­less charms, stretch­ing bare brown arms over the glit­ter of the in­fer­nal stream, the stream of dark­ness. She said sud­denly very low, ‘He died as he lived.’

“ ‘His end,’ said I, with dull anger stir­ring in me, ‘was in ev­ery way wor­thy of his life.’

“ ‘And I was not with him,’ she mur­mured. My anger sub­sided be­fore a feel­ing of in­fi­nite pity.

“ ‘Every­thing that could be done—’ I mum­bled.

“ ‘Ah, but I be­lieved in him more than any­one on earth—more than his own mother, more than—him­self. He needed me! Me! I would have trea­sured ev­ery sigh, ev­ery word, ev­ery sign, ev­ery glance.’

“I felt like a chill grip on my chest. ‘Don’t,’ I said, in a muf­fled voice.

“ ‘For­give me. I—I have mourned so long in si­lence—in si­lence. … You were with him—to the last? I think of his lone­li­ness. No­body near to un­der­stand him as I would have un­der­stood. Per­haps no one to hear. …’

“ ‘To the very end,’ I said, shak­ily. ‘I heard his very last words. …’ I stopped in a fright.

“ ‘Re­peat them,’ she mur­mured in a heart­bro­ken tone. ‘I want—I want—some­thing—some­thing—to—to live with.’

“I was on the point of cry­ing at her, ‘Don’t you hear them?’ The dusk was re­peat­ing them in a per­sis­tent whis­per all around us, in a whis­per that seemed to swell men­ac­ingly like the first whis­per of a ris­ing wind. ‘The hor­ror! The hor­ror!’

“ ‘His last word—to live with,’ she in­sisted. ‘Don’t you un­der­stand I loved him—I loved him—I loved him!’

“I pulled my­self to­gether and spoke slowly.

“ ‘The last word he pro­nounced was—your name.’

“I heard a light sigh and then my heart stood still, stopped dead short by an ex­ult­ing and ter­ri­ble cry, by the cry of in­con­ceiv­able tri­umph and of un­speak­able pain. ‘I knew it—I was sure!’ … She knew. She was sure. I heard her weep­ing; she had hid­den her face in her hands. It seemed to me that the house would col­lapse be­fore I could es­cape, that the heav­ens would fall upon my head. But noth­ing hap­pened. The heav­ens do not fall for such a tri­fle. Would they have fallen, I won­der, if I had ren­dered Kurtz that jus­tice which was his due? Hadn’t he said he wanted only jus­tice? But I couldn’t. I could not tell her. It would have been too dark—too dark al­to­gether. …”

Mar­low ceased, and sat apart, in­dis­tinct and silent, in the pose of a med­i­tat­ing Bud­dha. No­body moved for a time. “We have lost the first of the ebb,” said the Direc­tor sud­denly. I raised my head. The off­ing was barred by a black bank of clouds, and the tran­quil wa­ter­way lead­ing to the ut­ter­most ends of the earth flowed som­bre un­der an over­cast sky—seemed to lead into the heart of an im­mense dark­ness.





      Heart of Darkness

      was published in 1899 by

      Joseph Conrad.

      This ebook was produced for the

      Standard Ebooks project

      by

      Alex Cabal,

      and is based on a transcription produced in 2009 by

      Judith Boss and David Widger

      for

      Project Gutenberg.

      The cover page is adapted from

      Brazilian Rainforest,

      a painting completed between 1848 and 1902 by

      William Michaud von Vevey.

      The cover and title pages feature the

      League Spartan and Sorts Mill Goudy

      typefaces created in 2014 and 2009 by

      The League of Moveable Type.

      This edition was released on

      May 17, 2019, 6:01 a.m.

      and is based on

      revision 50612a8.

      The first edition of this ebook was released on

      May 25, 2014, 12:00 a.m.

      You can check for updates to this ebook, view its revision history, or download it for different ereading systems at

      standardebooks.org/ebooks/joseph-conrad/heart-of-darkness.

      The volunteer-driven Standard Ebooks project relies on readers like you to submit typos, corrections, and other improvements. Anyone can contribute at standardebooks.org.





Uncopyright


                          May you do good and not evil.

                     May you find forgiveness for yourself and forgive others.

                     May you share freely, never taking more than you give.





      Copyright pages exist to tell you can’t do something. Unlike them, this Uncopyright page exists to tell you, among other things, that the writing and artwork in this ebook are believed to be in the U.S. public domain. The U.S. public domain represents our collective cultural heritage, and items in it are free for anyone in the U.S. to do almost anything at all with, without having to get permission. Public domain items are free of copyright restrictions.

      Copyright laws are different around the world. If you’re not located in the U.S., check with your local laws before using this ebook.

      Non-authorship activities performed on public domain items—so-called “sweat of the brow” work—don’t create a new copyright. That means nobody can claim a new copyright on a public domain item for work like digitization, markup, or typography. Regardless, to dispel any possible doubt on the copyright status of this ebook, Standard Ebooks and its contributors release this ebook under the terms in the CC0 1.0 Universal Public Domain Dedication, thus dedicating to the worldwide public domain all of the work they’ve done on this ebook, including but not limited to metadata, the titlepage, imprint, colophon, this Uncopyright, and any changes or enhancements to, or markup on, the original text and artwork. This dedication doesn’t change the copyright status of the underlying works, which, though believed to already be in the U.S. public domain, may not yet be in the public domain of other countries. We make this dedication in the interest of enriching our global cultural heritage, to promote free and libre culture around the world, and to give back to the unrestricted culture that has given all of us so much.

               Standard Ebooks and its contributors offer this ebook as-is and make no representations or warranties of any kind concerning this ebook, express, implied, statutory or otherwise, including without limitation warranties of title, merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, non infringement, or the absence of latent or other defects, accuracy, or the presence or absence of errors, whether or not discoverable, all to the greatest extent permissible under applicable law.




